     TITLE III--IMPROVING THE QUALITY AND EFFICIENCY OF HEALTH CARE
        Subtitle A--Transforming the Health Care Delivery System

 PART I--LINKING PAYMENT TO QUALITY OUTCOMES UNDER THE MEDICARE PROGRAM

SEC. 3001. HOSPITAL VALUE-BASED PURCHASING PROGRAM.

    (a) Program.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1886 of the Social Security Act (42 
    U.S.C. 1395ww), as amended by section 4102(a) of the HITECH Act 
    (Public Law 111-5), is amended by adding at the end the following 
    new subsection:
    ``(o) Hospital Value-Based Purchasing Program.--
        ``(1) Establishment.--
            ``(A) In general.--Subject to the succeeding provisions of 
        this subsection, the Secretary shall establish a hospital 
        value-based purchasing program (in this subsection referred to 
        as the `Program') under which value-based incentive payments 
        are made in a fiscal year to hospitals that meet the 
        performance standards under paragraph (3) for the performance 
        period for such fiscal year (as established under paragraph 
        (4)).
            ``(B) Program to begin in fiscal year 2013.--The Program 
        shall apply to payments for discharges occurring on or after 
        October 1, 2012.
            ``(C) Applicability of program to hospitals.--
                ``(i) In general.--For purposes of this subsection, 
            subject to clause (ii), the term `hospital' means a 
            subsection (d) hospital (as defined in subsection 
            (d)(1)(B)).
                ``(ii) Exclusions.--The term `hospital' shall not 
            include, with respect to a fiscal year, a hospital--

                    ``(I) that is subject to the payment reduction 
                under subsection (b)(3)(B)(viii)(I) for such fiscal 
                year;
                    ``(II) for which, during the performance period for 
                such fiscal year, the Secretary has cited deficiencies 
                that pose immediate jeopardy to the health or safety of 
                patients;
                    ``(III) for which there are not a minimum number 
                (as determined by the Secretary) of measures that apply 
                to the hospital for the performance period for such 
                fiscal year; or
                    ``(IV) for which there are not a minimum number (as 
                determined by the Secretary) of cases for the measures 
                that apply to the hospital for the performance period 
                for such fiscal year.

                ``(iii) Independent analysis.--For purposes of 
            determining the minimum numbers under subclauses (III) and 
            (IV) of clause (ii), the Secretary shall have conducted an 
            independent analysis of what numbers are appropriate.
                ``(iv) Exemption.--In the case of a hospital that is 
            paid under section 1814(b)(3), the Secretary may exempt 
            such hospital from the application of this subsection if 
            the State which is paid under such section submits an 
            annual report to the Secretary describing how a similar 
            program in the State for a participating hospital or 
            hospitals achieves or surpasses the measured results in 
            terms of patient health outcomes and cost savings 
            established under this subsection.
        ``(2) Measures.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Secretary shall select measures for 
        purposes of the Program. Such measures shall be selected from 
        the measures specified under subsection (b)(3)(B)(viii).
            ``(B) Requirements.--
                ``(i) For fiscal year 2013.--For value-based incentive 
            payments made with respect to discharges occurring during 
            fiscal year 2013, the Secretary shall ensure the following:

                    ``(I) Conditions or procedures.--Measures are 
                selected under subparagraph (A) that cover at least the 
                following 5 specific conditions or procedures:

                        ``(aa) Acute myocardial infarction (AMI).
                        ``(bb) Heart failure.
                        ``(cc) Pneumonia.
                        ``(dd) Surgeries, as measured by the Surgical 
                    Care Improvement Project (formerly referred to as 
                    `Surgical Infection Prevention' for discharges 
                    occurring before July 2006).
                        ``(ee) Healthcare-associated infections, as 
                    measured by the prevention metrics and targets 
                    established in the HHS Action Plan to Prevent 
                    Healthcare-Associated Infections (or any successor 
                    plan) of the Department of Health and Human 
                    Services.

                    ``(II) HCAHPS.--Measures selected under 
                subparagraph (A) shall be related to the Hospital 
                Consumer Assessment of Healthcare Providers and Systems 
                survey (HCAHPS).

                ``(ii) Inclusion of efficiency measures.--For value-
            based incentive payments made with respect to discharges 
            occurring during fiscal year 2014 or a subsequent fiscal 
            year, the Secretary shall ensure that measures selected 
            under subparagraph (A) include efficiency measures, 
            including measures of `Medicare spending per beneficiary'. 
            Such measures shall be adjusted for factors such as age, 
            sex, race, severity of illness, and other factors that the 
            Secretary determines appropriate.
            ``(C) Limitations.--
                ``(i) Time requirement for prior reporting and 
            notice.--The Secretary may not select a measure under 
            subparagraph (A) for use under the Program with respect to 
            a performance period for a fiscal year (as established 
            under paragraph (4)) unless such measure has been specified 
            under subsection (b)(3)(B)(viii) and included on the 
            Hospital Compare Internet website for at least 1 year prior 
            to the beginning of such performance period.
                ``(ii) Measure not applicable unless hospital furnishes 
            services appropriate to the measure.--A measure selected 
            under subparagraph (A) shall not apply to a hospital if 
            such hospital does not furnish services appropriate to such 
            measure.
            ``(D) Replacing measures.--Subclause (VI) of subsection 
        (b)(3)(B)(viii) shall apply to measures selected under 
        subparagraph (A) in the same manner as such subclause applies 
        to measures selected under such subsection.
        ``(3) Performance standards.--
            ``(A) Establishment.--The Secretary shall establish 
        performance standards with respect to measures selected under 
        paragraph (2) for a performance period for a fiscal year (as 
        established under paragraph (4)).
            ``(B) Achievement and improvement.--The performance 
        standards established under subparagraph (A) shall include 
        levels of achievement and improvement.
            ``(C) Timing.--The Secretary shall establish and announce 
        the performance standards under subparagraph (A) not later than 
        60 days prior to the beginning of the performance period for 
        the fiscal year involved.
            ``(D) Considerations in establishing standards.--In 
        establishing performance standards with respect to measures 
        under this paragraph, the Secretary shall take into account 
        appropriate factors, such as--
                ``(i) practical experience with the measures involved, 
            including whether a significant proportion of hospitals 
            failed to meet the performance standard during previous 
            performance periods;
                ``(ii) historical performance standards;
                ``(iii) improvement rates; and
                ``(iv) the opportunity for continued improvement.
        ``(4) Performance period.--For purposes of the Program, the 
    Secretary shall establish the performance period for a fiscal year. 
    Such performance period shall begin and end prior to the beginning 
    of such fiscal year.
        ``(5) Hospital performance score.--
            ``(A) In general.--Subject to subparagraph (B), the 
        Secretary shall develop a methodology for assessing the total 
        performance of each hospital based on performance standards 
        with respect to the measures selected under paragraph (2) for a 
        performance period (as established under paragraph (4)). Using 
        such methodology, the Secretary shall provide for an assessment 
        (in this subsection referred to as the `hospital performance 
        score') for each hospital for each performance period.
            ``(B) Application.--
                ``(i) Appropriate distribution.--The Secretary shall 
            ensure that the application of the methodology developed 
            under subparagraph (A) results in an appropriate 
            distribution of value-based incentive payments under 
            paragraph (6) among hospitals achieving different levels of 
            hospital performance scores, with hospitals achieving the 
            highest hospital performance scores receiving the largest 
            value-based incentive payments.
                ``(ii) Higher of achievement or improvement.--The 
            methodology developed under subparagraph (A) shall provide 
            that the hospital performance score is determined using the 
            higher of its achievement or improvement score for each 
            measure.
                ``(iii) Weights.--The methodology developed under 
            subparagraph (A) shall provide for the assignment of 
            weights for categories of measures as the Secretary 
            determines appropriate.
                ``(iv) No minimum performance standard.--The Secretary 
            shall not set a minimum performance standard in determining 
            the hospital performance score for any hospital.
                ``(v) Reflection of measures applicable to the 
            hospital.--The hospital performance score for a hospital 
            shall reflect the measures that apply to the hospital.
        ``(6) Calculation of value-based incentive payments.--
            ``(A) In general.--In the case of a hospital that the 
        Secretary determines meets (or exceeds) the performance 
        standards under paragraph (3) for the performance period for a 
        fiscal year (as established under paragraph (4)), the Secretary 
        shall increase the base operating DRG payment amount (as 
        defined in paragraph (7)(D)), as determined after application 
        of paragraph (7)(B)(i), for a hospital for each discharge 
        occurring in such fiscal year by the value-based incentive 
        payment amount.
            ``(B) Value-based incentive payment amount.--The value-
        based incentive payment amount for each discharge of a hospital 
        in a fiscal year shall be equal to the product of--
                ``(i) the base operating DRG payment amount (as defined 
            in paragraph (7)(D)) for the discharge for the hospital for 
            such fiscal year; and
                ``(ii) the value-based incentive payment percentage 
            specified under subparagraph (C) for the hospital for such 
            fiscal year.
            ``(C) Value-based incentive payment percentage.--
                ``(i) In general.--The Secretary shall specify a value-
            based incentive payment percentage for a hospital for a 
            fiscal year.
                ``(ii) Requirements.--In specifying the value-based 
            incentive payment percentage for each hospital for a fiscal 
            year under clause (i), the Secretary shall ensure that--

                    ``(I) such percentage is based on the hospital 
                performance score of the hospital under paragraph (5); 
                and
                    ``(II) the total amount of value-based incentive 
                payments under this paragraph to all hospitals in such 
                fiscal year is equal to the total amount available for 
                value-based incentive payments for such fiscal year 
                under paragraph (7)(A), as estimated by the Secretary.

        ``(7) Funding for value-based incentive payments.--
            ``(A) Amount.--The total amount available for value-based 
        incentive payments under paragraph (6) for all hospitals for a 
        fiscal year shall be equal to the total amount of reduced 
        payments for all hospitals under subparagraph (B) for such 
        fiscal year, as estimated by the Secretary.
            ``(B) Adjustment to payments.--
                ``(i) In general.--The Secretary shall reduce the base 
            operating DRG payment amount (as defined in subparagraph 
            (D)) for a hospital for each discharge in a fiscal year 
            (beginning with fiscal year 2013) by an amount equal to the 
            applicable percent (as defined in subparagraph (C)) of the 
            base operating DRG payment amount for the discharge for the 
            hospital for such fiscal year. The Secretary shall make 
            such reductions for all hospitals in the fiscal year 
            involved, regardless of whether or not the hospital has 
            been determined by the Secretary to have earned a value-
            based incentive payment under paragraph (6) for such fiscal 
            year.
                ``(ii) No effect on other payments.--Payments described 
            in items (aa) and (bb) of subparagraph (D)(i)(II) for a 
            hospital shall be determined as if this subsection had not 
            been enacted.
            ``(C) Applicable percent defined.--For purposes of 
        subparagraph (B), the term `applicable percent' means--
                ``(i) with respect to fiscal year 2013, 1.0 percent;
                ``(ii) with respect to fiscal year 2014, 1.25 percent;
                ``(iii) with respect to fiscal year 2015, 1.5 percent;
                ``(iv) with respect to fiscal year 2016, 1.75 percent; 
            and
                ``(v) with respect to fiscal year 2017 and succeeding 
            fiscal years, 2 percent.
            ``(D) Base operating drg payment amount defined.--
                ``(i) In general.--Except as provided in clause (ii), 
            in this subsection, the term `base operating DRG payment 
            amount' means, with respect to a hospital for a fiscal 
            year--

                    ``(I) the payment amount that would otherwise be 
                made under subsection (d) (determined without regard to 
                subsection (q)) for a discharge if this subsection did 
                not apply; reduced by
                    ``(II) any portion of such payment amount that is 
                attributable to--

                        ``(aa) payments under paragraphs (5)(A), 
                    (5)(B), (5)(F), and (12) of subsection (d); and
                        ``(bb) such other payments under subsection (d) 
                    determined appropriate by the Secretary.
                ``(ii) Special rules for certain hospitals.--

                    ``(I) Sole community hospitals and medicare-
                dependent, small rural hospitals.--In the case of a 
                medicare-dependent, small rural hospital (with respect 
                to discharges occurring during fiscal year 2012 and 
                2013) or a sole community hospital, in applying 
                subparagraph (A)(i), the payment amount that would 
                otherwise be made under subsection (d) shall be 
                determined without regard to subparagraphs (I) and (L) 
                of subsection (b)(3) and subparagraphs (D) and (G) of 
                subsection (d)(5).
                    ``(II) Hospitals paid under section 1814.--In the 
                case of a hospital that is paid under section 
                1814(b)(3), the term `base operating DRG payment 
                amount' means the payment amount under such section.

        ``(8) Announcement of net result of adjustments.--Under the 
    Program, the Secretary shall, not later than 60 days prior to the 
    fiscal year involved, inform each hospital of the adjustments to 
    payments to the hospital for discharges occurring in such fiscal 
    year under paragraphs (6) and (7)(B)(i).
        ``(9) No effect in subsequent fiscal years.--The value-based 
    incentive payment under paragraph (6) and the payment reduction 
    under paragraph (7)(B)(i) shall each apply only with respect to the 
    fiscal year involved, and the Secretary shall not take into account 
    such value-based incentive payment or payment reduction in making 
    payments to a hospital under this section in a subsequent fiscal 
    year.
        ``(10) Public reporting.--
            ``(A) Hospital specific information.--
                ``(i) In general.--The Secretary shall make information 
            available to the public regarding the performance of 
            individual hospitals under the Program, including--

                    ``(I) the performance of the hospital with respect 
                to each measure that applies to the hospital;
                    ``(II) the performance of the hospital with respect 
                to each condition or procedure; and
                    ``(III) the hospital performance score assessing 
                the total performance of the hospital.

                ``(ii) Opportunity to review and submit corrections.--
            The Secretary shall ensure that a hospital has the 
            opportunity to review, and submit corrections for, the 
            information to be made public with respect to the hospital 
            under clause (i) prior to such information being made 
            public.
                ``(iii) Website.--Such information shall be posted on 
            the Hospital Compare Internet website in an easily 
            understandable format.
            ``(B) Aggregate information.--The Secretary shall 
        periodically post on the Hospital Compare Internet website 
        aggregate information on the Program, including--
                ``(i) the number of hospitals receiving value-based 
            incentive payments under paragraph (6) and the range and 
            total amount of such value-based incentive payments; and
                ``(ii) the number of hospitals receiving less than the 
            maximum value-based incentive payment available to the 
            hospital for the fiscal year involved and the range and 
            amount of such payments.
        ``(11) Implementation.--
            ``(A) Appeals.--The Secretary shall establish a process by 
        which hospitals may appeal the calculation of a hospital's 
        performance assessment with respect to the performance 
        standards established under paragraph (3)(A) and the hospital 
        performance score under paragraph (5). The Secretary shall 
        ensure that such process provides for resolution of such 
        appeals in a timely manner.
            ``(B) Limitation on review.--Except as provided in 
        subparagraph (A), there shall be no administrative or judicial 
        review under section 1869, section 1878, or otherwise of the 
        following:
                ``(i) The methodology used to determine the amount of 
            the value-based incentive payment under paragraph (6) and 
            the determination of such amount.
                ``(ii) The determination of the amount of funding 
            available for such value-based incentive payments under 
            paragraph (7)(A) and the payment reduction under paragraph 
            (7)(B)(i).
                ``(iii) The establishment of the performance standards 
            under paragraph (3) and the performance period under 
            paragraph (4).
                ``(iv) The measures specified under subsection 
            (b)(3)(B)(viii) and the measures selected under paragraph 
            (2).
                ``(v) The methodology developed under paragraph (5) 
            that is used to calculate hospital performance scores and 
            the calculation of such scores.
                ``(vi) The validation methodology specified in 
            subsection (b)(3)(B)(viii)(XI).
            ``(C) Consultation with small hospitals.--The Secretary 
        shall consult with small rural and urban hospitals on the 
        application of the Program to such hospitals.
        ``(12) Promulgation of regulations.--The Secretary shall 
    promulgate regulations to carry out the Program, including the 
    selection of measures under paragraph (2), the methodology 
    developed under paragraph (5) that is used to calculate hospital 
    performance scores, and the methodology used to determine the 
    amount of value-based incentive payments under paragraph (6).''.
        (2) Amendments for reporting of hospital quality information.--
    Section 1886(b)(3)(B)(viii) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
    1395ww(b)(3)(B)(viii)) is amended--
            (A) in subclause (II), by adding at the end the following 
        sentence: ``The Secretary may require hospitals to submit data 
        on measures that are not used for the determination of value-
        based incentive payments under subsection (o).'';
            (B) in subclause (V), by striking ``beginning with fiscal 
        year 2008'' and inserting ``for fiscal years 2008 through 
        2012'';
            (C) in subclause (VII), in the first sentence, by striking 
        ``data submitted'' and inserting ``information regarding 
        measures submitted''; and
            (D) by adding at the end the following new subclauses:
    ``(VIII) Effective for payments beginning with fiscal year 2013, 
with respect to quality measures for outcomes of care, the Secretary 
shall provide for such risk adjustment as the Secretary determines to 
be appropriate to maintain incentives for hospitals to treat patients 
with severe illnesses or conditions.
    ``(IX)(aa) Subject to item (bb), effective for payments beginning 
with fiscal year 2013, each measure specified by the Secretary under 
this clause shall be endorsed by the entity with a contract under 
section 1890(a).
    ``(bb) In the case of a specified area or medical topic determined 
appropriate by the Secretary for which a feasible and practical measure 
has not been endorsed by the entity with a contract under section 
1890(a), the Secretary may specify a measure that is not so endorsed as 
long as due consideration is given to measures that have been endorsed 
or adopted by a consensus organization identified by the Secretary.
    ``(X) To the extent practicable, the Secretary shall, with input 
from consensus organizations and other stakeholders, take steps to 
ensure that the measures specified by the Secretary under this clause 
are coordinated and aligned with quality measures applicable to--
        ``(aa) physicians under section 1848(k); and
        ``(bb) other providers of services and suppliers under this 
    title.
    ``(XI) The Secretary shall establish a process to validate measures 
specified under this clause as appropriate. Such process shall include 
the auditing of a number of randomly selected hospitals sufficient to 
ensure validity of the reporting program under this clause as a whole 
and shall provide a hospital with an opportunity to appeal the 
validation of measures reported by such hospital.''.
        (3) Website improvements.--Section 1886(b)(3)(B) of the Social 
    Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ww(b)(3)(B)), as amended by section 
    4102(b) of the HITECH Act (Public Law 111-5), is amended by adding 
    at the end the following new clause:
    ``(x)(I) The Secretary shall develop standard Internet website 
reports tailored to meet the needs of various stakeholders such as 
hospitals, patients, researchers, and policymakers. The Secretary shall 
seek input from such stakeholders in determining the type of 
information that is useful and the formats that best facilitate the use 
of the information.
    ``(II) The Secretary shall modify the Hospital Compare Internet 
website to make the use and navigation of that website readily 
available to individuals accessing it.''.
        (4) GAO study and report.--
            (A) Study.--The Comptroller General of the United States 
        shall conduct a study on the performance of the hospital value-
        based purchasing program established under section 1886(o) of 
        the Social Security Act, as added by paragraph (1). Such study 
        shall include an analysis of the impact of such program on--
                (i) the quality of care furnished to Medicare 
            beneficiaries, including diverse Medicare beneficiary 
            populations (such as diverse in terms of race, ethnicity, 
            and socioeconomic status);
                (ii) expenditures under the Medicare program, including 
            any reduced expenditures under Part A of title XVIII of 
            such Act that are attributable to the improvement in the 
            delivery of inpatient hospital services by reason of such 
            hospital value-based purchasing program;
                (iii) the quality performance among safety net 
            hospitals and any barriers such hospitals face in meeting 
            the performance standards applicable under such hospital 
            value-based purchasing program; and
                (iv) the quality performance among small rural and 
            small urban hospitals and any barriers such hospitals face 
            in meeting the performance standards applicable under such 
            hospital value-based purchasing program.
            (B) Reports.--
                (i) Interim report.--Not later than October 1, 2015, 
            the Comptroller General of the United States shall submit 
            to Congress an interim report containing the results of the 
            study conducted under subparagraph (A), together with 
            recommendations for such legislation and administrative 
            action as the Comptroller General determines appropriate.
                (ii) Final report.--Not later than July 1, 2017, the 
            Comptroller General of the United States shall submit to 
            Congress a report containing the results of the study 
            conducted under subparagraph (A), together with 
            recommendations for such legislation and administrative 
            action as the Comptroller General determines appropriate.
        (5) HHS study and report.--
            (A) Study.--The Secretary of Health and Human Services 
        shall conduct a study on the performance of the hospital value-
        based purchasing program established under section 1886(o) of 
        the Social Security Act, as added by paragraph (1). Such study 
        shall include an analysis--
                (i) of ways to improve the hospital value-based 
            purchasing program and ways to address any unintended 
            consequences that may occur as a result of such program;
                (ii) of whether the hospital value-based purchasing 
            program resulted in lower spending under the Medicare 
            program under title XVIII of such Act or other financial 
            savings to hospitals;
                (iii) the appropriateness of the Medicare program 
            sharing in any savings generated through the hospital 
            value-based purchasing program; and
                (iv) any other area determined appropriate by the 
            Secretary.
            (B) Report.--Not later than January 1, 2016, the Secretary 
        of Health and Human Services shall submit to Congress a report 
        containing the results of the study conducted under 
        subparagraph (A), together with recommendations for such 
        legislation and administrative action as the Secretary 
        determines appropriate.
    (b) Value-Based Purchasing Demonstration Programs.--
        (1) Value-based purchasing demonstration program for inpatient 
    critical access hospitals.--
            (A) Establishment.--
                (i) In general.--Not later than 2 years after the date 
            of enactment of this Act, the Secretary of Health and Human 
            Services (in this subsection referred to as the 
            ``Secretary'') shall establish a demonstration program 
            under which the Secretary establishes a value-based 
            purchasing program under the Medicare program under title 
            XVIII of the Social Security Act for critical access 
            hospitals (as defined in paragraph (1) of section 1861(mm) 
            of such Act (42 U.S.C. 1395x(mm))) with respect to 
            inpatient critical access hospital services (as defined in 
            paragraph (2) of such section) in order to test innovative 
            methods of measuring and rewarding quality and efficient 
            health care furnished by such hospitals.
                (ii) Duration.--The demonstration program under this 
            paragraph shall be conducted for a 3-year period.
                (iii) Sites.--The Secretary shall conduct the 
            demonstration program under this paragraph at an 
            appropriate number (as determined by the Secretary) of 
            critical access hospitals. The Secretary shall ensure that 
            such hospitals are representative of the spectrum of such 
            hospitals that participate in the Medicare program.
            (B) Waiver authority.--The Secretary may waive such 
        requirements of titles XI and XVIII of the Social Security Act 
        as may be necessary to carry out the demonstration program 
        under this paragraph.
            (C) Budget neutrality requirement.--In conducting the 
        demonstration program under this section, the Secretary shall 
        ensure that the aggregate payments made by the Secretary do not 
        exceed the amount which the Secretary would have paid if the 
        demonstration program under this section was not implemented.
            (D) Report.--Not later than 18 months after the completion 
        of the demonstration program under this paragraph, the 
        Secretary shall submit to Congress a report on the 
        demonstration program together with--
                (i) recommendations on the establishment of a permanent 
            value-based purchasing program under the Medicare program 
            for critical access hospitals with respect to inpatient 
            critical access hospital services; and
                (ii) recommendations for such other legislation and 
            administrative action as the Secretary determines 
            appropriate.
        (2) Value-based purchasing demonstration program for hospitals 
    excluded from hospital value-based purchasing program as a result 
    of insufficient numbers of measures and cases.--
            (A) Establishment.--
                (i) In general.--Not later than 2 years after the date 
            of enactment of this Act, the Secretary shall establish a 
            demonstration program under which the Secretary establishes 
            a value-based purchasing program under the Medicare program 
            under title XVIII of the Social Security Act for applicable 
            hospitals (as defined in clause (ii)) with respect to 
            inpatient hospital services (as defined in section 1861(b) 
            of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395x(b))) in order 
            to test innovative methods of measuring and rewarding 
            quality and efficient health care furnished by such 
            hospitals.
                (ii) Applicable hospital defined.--For purposes of this 
            paragraph, the term ``applicable hospital'' means a 
            hospital described in subclause (III) or (IV) of section 
            1886(o)(1)(C)(ii) of the Social Security Act, as added by 
            subsection (a)(1).
                (iii) Duration.--The demonstration program under this 
            paragraph shall be conducted for a 3-year period.
                (iv) Sites.--The Secretary shall conduct the 
            demonstration program under this paragraph at an 
            appropriate number (as determined by the Secretary) of 
            applicable hospitals. The Secretary shall ensure that such 
            hospitals are representative of the spectrum of such 
            hospitals that participate in the Medicare program.
            (B) Waiver authority.--The Secretary may waive such 
        requirements of titles XI and XVIII of the Social Security Act 
        as may be necessary to carry out the demonstration program 
        under this paragraph.
            (C) Budget neutrality requirement.--In conducting the 
        demonstration program under this section, the Secretary shall 
        ensure that the aggregate payments made by the Secretary do not 
        exceed the amount which the Secretary would have paid if the 
        demonstration program under this section was not implemented.
            (D) Report.--Not later than 18 months after the completion 
        of the demonstration program under this paragraph, the 
        Secretary shall submit to Congress a report on the 
        demonstration program together with--
                (i) recommendations on the establishment of a permanent 
            value-based purchasing program under the Medicare program 
            for applicable hospitals with respect to inpatient hospital 
            services; and
                (ii) recommendations for such other legislation and 
            administrative action as the Secretary determines 
            appropriate.

SEC. 3002. IMPROVEMENTS TO THE PHYSICIAN QUALITY REPORTING SYSTEM.

    (a) Extension.--Section 1848(m) of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395w-4(m)) is amended--
        (1) in paragraph (1)--
            (A) in subparagraph (A), in the matter preceding clause 
        (i), by striking ``2010'' and inserting ``2014''; and
            (B) in subparagraph (B)--
                (i) in clause (i), by striking ``and'' at the end;
                (ii) in clause (ii), by striking the period at the end 
            and inserting a semicolon; and
                (iii) by adding at the end the following new clauses:
                ``(iii) for 2011, 1.0 percent; and
                ``(iv) for 2012, 2013, and 2014, 0.5 percent.'';
        (2) in paragraph (3)--
            (A) in subparagraph (A), in the matter preceding clause 
        (i), by inserting ``(or, for purposes of subsection (a)(8), for 
        the quality reporting period for the year)'' after ``reporting 
        period''; and
            (B) in subparagraph (C)(i), by inserting ``, or, for 
        purposes of subsection (a)(8), for a quality reporting period 
        for the year'' after ``(a)(5), for a reporting period for a 
        year'';
        (3) in paragraph (5)(E)(iv), by striking ``subsection 
    (a)(5)(A)'' and inserting ``paragraphs (5)(A) and (8)(A) of 
    subsection (a)''; and
        (4) in paragraph (6)(C)--
            (A) in clause (i)(II), by striking ``, 2009, 2010, and 
        2011'' and inserting ``and subsequent years''; and
            (B) in clause (iii)--
                (i) by inserting ``(a)(8)'' after ``(a)(5)''; and
                (ii) by striking ``under subparagraph (D)(iii) of such 
            subsection'' and inserting ``under subsection 
            (a)(5)(D)(iii) or the quality reporting period under 
            subsection (a)(8)(D)(iii), respectively''.
    (b) Incentive Payment Adjustment for Quality Reporting.--Section 
1848(a) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-4(a)) is amended by 
adding at the end the following new paragraph:
        ``(8) Incentives for quality reporting.--
            ``(A) Adjustment.--
                ``(i) In general.--With respect to covered professional 
            services furnished by an eligible professional during 2015 
            or any subsequent year, if the eligible professional does 
            not satisfactorily submit data on quality measures for 
            covered professional services for the quality reporting 
            period for the year (as determined under subsection 
            (m)(3)(A)), the fee schedule amount for such services 
            furnished by such professional during the year (including 
            the fee schedule amount for purposes of determining a 
            payment based on such amount) shall be equal to the 
            applicable percent of the fee schedule amount that would 
            otherwise apply to such services under this subsection 
            (determined after application of paragraphs (3), (5), and 
            (7), but without regard to this paragraph).
                ``(ii) Applicable percent.--For purposes of clause (i), 
            the term `applicable percent' means--

                    ``(I) for 2015, 98.5 percent; and
                    ``(II) for 2016 and each subsequent year, 98 
                percent.

            ``(B) Application.--
                ``(i) Physician reporting system rules.--Paragraphs 
            (5), (6), and (8) of subsection (k) shall apply for 
            purposes of this paragraph in the same manner as they apply 
            for purposes of such subsection.
                ``(ii) Incentive payment validation rules.--Clauses 
            (ii) and (iii) of subsection (m)(5)(D) shall apply for 
            purposes of this paragraph in a similar manner as they 
            apply for purposes of such subsection.
            ``(C) Definitions.--For purposes of this paragraph:
                ``(i) Eligible professional; covered professional 
            services.--The terms `eligible professional' and `covered 
            professional services' have the meanings given such terms 
            in subsection (k)(3).
                ``(ii) Physician reporting system.--The term `physician 
            reporting system' means the system established under 
            subsection (k).
                ``(iii) Quality reporting period.--The term `quality 
            reporting period' means, with respect to a year, a period 
            specified by the Secretary.''.
    (c) Maintenance of Certification Programs.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1848(k)(4) of the Social Security Act 
    (42 U.S.C. 1395w-4(k)(4)) is amended by inserting ``or through a 
    Maintenance of Certification program operated by a specialty body 
    of the American Board of Medical Specialties that meets the 
    criteria for such a registry'' after ``Database)''.
        (2) Effective date.--The amendment made by paragraph (1) shall 
    apply for years after 2010.
    (d) Integration of Physician Quality Reporting and EHR Reporting.--
Section 1848(m) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-4(m)) is 
amended by adding at the end the following new paragraph:
        ``(7) Integration of physician quality reporting and ehr 
    reporting.--Not later than January 1, 2012, the Secretary shall 
    develop a plan to integrate reporting on quality measures under 
    this subsection with reporting requirements under subsection (o) 
    relating to the meaningful use of electronic health records. Such 
    integration shall consist of the following:
            ``(A) The selection of measures, the reporting of which 
        would both demonstrate--
                ``(i) meaningful use of an electronic health record for 
            purposes of subsection (o); and
                ``(ii) quality of care furnished to an individual.
            ``(B) Such other activities as specified by the 
        Secretary.''.
    (e) Feedback.--Section 1848(m)(5) of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395w-4(m)(5)) is amended by adding at the end the following new 
subparagraph:
            ``(H) Feedback.--The Secretary shall provide timely 
        feedback to eligible professionals on the performance of the 
        eligible professional with respect to satisfactorily submitting 
        data on quality measures under this subsection.''.
    (f) Appeals.--Such section is further amended--
        (1) in subparagraph (E), by striking ``There shall'' and 
    inserting ``Except as provided in subparagraph (I), there shall''; 
    and
        (2) by adding at the end the following new subparagraph:
            ``(I) Informal appeals process.--The Secretary shall, by 
        not later than January 1, 2011, establish and have in place an 
        informal process for eligible professionals to seek a review of 
        the determination that an eligible professional did not 
        satisfactorily submit data on quality measures under this 
        subsection.''.

SEC. 3003. IMPROVEMENTS TO THE PHYSICIAN FEEDBACK PROGRAM.

    (a) In General.--Section 1848(n) of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395w-4(n)) is amended--
        (1) in paragraph (1)--
            (A) in subparagraph (A)--
                (i) by striking ``general.--The Secretary'' and 
            inserting ``general.--
                ``(i) Establishment.--The Secretary'';
                (ii) in clause (i), as added by clause (i), by striking 
            ``the `Program')'' and all that follows through the period 
            at the end of the second sentence and inserting ``the 
            `Program').''; and
                (iii) by adding at the end the following new clauses:
                ``(ii) Reports on resources.--The Secretary shall use 
            claims data under this title (and may use other data) to 
            provide confidential reports to physicians (and, as 
            determined appropriate by the Secretary, to groups of 
            physicians) that measure the resources involved in 
            furnishing care to individuals under this title.
                ``(iii) Inclusion of certain information.--If 
            determined appropriate by the Secretary, the Secretary may 
            include information on the quality of care furnished to 
            individuals under this title by the physician (or group of 
            physicians) in such reports.''; and
            (B) in subparagraph (B), by striking ``subparagraph (A)'' 
        and inserting ``subparagraph (A)(ii)'';
        (2) in paragraph (4)--
            (A) in the heading, by inserting ``initial'' after 
        ``focus''; and
            (B) in the matter preceding subparagraph (A), by inserting 
        ``initial'' after ``focus the'';
        (3) in paragraph (6), by adding at the end the following new 
    sentence: ``For adjustments for reports on utilization under 
    paragraph (9), see subparagraph (D) of such paragraph.''; and
        (4) by adding at the end the following new paragraphs:
        ``(9) Reports on utilization.--
            ``(A) Development of episode grouper.--
                ``(i) In general.--The Secretary shall develop an 
            episode grouper that combines separate but clinically 
            related items and services into an episode of care for an 
            individual, as appropriate.
                ``(ii) Timeline for development.--The episode grouper 
            described in subparagraph (A) shall be developed by not 
            later than January 1, 2012.
                ``(iii) Public availability.--The Secretary shall make 
            the details of the episode grouper described in 
            subparagraph (A) available to the public.
                ``(iv) Endorsement.--The Secretary shall seek 
            endorsement of the episode grouper described in 
            subparagraph (A) by the entity with a contract under 
            section 1890(a).
            ``(B) Reports on utilization.--Effective beginning with 
        2012, the Secretary shall provide reports to physicians that 
        compare, as determined appropriate by the Secretary, patterns 
        of resource use of the individual physician to such patterns of 
        other physicians.
            ``(C) Analysis of data.--The Secretary shall, for purposes 
        of preparing reports under this paragraph, establish 
        methodologies as appropriate, such as to--
                ``(i) attribute episodes of care, in whole or in part, 
            to physicians;
                ``(ii) identify appropriate physicians for purposes of 
            comparison under subparagraph (B); and
                ``(iii) aggregate episodes of care attributed to a 
            physician under clause (i) into a composite measure per 
            individual.
            ``(D) Data adjustment.--In preparing reports under this 
        paragraph, the Secretary shall make appropriate adjustments, 
        including adjustments--
                ``(i) to account for differences in socioeconomic and 
            demographic characteristics, ethnicity, and health status 
            of individuals (such as to recognize that less healthy 
            individuals may require more intensive interventions); and
                ``(ii) to eliminate the effect of geographic 
            adjustments in payment rates (as described in subsection 
            (e)).
            ``(E) Public availability of methodology.--The Secretary 
        shall make available to the public--
                ``(i) the methodologies established under subparagraph 
            (C);
                ``(ii) information regarding any adjustments made to 
            data under subparagraph (D); and
                ``(iii) aggregate reports with respect to physicians.
            ``(F) Definition of physician.--In this paragraph:
                ``(i) In general.--The term `physician' has the meaning 
            given that term in section 1861(r)(1).
                ``(ii) Treatment of groups.--Such term includes, as the 
            Secretary determines appropriate, a group of physicians.
            ``(G) Limitations on review.--There shall be no 
        administrative or judicial review under section 1869, section 
        1878, or otherwise of the establishment of the methodology 
        under subparagraph (C), including the determination of an 
        episode of care under such methodology.
        ``(10) Coordination with other value-based purchasing 
    reforms.--The Secretary shall coordinate the Program with the 
    value-based payment modifier established under subsection (p) and, 
    as the Secretary determines appropriate, other similar provisions 
    of this title.''.
    (b) Conforming Amendment.--Section 1890(b) of the Social Security 
Act (42 U.S.C. 1395aaa(b)) is amended by adding at the end the 
following new paragraph:
        ``(6) Review and endorsement of episode grouper under the 
    physician feedback program.--The entity shall provide for the 
    review and, as appropriate, the endorsement of the episode grouper 
    developed by the Secretary under section 1848(n)(9)(A). Such review 
    shall be conducted on an expedited basis.''.

SEC. 3004. QUALITY REPORTING FOR LONG-TERM CARE HOSPITALS, INPATIENT 
              REHABILITATION HOSPITALS, AND HOSPICE PROGRAMS.

    (a) Long-term Care Hospitals.--Section 1886(m) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ww(m)), as amended by section 3401(c), is 
amended by adding at the end the following new paragraph:
        ``(5) Quality reporting.--
            ``(A) Reduction in update for failure to report.--
                ``(i) In general.--Under the system described in 
            paragraph (1), for rate year 2014 and each subsequent rate 
            year, in the case of a long-term care hospital that does 
            not submit data to the Secretary in accordance with 
            subparagraph (C) with respect to such a rate year, any 
            annual update to a standard Federal rate for discharges for 
            the hospital during the rate year, and after application of 
            paragraph (3), shall be reduced by 2 percentage points.
                ``(ii) Special rule.--The application of this 
            subparagraph may result in such annual update being less 
            than 0.0 for a rate year, and may result in payment rates 
            under the system described in paragraph (1) for a rate year 
            being less than such payment rates for the preceding rate 
            year.
            ``(B) Noncumulative application.--Any reduction under 
        subparagraph (A) shall apply only with respect to the rate year 
        involved and the Secretary shall not take into account such 
        reduction in computing the payment amount under the system 
        described in paragraph (1) for a subsequent rate year.
            ``(C) Submission of quality data.--For rate year 2014 and 
        each subsequent rate year, each long-term care hospital shall 
        submit to the Secretary data on quality measures specified 
        under subparagraph (D). Such data shall be submitted in a form 
        and manner, and at a time, specified by the Secretary for 
        purposes of this subparagraph.
            ``(D) Quality measures.--
                ``(i) In general.--Subject to clause (ii), any measure 
            specified by the Secretary under this subparagraph must 
            have been endorsed by the entity with a contract under 
            section 1890(a).
                ``(ii) Exception.--In the case of a specified area or 
            medical topic determined appropriate by the Secretary for 
            which a feasible and practical measure has not been 
            endorsed by the entity with a contract under section 
            1890(a), the Secretary may specify a measure that is not so 
            endorsed as long as due consideration is given to measures 
            that have been endorsed or adopted by a consensus 
            organization identified by the Secretary.
                ``(iii) Time frame.--Not later than October 1, 2012, 
            the Secretary shall publish the measures selected under 
            this subparagraph that will be applicable with respect to 
            rate year 2014.
            ``(E) Public availability of data submitted.--The Secretary 
        shall establish procedures for making data submitted under 
        subparagraph (C) available to the public. Such procedures shall 
        ensure that a long-term care hospital has the opportunity to 
        review the data that is to be made public with respect to the 
        hospital prior to such data being made public. The Secretary 
        shall report quality measures that relate to services furnished 
        in inpatient settings in long-term care hospitals on the 
        Internet website of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid 
        Services.''.
    (b) Inpatient Rehabilitation Hospitals.--Section 1886(j) of the 
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ww(j)) is amended--
        (1) by redesignating paragraph (7) as paragraph (8); and
        (2) by inserting after paragraph (6) the following new 
    paragraph:
        ``(7) Quality reporting.--
            ``(A) Reduction in update for failure to report.--
                ``(i) In general.--For purposes of fiscal year 2014 and 
            each subsequent fiscal year, in the case of a 
            rehabilitation facility that does not submit data to the 
            Secretary in accordance with subparagraph (C) with respect 
            to such a fiscal year, after determining the increase 
            factor described in paragraph (3)(C), and after application 
            of paragraph (3)(D), the Secretary shall reduce such 
            increase factor for payments for discharges occurring 
            during such fiscal year by 2 percentage points.
                ``(ii) Special rule.--The application of this 
            subparagraph may result in the increase factor described in 
            paragraph (3)(C) being less than 0.0 for a fiscal year, and 
            may result in payment rates under this subsection for a 
            fiscal year being less than such payment rates for the 
            preceding fiscal year.
            ``(B) Noncumulative application.--Any reduction under 
        subparagraph (A) shall apply only with respect to the fiscal 
        year involved and the Secretary shall not take into account 
        such reduction in computing the payment amount under this 
        subsection for a subsequent fiscal year.
            ``(C) Submission of quality data.--For fiscal year 2014 and 
        each subsequent rate year, each rehabilitation facility shall 
        submit to the Secretary data on quality measures specified 
        under subparagraph (D). Such data shall be submitted in a form 
        and manner, and at a time, specified by the Secretary for 
        purposes of this subparagraph.
            ``(D) Quality measures.--
                ``(i) In general.--Subject to clause (ii), any measure 
            specified by the Secretary under this subparagraph must 
            have been endorsed by the entity with a contract under 
            section 1890(a).
                ``(ii) Exception.--In the case of a specified area or 
            medical topic determined appropriate by the Secretary for 
            which a feasible and practical measure has not been 
            endorsed by the entity with a contract under section 
            1890(a), the Secretary may specify a measure that is not so 
            endorsed as long as due consideration is given to measures 
            that have been endorsed or adopted by a consensus 
            organization identified by the Secretary.
                ``(iii) Time frame.--Not later than October 1, 2012, 
            the Secretary shall publish the measures selected under 
            this subparagraph that will be applicable with respect to 
            fiscal year 2014.
            ``(E) Public availability of data submitted.--The Secretary 
        shall establish procedures for making data submitted under 
        subparagraph (C) available to the public. Such procedures shall 
        ensure that a rehabilitation facility has the opportunity to 
        review the data that is to be made public with respect to the 
        facility prior to such data being made public. The Secretary 
        shall report quality measures that relate to services furnished 
        in inpatient settings in rehabilitation facilities on the 
        Internet website of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid 
        Services.''.
    (c) Hospice Programs.--Section 1814(i) of the Social Security Act 
(42 U.S.C. 1395f(i)) is amended--
        (1) by redesignating paragraph (5) as paragraph (6); and
        (2) by inserting after paragraph (4) the following new 
    paragraph:
        ``(5) Quality reporting.--
            ``(A) Reduction in update for failure to report.--
                ``(i) In general.--For purposes of fiscal year 2014 and 
            each subsequent fiscal year, in the case of a hospice 
            program that does not submit data to the Secretary in 
            accordance with subparagraph (C) with respect to such a 
            fiscal year, after determining the market basket percentage 
            increase under paragraph (1)(C)(ii)(VII) or paragraph 
            (1)(C)(iii), as applicable, and after application of 
            paragraph (1)(C)(iv), with respect to the fiscal year, the 
            Secretary shall reduce such market basket percentage 
            increase by 2 percentage points.
                ``(ii) Special rule.--The application of this 
            subparagraph may result in the market basket percentage 
            increase under paragraph (1)(C)(ii)(VII) or paragraph 
            (1)(C)(iii), as applicable, being less than 0.0 for a 
            fiscal year, and may result in payment rates under this 
            subsection for a fiscal year being less than such payment 
            rates for the preceding fiscal year.
            ``(B) Noncumulative application.--Any reduction under 
        subparagraph (A) shall apply only with respect to the fiscal 
        year involved and the Secretary shall not take into account 
        such reduction in computing the payment amount under this 
        subsection for a subsequent fiscal year.
            ``(C) Submission of quality data.--For fiscal year 2014 and 
        each subsequent fiscal year, each hospice program shall submit 
        to the Secretary data on quality measures specified under 
        subparagraph (D). Such data shall be submitted in a form and 
        manner, and at a time, specified by the Secretary for purposes 
        of this subparagraph.
            ``(D) Quality measures.--
                ``(i) In general.--Subject to clause (ii), any measure 
            specified by the Secretary under this subparagraph must 
            have been endorsed by the entity with a contract under 
            section 1890(a).
                ``(ii) Exception.--In the case of a specified area or 
            medical topic determined appropriate by the Secretary for 
            which a feasible and practical measure has not been 
            endorsed by the entity with a contract under section 
            1890(a), the Secretary may specify a measure that is not so 
            endorsed as long as due consideration is given to measures 
            that have been endorsed or adopted by a consensus 
            organization identified by the Secretary.
                ``(iii) Time frame.--Not later than October 1, 2012, 
            the Secretary shall publish the measures selected under 
            this subparagraph that will be applicable with respect to 
            fiscal year 2014.
            ``(E) Public availability of data submitted.--The Secretary 
        shall establish procedures for making data submitted under 
        subparagraph (C) available to the public. Such procedures shall 
        ensure that a hospice program has the opportunity to review the 
        data that is to be made public with respect to the hospice 
        program prior to such data being made public. The Secretary 
        shall report quality measures that relate to hospice care 
        provided by hospice programs on the Internet website of the 
        Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services.''.

SEC. 3005. QUALITY REPORTING FOR PPS-EXEMPT CANCER HOSPITALS.

    Section 1866 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395cc) is 
amended--
        (1) in subsection (a)(1)--
            (A) in subparagraph (U), by striking ``and'' at the end;
            (B) in subparagraph (V), by striking the period at the end 
        and inserting ``, and''; and
            (C) by adding at the end the following new subparagraph:
            ``(W) in the case of a hospital described in section 
        1886(d)(1)(B)(v), to report quality data to the Secretary in 
        accordance with subsection (k).''; and
        (2) by adding at the end the following new subsection:
    ``(k) Quality Reporting by Cancer Hospitals.--
        ``(1) In general.--For purposes of fiscal year 2014 and each 
    subsequent fiscal year, a hospital described in section 
    1886(d)(1)(B)(v) shall submit data to the Secretary in accordance 
    with paragraph (2) with respect to such a fiscal year.
        ``(2) Submission of quality data.--For fiscal year 2014 and 
    each subsequent fiscal year, each hospital described in such 
    section shall submit to the Secretary data on quality measures 
    specified under paragraph (3). Such data shall be submitted in a 
    form and manner, and at a time, specified by the Secretary for 
    purposes of this subparagraph.
        ``(3) Quality measures.--
            ``(A) In general.--Subject to subparagraph (B), any measure 
        specified by the Secretary under this paragraph must have been 
        endorsed by the entity with a contract under section 1890(a).
            ``(B) Exception.--In the case of a specified area or 
        medical topic determined appropriate by the Secretary for which 
        a feasible and practical measure has not been endorsed by the 
        entity with a contract under section 1890(a), the Secretary may 
        specify a measure that is not so endorsed as long as due 
        consideration is given to measures that have been endorsed or 
        adopted by a consensus organization identified by the 
        Secretary.
            ``(C) Time frame.--Not later than October 1, 2012, the 
        Secretary shall publish the measures selected under this 
        paragraph that will be applicable with respect to fiscal year 
        2014.
        ``(4) Public availability of data submitted.--The Secretary 
    shall establish procedures for making data submitted under 
    paragraph (4) available to the public. Such procedures shall ensure 
    that a hospital described in section 1886(d)(1)(B)(v) has the 
    opportunity to review the data that is to be made public with 
    respect to the hospital prior to such data being made public. The 
    Secretary shall report quality measures of process, structure, 
    outcome, patients' perspective on care, efficiency, and costs of 
    care that relate to services furnished in such hospitals on the 
    Internet website of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid 
    Services.''.

SEC. 3006. PLANS FOR A VALUE-BASED PURCHASING PROGRAM FOR SKILLED 
              NURSING FACILITIES AND HOME HEALTH AGENCIES.

    (a) Skilled Nursing Facilities.--
        (1) In general.--The Secretary of Health and Human Services (in 
    this section referred to as the ``Secretary'') shall develop a plan 
    to implement a value-based purchasing program for payments under 
    the Medicare program under title XVIII of the Social Security Act 
    for skilled nursing facilities (as defined in section 1819(a) of 
    such Act (42 U.S.C. 1395i-3(a))).
        (2) Details.--In developing the plan under paragraph (1), the 
    Secretary shall consider the following issues:
            (A) The ongoing development, selection, and modification 
        process for measures (including under section 1890 of the 
        Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395aaa) and section 1890A such 
        Act, as added by section 3014), to the extent feasible and 
        practicable, of all dimensions of quality and efficiency in 
        skilled nursing facilities.
                (i) In general.--Subject to clause (ii), any measure 
            specified by the Secretary under subparagraph (A)(iii) must 
            have been endorsed by the entity with a contract under 
            section 1890(a).
                (ii) Exception.--In the case of a specified area or 
            medical topic determined appropriate by the Secretary for 
            which a feasible and practical measure has not been 
            endorsed by the entity with a contract under section 
            1890(a), the Secretary may specify a measure that is not so 
            endorsed as long as due consideration is given to measures 
            that have been endorsed or adopted by a consensus 
            organization identified by the Secretary.
            (B) The reporting, collection, and validation of quality 
        data.
            (C) The structure of value-based payment adjustments, 
        including the determination of thresholds or improvements in 
        quality that would substantiate a payment adjustment, the size 
        of such payments, and the sources of funding for the value-
        based bonus payments.
            (D) Methods for the public disclosure of information on the 
        performance of skilled nursing facilities.
            (E) Any other issues determined appropriate by the 
        Secretary.
        (3) Consultation.--In developing the plan under paragraph (1), 
    the Secretary shall--
            (A) consult with relevant affected parties; and
            (B) consider experience with such demonstrations that the 
        Secretary determines are relevant to the value-based purchasing 
        program described in paragraph (1).
        (4) Report to congress.--Not later than October 1, 2011, the 
    Secretary shall submit to Congress a report containing the plan 
    developed under paragraph (1).
    (b) Home Health Agencies.--
        (1) In general.--The Secretary of Health and Human Services (in 
    this section referred to as the ``Secretary'') shall develop a plan 
    to implement a value-based purchasing program for payments under 
    the Medicare program under title XVIII of the Social Security Act 
    for home health agencies (as defined in section 1861(o) of such Act 
    (42 U.S.C. 1395x(o))).
        (2) Details.--In developing the plan under paragraph (1), the 
    Secretary shall consider the following issues:
            (A) The ongoing development, selection, and modification 
        process for measures (including under section 1890 of the 
        Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395aaa) and section 1890A such 
        Act, as added by section 3014), to the extent feasible and 
        practicable, of all dimensions of quality and efficiency in 
        home health agencies.
            (B) The reporting, collection, and validation of quality 
        data.
            (C) The structure of value-based payment adjustments, 
        including the determination of thresholds or improvements in 
        quality that would substantiate a payment adjustment, the size 
        of such payments, and the sources of funding for the value-
        based bonus payments.
            (D) Methods for the public disclosure of information on the 
        performance of home health agencies.
            (E) Any other issues determined appropriate by the 
        Secretary.
        (3) Consultation.--In developing the plan under paragraph (1), 
    the Secretary shall--
            (A) consult with relevant affected parties; and
            (B) consider experience with such demonstrations that the 
        Secretary determines are relevant to the value-based purchasing 
        program described in paragraph (1).
        (4) Report to congress.--Not later than October 1, 2011, the 
    Secretary shall submit to Congress a report containing the plan 
    developed under paragraph (1).

SEC. 3007. VALUE-BASED PAYMENT MODIFIER UNDER THE PHYSICIAN FEE 
              SCHEDULE.

    Section 1848 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-4) is 
amended--
        (1) in subsection (b)(1), by inserting ``subject to subsection 
    (p),'' after ``1998,''; and
        (2) by adding at the end the following new subsection:
    ``(p) Establishment of Value-based Payment Modifier.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Secretary shall establish a payment 
    modifier that provides for differential payment to a physician or a 
    group of physicians under the fee schedule established under 
    subsection (b) based upon the quality of care furnished compared to 
    cost (as determined under paragraphs (2) and (3), respectively) 
    during a performance period. Such payment modifier shall be 
    separate from the geographic adjustment factors established under 
    subsection (e).
        ``(2) Quality.--
            ``(A) In general.--For purposes of paragraph (1), quality 
        of care shall be evaluated, to the extent practicable, based on 
        a composite of measures of the quality of care furnished (as 
        established by the Secretary under subparagraph (B)).
            ``(B) Measures.--
                ``(i) The Secretary shall establish appropriate 
            measures of the quality of care furnished by a physician or 
            group of physicians to individuals enrolled under this 
            part, such as measures that reflect health outcomes. Such 
            measures shall be risk adjusted as determined appropriate 
            by the Secretary.
                ``(ii) The Secretary shall seek endorsement of the 
            measures established under this subparagraph by the entity 
            with a contract under section 1890(a).
        ``(3) Costs.--For purposes of paragraph (1), costs shall be 
    evaluated, to the extent practicable, based on a composite of 
    appropriate measures of costs established by the Secretary (such as 
    the composite measure under the methodology established under 
    subsection (n)(9)(C)(iii)) that eliminate the effect of geographic 
    adjustments in payment rates (as described in subsection (e)), and 
    take into account risk factors (such as socioeconomic and 
    demographic characteristics, ethnicity, and health status of 
    individuals (such as to recognize that less healthy individuals may 
    require more intensive interventions) and other factors determined 
    appropriate by the Secretary.
        ``(4) Implementation.--
            ``(A) Publication of measures, dates of implementation, 
        performance period.--Not later than January 1, 2012, the 
        Secretary shall publish the following:
                ``(i) The measures of quality of care and costs 
            established under paragraphs (2) and (3), respectively.
                ``(ii) The dates for implementation of the payment 
            modifier (as determined under subparagraph (B)).
                ``(iii) The initial performance period (as specified 
            under subparagraph (B)(ii)).
            ``(B) Deadlines for implementation.--
                ``(i) Initial implementation.--Subject to the preceding 
            provisions of this subparagraph, the Secretary shall begin 
            implementing the payment modifier established under this 
            subsection through the rulemaking process during 2013 for 
            the physician fee schedule established under subsection 
            (b).
                ``(ii) Initial performance period.--

                    ``(I) In general.--The Secretary shall specify an 
                initial performance period for application of the 
                payment modifier established under this subsection with 
                respect to 2015.
                    ``(II) Provision of information during initial 
                performance period.--During the initial performance 
                period, the Secretary shall, to the extent practicable, 
                provide information to physicians and groups of 
                physicians about the quality of care furnished by the 
                physician or group of physicians to individuals 
                enrolled under this part compared to cost (as 
                determined under paragraphs (2) and (3), respectively) 
                with respect to the performance period.

                ``(iii) Application.--The Secretary shall apply the 
            payment modifier established under this subsection for 
            items and services furnished--

                    ``(I) beginning on January 1, 2015, with respect to 
                specific physicians and groups of physicians the 
                Secretary determines appropriate; and
                    ``(II) beginning not later than January 1, 2017, 
                with respect to all physicians and groups of 
                physicians.

            ``(C) Budget neutrality.--The payment modifier established 
        under this subsection shall be implemented in a budget neutral 
        manner.
        ``(5) Systems-based care.--The Secretary shall, as appropriate, 
    apply the payment modifier established under this subsection in a 
    manner that promotes systems-based care.
        ``(6) Consideration of special circumstances of certain 
    providers.--In applying the payment modifier under this subsection, 
    the Secretary shall, as appropriate, take into account the special 
    circumstances of physicians or groups of physicians in rural areas 
    and other underserved communities.
        ``(7) Application.--For purposes of the initial application of 
    the payment modifier established under this subsection during the 
    period beginning on January 1, 2015, and ending on December 31, 
    2016, the term `physician' has the meaning given such term in 
    section 1861(r). On or after January 1, 2017, the Secretary may 
    apply this subsection to eligible professionals (as defined in 
    subsection (k)(3)(B)) as the Secretary determines appropriate.
        ``(8) Definitions.--For purposes of this subsection:
            ``(A) Costs.--The term `costs' means expenditures per 
        individual as determined appropriate by the Secretary. In 
        making the determination under the preceding sentence, the 
        Secretary may take into account the amount of growth in 
        expenditures per individual for a physician compared to the 
        amount of such growth for other physicians.
            ``(B) Performance period.--The term `performance period' 
        means a period specified by the Secretary.
        ``(9) Coordination with other value-based purchasing reforms.--
    The Secretary shall coordinate the value-based payment modifier 
    established under this subsection with the Physician Feedback 
    Program under subsection (n) and, as the Secretary determines 
    appropriate, other similar provisions of this title.
        ``(10) Limitations on review.--There shall be no administrative 
    or judicial review under section 1869, section 1878, or otherwise 
    of--
            ``(A) the establishment of the value-based payment modifier 
        under this subsection;
            ``(B) the evaluation of quality of care under paragraph 
        (2), including the establishment of appropriate measures of the 
        quality of care under paragraph (2)(B);
            ``(C) the evaluation of costs under paragraph (3), 
        including the establishment of appropriate measures of costs 
        under such paragraph;
            ``(D) the dates for implementation of the value-based 
        payment modifier;
            ``(E) the specification of the initial performance period 
        and any other performance period under paragraphs (4)(B)(ii) 
        and (8)(B), respectively;
            ``(F) the application of the value-based payment modifier 
        under paragraph (7); and
            ``(G) the determination of costs under paragraph (8)(A).''.

SEC. 3008. PAYMENT ADJUSTMENT FOR CONDITIONS ACQUIRED IN HOSPITALS.

    (a) In General.--Section 1886 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395ww), as amended by section 3001, is amended by adding at the end 
the following new subsection:
    ``(p) Adjustment to Hospital Payments for Hospital Acquired 
Conditions.--
        ``(1) In general.--In order to provide an incentive for 
    applicable hospitals to reduce hospital acquired conditions under 
    this title, with respect to discharges from an applicable hospital 
    occurring during fiscal year 2015 or a subsequent fiscal year, the 
    amount of payment under this section or section 1814(b)(3), as 
    applicable, for such discharges during the fiscal year shall be 
    equal to 99 percent of the amount of payment that would otherwise 
    apply to such discharges under this section or section 1814(b)(3) 
    (determined after the application of subsections (o) and (q) and 
    section 1814(l)(4) but without regard to this subsection).
        ``(2) Applicable hospitals.--
            ``(A) In general.--For purposes of this subsection, the 
        term `applicable hospital' means a subsection (d) hospital that 
        meets the criteria described in subparagraph (B).
            ``(B) Criteria described.--
                ``(i) In general.--The criteria described in this 
            subparagraph, with respect to a subsection (d) hospital, is 
            that the subsection (d) hospital is in the top quartile of 
            all subsection (d) hospitals, relative to the national 
            average, of hospital acquired conditions during the 
            applicable period, as determined by the Secretary.
                ``(ii) Risk adjustment.--In carrying out clause (i), 
            the Secretary shall establish and apply an appropriate risk 
            adjustment methodology.
            ``(C) Exemption.--In the case of a hospital that is paid 
        under section 1814(b)(3), the Secretary may exempt such 
        hospital from the application of this subsection if the State 
        which is paid under such section submits an annual report to 
        the Secretary describing how a similar program in the State for 
        a participating hospital or hospitals achieves or surpasses the 
        measured results in terms of patient health outcomes and cost 
        savings established under this subsection.
        ``(3) Hospital acquired conditions.--For purposes of this 
    subsection, the term `hospital acquired condition' means a 
    condition identified for purposes of subsection (d)(4)(D)(iv) and 
    any other condition determined appropriate by the Secretary that an 
    individual acquires during a stay in an applicable hospital, as 
    determined by the Secretary.
        ``(4) Applicable period.--In this subsection, the term 
    `applicable period' means, with respect to a fiscal year, a period 
    specified by the Secretary.
        ``(5) Reporting to hospitals.--Prior to fiscal year 2015 and 
    each subsequent fiscal year, the Secretary shall provide 
    confidential reports to applicable hospitals with respect to 
    hospital acquired conditions of the applicable hospital during the 
    applicable period.
        ``(6) Reporting hospital specific information.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Secretary shall make information 
        available to the public regarding hospital acquired conditions 
        of each applicable hospital.
            ``(B) Opportunity to review and submit corrections.--The 
        Secretary shall ensure that an applicable hospital has the 
        opportunity to review, and submit corrections for, the 
        information to be made public with respect to the hospital 
        under subparagraph (A) prior to such information being made 
        public.
            ``(C) Website.--Such information shall be posted on the 
        Hospital Compare Internet website in an easily understandable 
        format.
        ``(7) Limitations on review.--There shall be no administrative 
    or judicial review under section 1869, section 1878, or otherwise 
    of the following:
            ``(A) The criteria described in paragraph (2)(A).
            ``(B) The specification of hospital acquired conditions 
        under paragraph (3).
            ``(C) The specification of the applicable period under 
        paragraph (4).
            ``(D) The provision of reports to applicable hospitals 
        under paragraph (5) and the information made available to the 
        public under paragraph (6).''.
    (b) Study and Report on Expansion of Healthcare Acquired Conditions 
Policy to Other Providers.--
        (1) Study.--The Secretary of Health and Human Services shall 
    conduct a study on expanding the healthcare acquired conditions 
    policy under subsection (d)(4)(D) of section 1886 of the Social 
    Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ww) to payments made to other 
    facilities under the Medicare program under title XVIII of the 
    Social Security Act, including such payments made to inpatient 
    rehabilitation facilities, long-term care hospitals (as described 
    in subsection(d)(1)(B)(iv) of such section), hospital outpatient 
    departments, and other hospitals excluded from the inpatient 
    prospective payment system under such section, skilled nursing 
    facilities, ambulatory surgical centers, and health clinics. Such 
    study shall include an analysis of how such policies could impact 
    quality of patient care, patient safety, and spending under the 
    Medicare program.
        (2) Report.--Not later than January 1, 2012, the Secretary 
    shall submit to Congress a report containing the results of the 
    study conducted under paragraph (1), together with recommendations 
    for such legislation and administrative action as the Secretary 
    determines appropriate.

       PART II--NATIONAL STRATEGY TO IMPROVE HEALTH CARE QUALITY

SEC. 3011. NATIONAL STRATEGY.

    Title III of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 241 et seq.) 
is amended by adding at the end the following:

                 ``PART S--HEALTH CARE QUALITY PROGRAMS

 ``Subpart I--National Strategy for Quality Improvement in Health Care

``SEC. 399HH. NATIONAL STRATEGY FOR QUALITY IMPROVEMENT IN HEALTH CARE.

    ``(a) Establishment of National Strategy and Priorities.--
        ``(1) National strategy.--The Secretary, through a transparent 
    collaborative process, shall establish a national strategy to 
    improve the delivery of health care services, patient health 
    outcomes, and population health.
        ``(2) Identification of priorities.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Secretary shall identify national 
        priorities for improvement in developing the strategy under 
        paragraph (1).
            ``(B) Requirements.--The Secretary shall ensure that 
        priorities identified under subparagraph (A) will--
                ``(i) have the greatest potential for improving the 
            health outcomes, efficiency, and patient-centeredness of 
            health care for all populations, including children and 
            vulnerable populations;
                ``(ii) identify areas in the delivery of health care 
            services that have the potential for rapid improvement in 
            the quality and efficiency of patient care;
                ``(iii) address gaps in quality, efficiency, 
            comparative effectiveness information, and health outcomes 
            measures and data aggregation techniques;
                ``(iv) improve Federal payment policy to emphasize 
            quality and efficiency;
                ``(v) enhance the use of health care data to improve 
            quality, efficiency, transparency, and outcomes;
                ``(vi) address the health care provided to patients 
            with high-cost chronic diseases;
                ``(vii) improve research and dissemination of 
            strategies and best practices to improve patient safety and 
            reduce medical errors, preventable admissions and 
            readmissions, and health care-associated infections;
                ``(viii) reduce health disparities across health 
            disparity populations (as defined in section 485E) and 
            geographic areas; and
                ``(ix) address other areas as determined appropriate by 
            the Secretary.
            ``(C) Considerations.--In identifying priorities under 
        subparagraph (A), the Secretary shall take into consideration 
        the recommendations submitted by the entity with a contract 
        under section 1890(a) of the Social Security Act and other 
        stakeholders.
            ``(D) Coordination with state agencies.--The Secretary 
        shall collaborate, coordinate, and consult with State agencies 
        responsible for administering the Medicaid program under title 
        XIX of the Social Security Act and the Children's Health 
        Insurance Program under title XXI of such Act with respect to 
        developing and disseminating strategies, goals, models, and 
        timetables that are consistent with the national priorities 
        identified under subparagraph (A).
    ``(b) Strategic Plan.--
        ``(1) In general.--The national strategy shall include a 
    comprehensive strategic plan to achieve the priorities described in 
    subsection (a).
        ``(2) Requirements.--The strategic plan shall include 
    provisions for addressing, at a minimum, the following:
            ``(A) Coordination among agencies within the Department, 
        which shall include steps to minimize duplication of efforts 
        and utilization of common quality measures, where available. 
        Such common quality measures shall be measures identified by 
        the Secretary under section 1139A or 1139B of the Social 
        Security Act or endorsed under section 1890 of such Act.
            ``(B) Agency-specific strategic plans to achieve national 
        priorities.
            ``(C) Establishment of annual benchmarks for each relevant 
        agency to achieve national priorities.
            ``(D) A process for regular reporting by the agencies to 
        the Secretary on the implementation of the strategic plan.
            ``(E) Strategies to align public and private payers with 
        regard to quality and patient safety efforts.
            ``(F) Incorporating quality improvement and measurement in 
        the strategic plan for health information technology required 
        by the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public 
        Law 111-5).
    ``(c) Periodic Update of National Strategy.--The Secretary shall 
update the national strategy not less than annually. Any such update 
shall include a review of short- and long-term goals.
    ``(d) Submission and Availability of National Strategy and 
Updates.--
        ``(1) Deadline for initial submission of national strategy.--
    Not later than January 1, 2011, the Secretary shall submit to the 
    relevant committees of Congress the national strategy described in 
    subsection (a).
        ``(2) Updates.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Secretary shall submit to the 
        relevant committees of Congress an annual update to the 
        strategy described in paragraph (1).
            ``(B) Information submitted.--Each update submitted under 
        subparagraph (A) shall include--
                ``(i) a review of the short- and long-term goals of the 
            national strategy and any gaps in such strategy;
                ``(ii) an analysis of the progress, or lack of 
            progress, in meeting such goals and any barriers to such 
            progress;
                ``(iii) the information reported under section 1139A of 
            the Social Security Act, consistent with the reporting 
            requirements of such section; and
                ``(iv) in the case of an update required to be 
            submitted on or after January 1, 2014, the information 
            reported under section 1139B(b)(4) of the Social Security 
            Act, consistent with the reporting requirements of such 
            section.
            ``(C) Satisfaction of other reporting requirements.--
        Compliance with the requirements of clauses (iii) and (iv) of 
        subparagraph (B) shall satisfy the reporting requirements under 
        sections 1139A(a)(6) and 1139B(b)(4), respectively, of the 
        Social Security Act.
    ``(e) Health Care Quality Internet Website.--Not later than January 
1, 2011, the Secretary shall create an Internet website to make public 
information regarding--
        ``(1) the national priorities for health care quality 
    improvement established under subsection (a)(2);
        ``(2) the agency-specific strategic plans for health care 
    quality described in subsection (b)(2)(B); and
        ``(3) other information, as the Secretary determines to be 
    appropriate.''.

SEC. 3012. INTERAGENCY WORKING GROUP ON HEALTH CARE QUALITY.

    (a) In General.--The President shall convene a working group to be 
known as the Interagency Working Group on Health Care Quality (referred 
to in this section as the ``Working Group'').
    (b) Goals.--The goals of the Working Group shall be to achieve the 
following:
        (1) Collaboration, cooperation, and consultation between 
    Federal departments and agencies with respect to developing and 
    disseminating strategies, goals, models, and timetables that are 
    consistent with the national priorities identified under section 
    399HH(a)(2) of the Public Health Service Act (as added by section 
    3011).
        (2) Avoidance of inefficient duplication of quality improvement 
    efforts and resources, where practicable, and a streamlined process 
    for quality reporting and compliance requirements.
        (3) Assess alignment of quality efforts in the public sector 
    with private sector initiatives.
    (c) Composition.--
        (1) In general.--The Working Group shall be composed of senior 
    level representatives of--
            (A) the Department of Health and Human Services;
            (B) the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services;
            (C) the National Institutes of Health;
            (D) the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention;
            (E) the Food and Drug Administration;
            (F) the Health Resources and Services Administration;
            (G) the Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality;
            (H) the Office of the National Coordinator for Health 
        Information Technology;
            (I) the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services 
        Administration;
            (J) the Administration for Children and Families;
            (K) the Department of Commerce;
            (L) the Office of Management and Budget;
            (M) the United States Coast Guard;
            (N) the Federal Bureau of Prisons;
            (O) the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration;
            (P) the Federal Trade Commission;
            (Q) the Social Security Administration;
            (R) the Department of Labor;
            (S) the United States Office of Personnel Management;
            (T) the Department of Defense;
            (U) the Department of Education;
            (V) the Department of Veterans Affairs;
            (W) the Veterans Health Administration; and
            (X) any other Federal agencies and departments with 
        activities relating to improving health care quality and 
        safety, as determined by the President.
        (2) Chair and vice-chair.--
            (A) Chair.--The Working Group shall be chaired by the 
        Secretary of Health and Human Services.
            (B) Vice chair.--Members of the Working Group, other than 
        the Secretary of Health and Human Services, shall serve as Vice 
        Chair of the Group on a rotating basis, as determined by the 
        Group.
    (d) Report to Congress.--Not later than December 31, 2010, and 
annually thereafter, the Working Group shall submit to the relevant 
Committees of Congress, and make public on an Internet website, a 
report describing the progress and recommendations of the Working Group 
in meeting the goals described in subsection (b).

SEC. 3013. QUALITY MEASURE DEVELOPMENT.

    (a) Public Health Service Act.--Title IX of the Public Health 
Service Act (42 U.S.C. 299 et seq.) is amended--
        (1) by redesignating part D as part E;
        (2) by redesignating sections 931 through 938 as sections 941 
    through 948, respectively;
        (3) in section 948(1), as so redesignated, by striking ``931'' 
    and inserting ``941''; and
        (4) by inserting after section 926 the following:

               ``PART D--HEALTH CARE QUALITY IMPROVEMENT

                ``Subpart I--Quality Measure Development

``SEC. 931. QUALITY MEASURE DEVELOPMENT.

    ``(a) Quality Measure.--In this subpart, the term `quality measure' 
means a standard for measuring the performance and improvement of 
population health or of health plans, providers of services, and other 
clinicians in the delivery of health care services.
    ``(b) Identification of Quality Measures.--
        ``(1) Identification.--The Secretary, in consultation with the 
    Director of the Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality and the 
    Administrator of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services, 
    shall identify, not less often than triennially, gaps where no 
    quality measures exist and existing quality measures that need 
    improvement, updating, or expansion, consistent with the national 
    strategy under section 399HH, to the extent available, for use in 
    Federal health programs. In identifying such gaps and existing 
    quality measures that need improvement, the Secretary shall take 
    into consideration--
            ``(A) the gaps identified by the entity with a contract 
        under section 1890(a) of the Social Security Act and other 
        stakeholders;
            ``(B) quality measures identified by the pediatric quality 
        measures program under section 1139A of the Social Security 
        Act; and
            ``(C) quality measures identified through the Medicaid 
        Quality Measurement Program under section 1139B of the Social 
        Security Act.
        ``(2) Publication.--The Secretary shall make available to the 
    public on an Internet website a report on any gaps identified under 
    paragraph (1) and the process used to make such identification.
    ``(c) Grants or Contracts for Quality Measure Development.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Secretary shall award grants, contracts, 
    or intergovernmental agreements to eligible entities for purposes 
    of developing, improving, updating, or expanding quality measures 
    identified under subsection (b).
        ``(2) Prioritization in the development of quality measures.--
    In awarding grants, contracts, or agreements under this subsection, 
    the Secretary shall give priority to the development of quality 
    measures that allow the assessment of--
            ``(A) health outcomes and functional status of patients;
            ``(B) the management and coordination of health care across 
        episodes of care and care transitions for patients across the 
        continuum of providers, health care settings, and health plans;
            ``(C) the experience, quality, and use of information 
        provided to and used by patients, caregivers, and authorized 
        representatives to inform decisionmaking about treatment 
        options, including the use of shared decisionmaking tools and 
        preference sensitive care (as defined in section 936);
            ``(D) the meaningful use of health information technology;
            ``(E) the safety, effectiveness, patient-centeredness, 
        appropriateness, and timeliness of care;
            ``(F) the efficiency of care;
            ``(G) the equity of health services and health disparities 
        across health disparity populations (as defined in section 
        485E) and geographic areas;
            ``(H) patient experience and satisfaction;
            ``(I) the use of innovative strategies and methodologies 
        identified under section 933; and
            ``(J) other areas determined appropriate by the Secretary.
        ``(3) Eligible entities.--To be eligible for a grant or 
    contract under this subsection, an entity shall--
            ``(A) have demonstrated expertise and capacity in the 
        development and evaluation of quality measures;
            ``(B) have adopted procedures to include in the quality 
        measure development process--
                ``(i) the views of those providers or payers whose 
            performance will be assessed by the measure; and
                ``(ii) the views of other parties who also will use the 
            quality measures (such as patients, consumers, and health 
            care purchasers);
            ``(C) collaborate with the entity with a contract under 
        section 1890(a) of the Social Security Act and other 
        stakeholders, as practicable, and the Secretary so that quality 
        measures developed by the eligible entity will meet the 
        requirements to be considered for endorsement by the entity 
        with a contract under such section 1890(a);
            ``(D) have transparent policies regarding governance and 
        conflicts of interest; and
            ``(E) submit an application to the Secretary at such time 
        and in such manner, as the Secretary may require.
        ``(4) Use of funds.--An entity that receives a grant, contract, 
    or agreement under this subsection shall use such award to develop 
    quality measures that meet the following requirements:
            ``(A) Such measures support measures required to be 
        reported under the Social Security Act, where applicable, and 
        in support of gaps and existing quality measures that need 
        improvement, as described in subsection (b)(1)(A).
            ``(B) Such measures support measures developed under 
        section 1139A of the Social Security Act and the Medicaid 
        Quality Measurement Program under section 1139B of such Act, 
        where applicable.
            ``(C) To the extent practicable, data on such quality 
        measures is able to be collected using health information 
        technologies.
            ``(D) Each quality measure is free of charge to users of 
        such measure.
            ``(E) Each quality measure is publicly available on an 
        Internet website.
    ``(d) Other Activities by the Secretary.--The Secretary may use 
amounts available under this section to update and test, where 
applicable, quality measures endorsed by the entity with a contract 
under section 1890(a) of the Social Security Act or adopted by the 
Secretary.
    ``(e) Coordination of Grants.--The Secretary shall ensure that 
grants or contracts awarded under this section are coordinated with 
grants and contracts awarded under sections 1139A(5) and 1139B(4)(A) of 
the Social Security Act.''.
    (b) Social Security Act.--Section 1890A of the Social Security Act, 
as added by section 3014(b), is amended by adding at the end the 
following new subsection:
    ``(e) Development of Quality Measures.--The Administrator of the 
Center for Medicare & Medicaid Services shall through contracts develop 
quality measures (as determined appropriate by the Administrator) for 
use under this Act. In developing such measures, the Administrator 
shall consult with the Director of the Agency for Healthcare Research 
and Quality.''.
    (c) Funding.--There are authorized to be appropriated to the 
Secretary of Health and Human Services to carry out this section, 
$75,000,000 for each of fiscal years 2010 through 2014. Of the amounts 
appropriated under the preceding sentence in a fiscal year, not less 
than 50 percent of such amounts shall be used pursuant to subsection 
(e) of section 1890A of the Social Security Act, as added by subsection 
(b), with respect to programs under such Act. Amounts appropriated 
under this subsection for a fiscal year shall remain available until 
expended.

SEC. 3014. QUALITY MEASUREMENT.

    (a) New Duties for Consensus-based Entity.--
        (1) Multi-stakeholder group input.--Section 1890(b) of the 
    Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395aaa(b)), as amended by section 
    3003, is amended by adding at the end the following new paragraphs:
        ``(7) Convening multi-stakeholder groups.--
            ``(A) In general.--The entity shall convene multi-
        stakeholder groups to provide input on--
                ``(i) the selection of quality measures described in 
            subparagraph (B), from among--

                    ``(I) such measures that have been endorsed by the 
                entity; and
                    ``(II) such measures that have not been considered 
                for endorsement by such entity but are used or proposed 
                to be used by the Secretary for the collection or 
                reporting of quality measures; and

                ``(ii) national priorities (as identified under section 
            399HH of the Public Health Service Act) for improvement in 
            population health and in the delivery of health care 
            services for consideration under the national strategy 
            established under section 399HH of the Public Health 
            Service Act.
            ``(B) Quality measures.--
                ``(i) In general.--Subject to clause (ii), the quality 
            measures described in this subparagraph are quality 
            measures--

                    ``(I) for use pursuant to sections 1814(i)(5)(D), 
                1833(i)(7), 1833(t)(17), 1848(k)(2)(C), 1866(k)(3), 
                1881(h)(2)(A)(iii), 1886(b)(3)(B)(viii), 1886(j)(7)(D), 
                1886(m)(5)(D), 1886(o)(2), and 1895(b)(3)(B)(v);
                    ``(II) for use in reporting performance information 
                to the public; and
                    ``(III) for use in health care programs other than 
                for use under this Act.

                ``(ii) Exclusion.--Data sets (such as the outcome and 
            assessment information set for home health services and the 
            minimum data set for skilled nursing facility services) 
            that are used for purposes of classification systems used 
            in establishing payment rates under this title shall not be 
            quality measures described in this subparagraph.
            ``(C) Requirement for transparency in process.--
                ``(i) In general.--In convening multi-stakeholder 
            groups under subparagraph (A) with respect to the selection 
            of quality measures, the entity shall provide for an open 
            and transparent process for the activities conducted 
            pursuant to such convening.
                ``(ii) Selection of organizations participating in 
            multi-stakeholder groups.--The process described in clause 
            (i) shall ensure that the selection of representatives 
            comprising such groups provides for public nominations for, 
            and the opportunity for public comment on, such selection.
            ``(D) Multi-stakeholder group defined.--In this paragraph, 
        the term `multi-stakeholder group' means, with respect to a 
        quality measure, a voluntary collaborative of organizations 
        representing a broad group of stakeholders interested in or 
        affected by the use of such quality measure.
        ``(8) Transmission of multi-stakeholder input.--Not later than 
    February 1 of each year (beginning with 2012), the entity shall 
    transmit to the Secretary the input of multi-stakeholder groups 
    provided under paragraph (7).''.
        (2) Annual report.--Section 1890(b)(5)(A) of the Social 
    Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395aaa(b)(5)(A)) is amended--
            (A) in clause (ii), by striking ``and'' at the end;
            (B) in clause (iii), by striking the period at the end and 
        inserting a semicolon; and
            (C) by adding at the end the following new clauses:
                ``(iv) gaps in endorsed quality measures, which shall 
            include measures that are within priority areas identified 
            by the Secretary under the national strategy established 
            under section 399HH of the Public Health Service Act, and 
            where quality measures are unavailable or inadequate to 
            identify or address such gaps;
                ``(v) areas in which evidence is insufficient to 
            support endorsement of quality measures in priority areas 
            identified by the Secretary under the national strategy 
            established under section 399HH of the Public Health 
            Service Act and where targeted research may address such 
            gaps; and
                ``(vi) the matters described in clauses (i) and (ii) of 
            paragraph (7)(A).''.
    (b) Multi-stakeholder Group Input Into Selection of Quality 
Measures.--Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395 et 
seq.) is amended by inserting after section 1890 the following:


                          ``quality measurement

    ``Sec. 1890A.  (a) Multi-stakeholder Group Input Into Selection of 
Quality Measures.--The Secretary shall establish a pre-rulemaking 
process under which the following steps occur with respect to the 
selection of quality measures described in section 1890(b)(7)(B):
        ``(1) Input.--Pursuant to section 1890(b)(7), the entity with a 
    contract under section 1890 shall convene multi-stakeholder groups 
    to provide input to the Secretary on the selection of quality 
    measures described in subparagraph (B) of such paragraph.
        ``(2) Public availability of measures considered for 
    selection.--Not later than December 1 of each year (beginning with 
    2011), the Secretary shall make available to the public a list of 
    quality measures described in section 1890(b)(7)(B) that the 
    Secretary is considering under this title.
        ``(3) Transmission of multi-stakeholder input.--Pursuant to 
    section 1890(b)(8), not later than February 1 of each year 
    (beginning with 2012), the entity shall transmit to the Secretary 
    the input of multi-stakeholder groups described in paragraph (1).
        ``(4) Consideration of multi-stakeholder input.--The Secretary 
    shall take into consideration the input from multi-stakeholder 
    groups described in paragraph (1) in selecting quality measures 
    described in section 1890(b)(7)(B) that have been endorsed by the 
    entity with a contract under section 1890 and measures that have 
    not been endorsed by such entity.
        ``(5) Rationale for use of quality measures.--The Secretary 
    shall publish in the Federal Register the rationale for the use of 
    any quality measure described in section 1890(b)(7)(B) that has not 
    been endorsed by the entity with a contract under section 1890.
        ``(6) Assessment of impact.--Not later than March 1, 2012, and 
    at least once every three years thereafter, the Secretary shall--
            ``(A) conduct an assessment of the quality impact of the 
        use of endorsed measures described in section 1890(b)(7)(B); 
        and
            ``(B) make such assessment available to the public.
    ``(b) Process for Dissemination of Measures Used by the 
Secretary.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Secretary shall establish a process for 
    disseminating quality measures used by the Secretary. Such process 
    shall include the following:
            ``(A) The incorporation of such measures, where applicable, 
        in workforce programs, training curricula, and any other means 
        of dissemination determined appropriate by the Secretary.
            ``(B) The dissemination of such quality measures through 
        the national strategy developed under section 399HH of the 
        Public Health Service Act.
        ``(2) Existing methods.--To the extent practicable, the 
    Secretary shall utilize and expand existing dissemination methods 
    in disseminating quality measures under the process established 
    under paragraph (1).
    ``(c) Review of Quality Measures Used by the Secretary.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Secretary shall--
            ``(A) periodically (but in no case less often than once 
        every 3 years) review quality measures described in section 
        1890(b)(7)(B); and
            ``(B) with respect to each such measure, determine whether 
        to--
                ``(i) maintain the use of such measure; or
                ``(ii) phase out such measure.
        ``(2) Considerations.--In conducting the review under paragraph 
    (1), the Secretary shall take steps to--
            ``(A) seek to avoid duplication of measures used; and
            ``(B) take into consideration current innovative 
        methodologies and strategies for quality improvement practices 
        in the delivery of health care services that represent best 
        practices for such quality improvement and measures endorsed by 
        the entity with a contract under section 1890 since the 
        previous review by the Secretary.
    ``(d) Rule of Construction.--Nothing in this section shall preclude 
a State from using the quality measures identified under sections 1139A 
and 1139B.''.
    (c) Funding.--For purposes of carrying out the amendments made by 
this section, the Secretary shall provide for the transfer, from the 
Federal Hospital Insurance Trust Fund under section 1817 of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395i) and the Federal Supplementary Medical 
Insurance Trust Fund under section 1841 of such Act (42 U.S.C. 1395t), 
in such proportion as the Secretary determines appropriate, of 
$20,000,000, to the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services Program 
Management Account for each of fiscal years 2010 through 2014. Amounts 
transferred under the preceding sentence shall remain available until 
expended.

SEC. 3015. DATA COLLECTION; PUBLIC REPORTING.

    Title III of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 241 et seq.), 
as amended by section 3011, is further amended by adding at the end the 
following:

``SEC. 399II. COLLECTION AND ANALYSIS OF DATA FOR QUALITY AND RESOURCE 
              USE MEASURES.

    ``(a) In General.--The Secretary shall collect and aggregate 
consistent data on quality and resource use measures from information 
systems used to support health care delivery to implement the public 
reporting of performance information, as described in section 399JJ, 
and may award grants or contracts for this purpose. The Secretary shall 
ensure that such collection, aggregation, and analysis systems span an 
increasingly broad range of patient populations, providers, and 
geographic areas over time.
    ``(b) Grants or Contracts for Data Collection.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Secretary may award grants or contracts 
    to eligible entities to support new, or improve existing, efforts 
    to collect and aggregate quality and resource use measures 
    described under subsection (c).
        ``(2) Eligible entities.--To be eligible for a grant or 
    contract under this subsection, an entity shall--
            ``(A) be--
                ``(i) a multi-stakeholder entity that coordinates the 
            development of methods and implementation plans for the 
            consistent reporting of summary quality and cost 
            information;
                ``(ii) an entity capable of submitting such summary 
            data for a particular population and providers, such as a 
            disease registry, regional collaboration, health plan 
            collaboration, or other population-wide source; or
                ``(iii) a Federal Indian Health Service program or a 
            health program operated by an Indian tribe (as defined in 
            section 4 of the Indian Health Care Improvement Act);
            ``(B) promote the use of the systems that provide data to 
        improve and coordinate patient care;
            ``(C) support the provision of timely, consistent quality 
        and resource use information to health care providers, and 
        other groups and organizations as appropriate, with an 
        opportunity for providers to correct inaccurate measures; and
            ``(D) agree to report, as determined by the Secretary, 
        measures on quality and resource use to the public in 
        accordance with the public reporting process established under 
        section 399JJ.
    ``(c) Consistent Data Aggregation.--The Secretary may award grants 
or contracts under this section only to entities that enable summary 
data that can be integrated and compared across multiple sources. The 
Secretary shall provide standards for the protection of the security 
and privacy of patient data.
    ``(d) Matching Funds.--The Secretary may not award a grant or 
contract under this section to an entity unless the entity agrees that 
it will make available (directly or through contributions from other 
public or private entities) non-Federal contributions toward the 
activities to be carried out under the grant or contract in an amount 
equal to $1 for each $5 of Federal funds provided under the grant or 
contract. Such non-Federal matching funds may be provided directly or 
through donations from public or private entities and may be in cash or 
in-kind, fairly evaluated, including plant, equipment, or services.
    ``(e) Authorization of Appropriations.--To carry out this section, 
there are authorized to be appropriated such sums as may be necessary 
for fiscal years 2010 through 2014.

``SEC. 399JJ. PUBLIC REPORTING OF PERFORMANCE INFORMATION.

    ``(a) Development of Performance Websites.--The Secretary shall 
make available to the public, through standardized Internet websites, 
performance information summarizing data on quality measures. Such 
information shall be tailored to respond to the differing needs of 
hospitals and other institutional health care providers, physicians and 
other clinicians, patients, consumers, researchers, policymakers, 
States, and other stakeholders, as the Secretary may specify.
    ``(b) Information on Conditions.--The performance information made 
publicly available on an Internet website, as described in subsection 
(a), shall include information regarding clinical conditions to the 
extent such information is available, and the information shall, where 
appropriate, be provider-specific and sufficiently disaggregated and 
specific to meet the needs of patients with different clinical 
conditions.
    ``(c) Consultation.--
        ``(1) In general.--In carrying out this section, the Secretary 
    shall consult with the entity with a contract under section 1890(a) 
    of the Social Security Act, and other entities, as appropriate, to 
    determine the type of information that is useful to stakeholders 
    and the format that best facilitates use of the reports and of 
    performance reporting Internet websites.
        ``(2) Consultation with stakeholders.--The entity with a 
    contract under section 1890(a) of the Social Security Act shall 
    convene multi-stakeholder groups, as described in such section, to 
    review the design and format of each Internet website made 
    available under subsection (a) and shall transmit to the Secretary 
    the views of such multi-stakeholder groups with respect to each 
    such design and format.
    ``(d) Coordination.--Where appropriate, the Secretary shall 
coordinate the manner in which data are presented through Internet 
websites described in subsection (a) and for public reporting of other 
quality measures by the Secretary, including such quality measures 
under title XVIII of the Social Security Act.
    ``(e) Authorization of Appropriations.--To carry out this section, 
there are authorized to be appropriated such sums as may be necessary 
for fiscal years 2010 through 2014.''.

      PART III--ENCOURAGING DEVELOPMENT OF NEW PATIENT CARE MODELS

SEC. 3021. ESTABLISHMENT OF CENTER FOR MEDICARE AND MEDICAID INNOVATION 
              WITHIN CMS.

    (a) In General.--Title XI of the Social Security Act is amended by 
inserting after section 1115 the following new section:


              ``center for medicare and medicaid innovation

    ``Sec. 1115A.  (a) Center for Medicare and Medicaid Innovation 
Established.--
        ``(1) In general.--There is created within the Centers for 
    Medicare & Medicaid Services a Center for Medicare and Medicaid 
    Innovation (in this section referred to as the `CMI') to carry out 
    the duties described in this section. The purpose of the CMI is to 
    test innovative payment and service delivery models to reduce 
    program expenditures under the applicable titles while preserving 
    or enhancing the quality of care furnished to individuals under 
    such titles. In selecting such models, the Secretary shall give 
    preference to models that also improve the coordination, quality, 
    and efficiency of health care services furnished to applicable 
    individuals defined in paragraph (4)(A).
        ``(2) Deadline.--The Secretary shall ensure that the CMI is 
    carrying out the duties described in this section by not later than 
    January 1, 2011.
        ``(3) Consultation.--In carrying out the duties under this 
    section, the CMI shall consult representatives of relevant Federal 
    agencies, and clinical and analytical experts with expertise in 
    medicine and health care management. The CMI shall use open door 
    forums or other mechanisms to seek input from interested parties.
        ``(4) Definitions.--In this section:
            ``(A) Applicable individual.--The term `applicable 
        individual' means--
                ``(i) an individual who is entitled to, or enrolled 
            for, benefits under part A of title XVIII or enrolled for 
            benefits under part B of such title;
                ``(ii) an individual who is eligible for medical 
            assistance under title XIX, under a State plan or waiver; 
            or
                ``(iii) an individual who meets the criteria of both 
            clauses (i) and (ii).
            ``(B) Applicable title.--The term `applicable title' means 
        title XVIII, title XIX, or both.
    ``(b) Testing of Models (Phase I).--
        ``(1) In general.--The CMI shall test payment and service 
    delivery models in accordance with selection criteria under 
    paragraph (2) to determine the effect of applying such models under 
    the applicable title (as defined in subsection (a)(4)(B)) on 
    program expenditures under such titles and the quality of care 
    received by individuals receiving benefits under such title.
        ``(2) Selection of models to be tested.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Secretary shall select models to be 
        tested from models where the Secretary determines that there is 
        evidence that the model addresses a defined population for 
        which there are deficits in care leading to poor clinical 
        outcomes or potentially avoidable expenditures. The models 
        selected under the preceding sentence may include the models 
        described in subparagraph (B).
            ``(B) Opportunities.--The models described in this 
        subparagraph are the following models:
                ``(i) Promoting broad payment and practice reform in 
            primary care, including patient-centered medical home 
            models for high-need applicable individuals, medical homes 
            that address women's unique health care needs, and models 
            that transition primary care practices away from fee-for-
            service based reimbursement and toward comprehensive 
            payment or salary-based payment.
                ``(ii) Contracting directly with groups of providers of 
            services and suppliers to promote innovative care delivery 
            models, such as through risk-based comprehensive payment or 
            salary-based payment.
                ``(iii) Utilizing geriatric assessments and 
            comprehensive care plans to coordinate the care (including 
            through interdisciplinary teams) of applicable individuals 
            with multiple chronic conditions and at least one of the 
            following:

                    ``(I) An inability to perform 2 or more activities 
                of daily living.
                    ``(II) Cognitive impairment, including dementia.

                ``(iv) Promote care coordination between providers of 
            services and suppliers that transition health care 
            providers away from fee-for-service based reimbursement and 
            toward salary-based payment.
                ``(v) Supporting care coordination for chronically-ill 
            applicable individuals at high risk of hospitalization 
            through a health information technology-enabled provider 
            network that includes care coordinators, a chronic disease 
            registry, and home tele-health technology.
                ``(vi) Varying payment to physicians who order advanced 
            diagnostic imaging services (as defined in section 
            1834(e)(1)(B)) according to the physician's adherence to 
            appropriateness criteria for the ordering of such services, 
            as determined in consultation with physician specialty 
            groups and other relevant stakeholders.
                ``(vii) Utilizing medication therapy management 
            services, such as those described in section 935 of the 
            Public Health Service Act.
                ``(viii) Establishing community-based health teams to 
            support small-practice medical homes by assisting the 
            primary care practitioner in chronic care management, 
            including patient self-management, activities.
                ``(ix) Assisting applicable individuals in making 
            informed health care choices by paying providers of 
            services and suppliers for using patient decision-support 
            tools, including tools that meet the standards developed 
            and identified under section 936(c)(2)(A) of the Public 
            Health Service Act, that improve applicable individual and 
            caregiver understanding of medical treatment options.
                ``(x) Allowing States to test and evaluate fully 
            integrating care for dual eligible individuals in the 
            State, including the management and oversight of all funds 
            under the applicable titles with respect to such 
            individuals.
                ``(xi) Allowing States to test and evaluate systems of 
            all-payer payment reform for the medical care of residents 
            of the State, including dual eligible individuals.
                ``(xii) Aligning nationally recognized, evidence-based 
            guidelines of cancer care with payment incentives under 
            title XVIII in the areas of treatment planning and follow-
            up care planning for applicable individuals described in 
            clause (i) or (iii) of subsection (a)(4)(A) with cancer, 
            including the identification of gaps in applicable quality 
            measures.
                ``(xiii) Improving post-acute care through continuing 
            care hospitals that offer inpatient rehabilitation, long-
            term care hospitals, and home health or skilled nursing 
            care during an inpatient stay and the 30 days immediately 
            following discharge.
                ``(xiv) Funding home health providers who offer chronic 
            care management services to applicable individuals in 
            cooperation with interdisciplinary teams.
                ``(xv) Promoting improved quality and reduced cost by 
            developing a collaborative of high-quality, low-cost health 
            care institutions that is responsible for--

                    ``(I) developing, documenting, and disseminating 
                best practices and proven care methods;
                    ``(II) implementing such best practices and proven 
                care methods within such institutions to demonstrate 
                further improvements in quality and efficiency; and
                    ``(III) providing assistance to other health care 
                institutions on how best to employ such best practices 
                and proven care methods to improve health care quality 
                and lower costs.

                ``(xvi) Facilitate inpatient care, including intensive 
            care, of hospitalized applicable individuals at their local 
            hospital through the use of electronic monitoring by 
            specialists, including intensivists and critical care 
            specialists, based at integrated health systems.
                ``(xvii) Promoting greater efficiencies and timely 
            access to outpatient services (such as outpatient physical 
            therapy services) through models that do not require a 
            physician or other health professional to refer the service 
            or be involved in establishing the plan of care for the 
            service, when such service is furnished by a health 
            professional who has the authority to furnish the service 
            under existing State law.
                ``(xviii) Establishing comprehensive payments to 
            Healthcare Innovation Zones, consisting of groups of 
            providers that include a teaching hospital, physicians, and 
            other clinical entities, that, through their structure, 
            operations, and joint-activity deliver a full spectrum of 
            integrated and comprehensive health care services to 
            applicable individuals while also incorporating innovative 
            methods for the clinical training of future health care 
            professionals.
            ``(C) Additional factors for consideration.--In selecting 
        models for testing under subparagraph (A), the CMI may consider 
        the following additional factors:
                ``(i) Whether the model includes a regular process for 
            monitoring and updating patient care plans in a manner that 
            is consistent with the needs and preferences of applicable 
            individuals.
                ``(ii) Whether the model places the applicable 
            individual, including family members and other informal 
            caregivers of the applicable individual, at the center of 
            the care team of the applicable individual.
                ``(iii) Whether the model provides for in-person 
            contact with applicable individuals.
                ``(iv) Whether the model utilizes technology, such as 
            electronic health records and patient-based remote 
            monitoring systems, to coordinate care over time and across 
            settings.
                ``(v) Whether the model provides for the maintenance of 
            a close relationship between care coordinators, primary 
            care practitioners, specialist physicians, community-based 
            organizations, and other providers of services and 
            suppliers.
                ``(vi) Whether the model relies on a team-based 
            approach to interventions, such as comprehensive care 
            assessments, care planning, and self-management coaching.
                ``(vii) Whether, under the model, providers of services 
            and suppliers are able to share information with patients, 
            caregivers, and other providers of services and suppliers 
            on a real time basis.
        ``(3) Budget neutrality.--
            ``(A) Initial period.--The Secretary shall not require, as 
        a condition for testing a model under paragraph (1), that the 
        design of such model ensure that such model is budget neutral 
        initially with respect to expenditures under the applicable 
        title.
            ``(B) Termination or modification.--The Secretary shall 
        terminate or modify the design and implementation of a model 
        unless the Secretary determines (and the Chief Actuary of the 
        Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services, with respect to 
        program spending under the applicable title, certifies), after 
        testing has begun, that the model is expected to--
                ``(i) improve the quality of care (as determined by the 
            Administrator of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid 
            Services) without increasing spending under the applicable 
            title;
                ``(ii) reduce spending under the applicable title 
            without reducing the quality of care; or
                ``(iii) improve the quality of care and reduce 
            spending.
        Such termination may occur at any time after such testing has 
        begun and before completion of the testing.
        ``(4) Evaluation.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Secretary shall conduct an 
        evaluation of each model tested under this subsection. Such 
        evaluation shall include an analysis of--
                ``(i) the quality of care furnished under the model, 
            including the measurement of patient-level outcomes and 
            patient-centeredness criteria determined appropriate by the 
            Secretary; and
                ``(ii) the changes in spending under the applicable 
            titles by reason of the model.
            ``(B) Information.--The Secretary shall make the results of 
        each evaluation under this paragraph available to the public in 
        a timely fashion and may establish requirements for States and 
        other entities participating in the testing of models under 
        this section to collect and report information that the 
        Secretary determines is necessary to monitor and evaluate such 
        models.
    ``(c) Expansion of Models (Phase II).--Taking into account the 
evaluation under subsection (b)(4), the Secretary may, through 
rulemaking, expand (including implementation on a nationwide basis) the 
duration and the scope of a model that is being tested under subsection 
(b) or a demonstration project under section 1866C, to the extent 
determined appropriate by the Secretary, if--
        ``(1) the Secretary determines that such expansion is expected 
    to--
            ``(A) reduce spending under applicable title without 
        reducing the quality of care; or
            ``(B) improve the quality of care and reduce spending; and
        ``(2) the Chief Actuary of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid 
    Services certifies that such expansion would reduce program 
    spending under applicable titles.
    ``(d) Implementation.--
        ``(1) Waiver authority.--The Secretary may waive such 
    requirements of titles XI and XVIII and of sections 1902(a)(1), 
    1902(a)(13), and 1903(m)(2)(A)(iii) as may be necessary solely for 
    purposes of carrying out this section with respect to testing 
    models described in subsection (b).
        ``(2) Limitations on review.--There shall be no administrative 
    or judicial review under section 1869, section 1878, or otherwise 
    of--
            ``(A) the selection of models for testing or expansion 
        under this section;
            ``(B) the selection of organizations, sites, or 
        participants to test those models selected;
            ``(C) the elements, parameters, scope, and duration of such 
        models for testing or dissemination;
            ``(D) determinations regarding budget neutrality under 
        subsection (b)(3);
            ``(E) the termination or modification of the design and 
        implementation of a model under subsection (b)(3)(B); and
            ``(F) determinations about expansion of the duration and 
        scope of a model under subsection (c), including the 
        determination that a model is not expected to meet criteria 
        described in paragraph (1) or (2) of such subsection.
        ``(3) Administration.--Chapter 35 of title 44, United States 
    Code, shall not apply to the testing and evaluation of models or 
    expansion of such models under this section.
    ``(e) Application to CHIP.--The Center may carry out activities 
under this section with respect to title XXI in the same manner as 
provided under this section with respect to the program under the 
applicable titles.
    ``(f) Funding.--
        ``(1) In general.--There are appropriated, from amounts in the 
    Treasury not otherwise appropriated--
            ``(A) $5,000,000 for the design, implementation, and 
        evaluation of models under subsection (b) for fiscal year 2010;
            ``(B) $10,000,000,000 for the activities initiated under 
        this section for the period of fiscal years 2011 through 2019; 
        and
            ``(C) the amount described in subparagraph (B) for the 
        activities initiated under this section for each subsequent 10-
        year fiscal period (beginning with the 10-year fiscal period 
        beginning with fiscal year 2020).
    Amounts appropriated under the preceding sentence shall remain 
    available until expended.
        ``(2) Use of certain funds.--Out of amounts appropriated under 
    subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1), not less than 
    $25,000,000 shall be made available each such fiscal year to 
    design, implement, and evaluate models under subsection (b).
    ``(g) Report to Congress.--Beginning in 2012, and not less than 
once every other year thereafter, the Secretary shall submit to 
Congress a report on activities under this section. Each such report 
shall describe the models tested under subsection (b), including the 
number of individuals described in subsection (a)(4)(A)(i) and of 
individuals described in subsection (a)(4)(A)(ii) participating in such 
models and payments made under applicable titles for services on behalf 
of such individuals, any models chosen for expansion under subsection 
(c), and the results from evaluations under subsection (b)(4). In 
addition, each such report shall provide such recommendations as the 
Secretary determines are appropriate for legislative action to 
facilitate the development and expansion of successful payment 
models.''.
    (b) Medicaid Conforming Amendment.--Section 1902(a) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)), as amended by section 8002(b), is 
amended--
        (1) in paragraph (81), by striking ``and'' at the end;
        (2) in paragraph (82), by striking the period at the end and 
    inserting ``; and''; and
        (3) by inserting after paragraph (82) the following new 
    paragraph:
        ``(83) provide for implementation of the payment models 
    specified by the Secretary under section 1115A(c) for 
    implementation on a nationwide basis unless the State demonstrates 
    to the satisfaction of the Secretary that implementation would not 
    be administratively feasible or appropriate to the health care 
    delivery system of the State.''.
    (c) Revisions to Health Care Quality Demonstration Program.--
Subsections (b) and (f) of section 1866C of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395cc-3) are amended by striking ``5-year'' each place it 
appears.

SEC. 3022. MEDICARE SHARED SAVINGS PROGRAM.

    Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395 et seq.) is 
amended by adding at the end the following new section:


                         ``shared savings program

    ``Sec. 1899.  (a) Establishment.--
        ``(1) In general.--Not later than January 1, 2012, the 
    Secretary shall establish a shared savings program (in this section 
    referred to as the `program') that promotes accountability for a 
    patient population and coordinates items and services under parts A 
    and B, and encourages investment in infrastructure and redesigned 
    care processes for high quality and efficient service delivery. 
    Under such program--
            ``(A) groups of providers of services and suppliers meeting 
        criteria specified by the Secretary may work together to manage 
        and coordinate care for Medicare fee-for-service beneficiaries 
        through an accountable care organization (referred to in this 
        section as an `ACO'); and
            ``(B) ACOs that meet quality performance standards 
        established by the Secretary are eligible to receive payments 
        for shared savings under subsection (d)(2).
    ``(b) Eligible ACOs.--
        ``(1) In general.--Subject to the succeeding provisions of this 
    subsection, as determined appropriate by the Secretary, the 
    following groups of providers of services and suppliers which have 
    established a mechanism for shared governance are eligible to 
    participate as ACOs under the program under this section:
            ``(A) ACO professionals in group practice arrangements.
            ``(B) Networks of individual practices of ACO 
        professionals.
            ``(C) Partnerships or joint venture arrangements between 
        hospitals and ACO professionals.
            ``(D) Hospitals employing ACO professionals.
            ``(E) Such other groups of providers of services and 
        suppliers as the Secretary determines appropriate.
        ``(2) Requirements.--An ACO shall meet the following 
    requirements:
            ``(A) The ACO shall be willing to become accountable for 
        the quality, cost, and overall care of the Medicare fee-for-
        service beneficiaries assigned to it.
            ``(B) The ACO shall enter into an agreement with the 
        Secretary to participate in the program for not less than a 3-
        year period (referred to in this section as the `agreement 
        period').
            ``(C) The ACO shall have a formal legal structure that 
        would allow the organization to receive and distribute payments 
        for shared savings under subsection (d)(2) to participating 
        providers of services and suppliers.
            ``(D) The ACO shall include primary care ACO professionals 
        that are sufficient for the number of Medicare fee-for-service 
        beneficiaries assigned to the ACO under subsection (c). At a 
        minimum, the ACO shall have at least 5,000 such beneficiaries 
        assigned to it under subsection (c) in order to be eligible to 
        participate in the ACO program.
            ``(E) The ACO shall provide the Secretary with such 
        information regarding ACO professionals participating in the 
        ACO as the Secretary determines necessary to support the 
        assignment of Medicare fee-for-service beneficiaries to an ACO, 
        the implementation of quality and other reporting requirements 
        under paragraph (3), and the determination of payments for 
        shared savings under subsection (d)(2).
            ``(F) The ACO shall have in place a leadership and 
        management structure that includes clinical and administrative 
        systems.
            ``(G) The ACO shall define processes to promote evidence-
        based medicine and patient engagement, report on quality and 
        cost measures, and coordinate care, such as through the use of 
        telehealth, remote patient monitoring, and other such enabling 
        technologies.
            ``(H) The ACO shall demonstrate to the Secretary that it 
        meets patient-centeredness criteria specified by the Secretary, 
        such as the use of patient and caregiver assessments or the use 
        of individualized care plans.
        ``(3) Quality and other reporting requirements.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Secretary shall determine 
        appropriate measures to assess the quality of care furnished by 
        the ACO, such as measures of--
                ``(i) clinical processes and outcomes;
                ``(ii) patient and, where practicable, caregiver 
            experience of care; and
                ``(iii) utilization (such as rates of hospital 
            admissions for ambulatory care sensitive conditions).
            ``(B) Reporting requirements.--An ACO shall submit data in 
        a form and manner specified by the Secretary on measures the 
        Secretary determines necessary for the ACO to report in order 
        to evaluate the quality of care furnished by the ACO. Such data 
        may include care transitions across health care settings, 
        including hospital discharge planning and post-hospital 
        discharge follow-up by ACO professionals, as the Secretary 
        determines appropriate.
            ``(C) Quality performance standards.--The Secretary shall 
        establish quality performance standards to assess the quality 
        of care furnished by ACOs. The Secretary shall seek to improve 
        the quality of care furnished by ACOs over time by specifying 
        higher standards, new measures, or both for purposes of 
        assessing such quality of care.
            ``(D) Other reporting requirements.--The Secretary may, as 
        the Secretary determines appropriate, incorporate reporting 
        requirements and incentive payments related to the physician 
        quality reporting initiative (PQRI) under section 1848, 
        including such requirements and such payments related to 
        electronic prescribing, electronic health records, and other 
        similar initiatives under section 1848, and may use alternative 
        criteria than would otherwise apply under such section for 
        determining whether to make such payments. The incentive 
        payments described in the preceding sentence shall not be taken 
        into consideration when calculating any payments otherwise made 
        under subsection (d).
        ``(4) No duplication in participation in shared savings 
    programs.--A provider of services or supplier that participates in 
    any of the following shall not be eligible to participate in an ACO 
    under this section:
            ``(A) A model tested or expanded under section 1115A that 
        involves shared savings under this title, or any other program 
        or demonstration project that involves such shared savings.
            ``(B) The independence at home medical practice pilot 
        program under section 1866E.
    ``(c) Assignment of Medicare Fee-for-service Beneficiaries to 
ACOs.--The Secretary shall determine an appropriate method to assign 
Medicare fee-for-service beneficiaries to an ACO based on their 
utilization of primary care services provided under this title by an 
ACO professional described in subsection (h)(1)(A).
    ``(d) Payments and Treatment of Savings.--
        ``(1) Payments.--
            ``(A) In general.--Under the program, subject to paragraph 
        (3), payments shall continue to be made to providers of 
        services and suppliers participating in an ACO under the 
        original Medicare fee-for-service program under parts A and B 
        in the same manner as they would otherwise be made except that 
        a participating ACO is eligible to receive payment for shared 
        savings under paragraph (2) if--
                ``(i) the ACO meets quality performance standards 
            established by the Secretary under subsection (b)(3); and
                ``(ii) the ACO meets the requirement under subparagraph 
            (B)(i).
            ``(B) Savings requirement and benchmark.--
                ``(i) Determining savings.--In each year of the 
            agreement period, an ACO shall be eligible to receive 
            payment for shared savings under paragraph (2) only if the 
            estimated average per capita Medicare expenditures under 
            the ACO for Medicare fee-for-service beneficiaries for 
            parts A and B services, adjusted for beneficiary 
            characteristics, is at least the percent specified by the 
            Secretary below the applicable benchmark under clause (ii). 
            The Secretary shall determine the appropriate percent 
            described in the preceding sentence to account for normal 
            variation in expenditures under this title, based upon the 
            number of Medicare fee-for-service beneficiaries assigned 
            to an ACO.
                ``(ii) Establish and update benchmark.--The Secretary 
            shall estimate a benchmark for each agreement period for 
            each ACO using the most recent available 3 years of per-
            beneficiary expenditures for parts A and B services for 
            Medicare fee-for-service beneficiaries assigned to the ACO. 
            Such benchmark shall be adjusted for beneficiary 
            characteristics and such other factors as the Secretary 
            determines appropriate and updated by the projected 
            absolute amount of growth in national per capita 
            expenditures for parts A and B services under the original 
            Medicare fee-for-service program, as estimated by the 
            Secretary. Such benchmark shall be reset at the start of 
            each agreement period.
        ``(2) Payments for shared savings.--Subject to performance with 
    respect to the quality performance standards established by the 
    Secretary under subsection (b)(3), if an ACO meets the requirements 
    under paragraph (1), a percent (as determined appropriate by the 
    Secretary) of the difference between such estimated average per 
    capita Medicare expenditures in a year, adjusted for beneficiary 
    characteristics, under the ACO and such benchmark for the ACO may 
    be paid to the ACO as shared savings and the remainder of such 
    difference shall be retained by the program under this title. The 
    Secretary shall establish limits on the total amount of shared 
    savings that may be paid to an ACO under this paragraph.
        ``(3) Monitoring avoidance of at-risk patients.--If the 
    Secretary determines that an ACO has taken steps to avoid patients 
    at risk in order to reduce the likelihood of increasing costs to 
    the ACO the Secretary may impose an appropriate sanction on the 
    ACO, including termination from the program.
        ``(4) Termination.--The Secretary may terminate an agreement 
    with an ACO if it does not meet the quality performance standards 
    established by the Secretary under subsection (b)(3).
    ``(e) Administration.--Chapter 35 of title 44, United States Code, 
shall not apply to the program.
    ``(f) Waiver Authority.--The Secretary may waive such requirements 
of sections 1128A and 1128B and title XVIII of this Act as may be 
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
    ``(g) Limitations on Review.--There shall be no administrative or 
judicial review under section 1869, section 1878, or otherwise of--
        ``(1) the specification of criteria under subsection (a)(1)(B);
        ``(2) the assessment of the quality of care furnished by an ACO 
    and the establishment of performance standards under subsection 
    (b)(3);
        ``(3) the assignment of Medicare fee-for-service beneficiaries 
    to an ACO under subsection (c);
        ``(4) the determination of whether an ACO is eligible for 
    shared savings under subsection (d)(2) and the amount of such 
    shared savings, including the determination of the estimated 
    average per capita Medicare expenditures under the ACO for Medicare 
    fee-for-service beneficiaries assigned to the ACO and the average 
    benchmark for the ACO under subsection (d)(1)(B);
        ``(5) the percent of shared savings specified by the Secretary 
    under subsection (d)(2) and any limit on the total amount of shared 
    savings established by the Secretary under such subsection; and
        ``(6) the termination of an ACO under subsection (d)(4).
    ``(h) Definitions.--In this section:
        ``(1) ACO professional.--The term `ACO professional' means--
            ``(A) a physician (as defined in section 1861(r)(1)); and
            ``(B) a practitioner described in section 
        1842(b)(18)(C)(i).
        ``(2) Hospital.--The term `hospital' means a subsection (d) 
    hospital (as defined in section 1886(d)(1)(B)).
        ``(3) Medicare fee-for-service beneficiary.--The term `Medicare 
    fee-for-service beneficiary' means an individual who is enrolled in 
    the original Medicare fee-for-service program under parts A and B 
    and is not enrolled in an MA plan under part C, an eligible 
    organization under section 1876, or a PACE program under section 
    1894.''.

SEC. 3023. NATIONAL PILOT PROGRAM ON PAYMENT BUNDLING.

    Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, as amended by section 3021, 
is amended by inserting after section 1886C the following new section:


               ``national pilot program on payment bundling

    ``Sec. 1866D.  (a) Implementation.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Secretary shall establish a pilot 
    program for integrated care during an episode of care provided to 
    an applicable beneficiary around a hospitalization in order to 
    improve the coordination, quality, and efficiency of health care 
    services under this title.
        ``(2) Definitions.--In this section:
            ``(A) Applicable beneficiary.--The term `applicable 
        beneficiary' means an individual who--
                ``(i) is entitled to, or enrolled for, benefits under 
            part A and enrolled for benefits under part B of such 
            title, but not enrolled under part C or a PACE program 
            under section 1894; and
                ``(ii) is admitted to a hospital for an applicable 
            condition.
            ``(B) Applicable condition.--The term `applicable 
        condition' means 1 or more of 8 conditions selected by the 
        Secretary. In selecting conditions under the preceding 
        sentence, the Secretary shall take into consideration the 
        following factors:
                ``(i) Whether the conditions selected include a mix of 
            chronic and acute conditions.
                ``(ii) Whether the conditions selected include a mix of 
            surgical and medical conditions.
                ``(iii) Whether a condition is one for which there is 
            evidence of an opportunity for providers of services and 
            suppliers to improve the quality of care furnished while 
            reducing total expenditures under this title.
                ``(iv) Whether a condition has significant variation 
            in--

                    ``(I) the number of readmissions; and
                    ``(II) the amount of expenditures for post-acute 
                care spending under this title.

                ``(v) Whether a condition is high-volume and has high 
            post-acute care expenditures under this title.
                ``(vi) Which conditions the Secretary determines are 
            most amenable to bundling across the spectrum of care given 
            practice patterns under this title.
            ``(C) Applicable services.--The term `applicable services' 
        means the following:
                ``(i) Acute care inpatient services.
                ``(ii) Physicians' services delivered in and outside of 
            an acute care hospital setting.
                ``(iii) Outpatient hospital services, including 
            emergency department services.
                ``(iv) Post-acute care services, including home health 
            services, skilled nursing services, inpatient 
            rehabilitation services, and inpatient hospital services 
            furnished by a long-term care hospital.
                ``(v) Other services the Secretary determines 
            appropriate.
            ``(D) Episode of care.--
                ``(i) In general.--Subject to clause (ii), the term 
            `episode of care' means, with respect to an applicable 
            condition and an applicable beneficiary, the period that 
            includes--

                    ``(I) the 3 days prior to the admission of the 
                applicable beneficiary to a hospital for the applicable 
                condition;
                    ``(II) the length of stay of the applicable 
                beneficiary in such hospital; and
                    ``(III) the 30 days following the discharge of the 
                applicable beneficiary from such hospital.

                ``(ii) Establishment of period by the secretary.--The 
            Secretary, as appropriate, may establish a period (other 
            than the period described in clause (i)) for an episode of 
            care under the pilot program.
            ``(E) Physicians' services.--The term `physicians' 
        services' has the meaning given such term in section 1861(q).
            ``(F) Pilot program.--The term `pilot program' means the 
        pilot program under this section.
            ``(G) Provider of services.--The term `provider of 
        services' has the meaning given such term in section 1861(u).
            ``(H) Readmission.--The term `readmission' has the meaning 
        given such term in section 1886(q)(5)(E).
            ``(I) Supplier.--The term `supplier' has the meaning given 
        such term in section 1861(d).
        ``(3) Deadline for implementation.--The Secretary shall 
    establish the pilot program not later than January 1, 2013.
    ``(b) Developmental Phase.--
        ``(1) Determination of patient assessment instrument.--The 
    Secretary shall determine which patient assessment instrument (such 
    as the Continuity Assessment Record and Evaluation (CARE) tool) 
    shall be used under the pilot program to evaluate the applicable 
    condition of an applicable beneficiary for purposes of determining 
    the most clinically appropriate site for the provision of post-
    acute care to the applicable beneficiary.
        ``(2) Development of quality measures for an episode of care 
    and for post-acute care.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Secretary, in consultation with the 
        Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality and the entity with 
        a contract under section 1890(a) of the Social Security Act, 
        shall develop quality measures for use in the pilot program--
                ``(i) for episodes of care; and
                ``(ii) for post-acute care.
            ``(B) Site-neutral post-acute care quality measures.--Any 
        quality measures developed under subparagraph (A)(ii) shall be 
        site-neutral.
            ``(C) Coordination with quality measure development and 
        endorsement procedures.--The Secretary shall ensure that the 
        development of quality measures under subparagraph (A) is done 
        in a manner that is consistent with the measures developed and 
        endorsed under section 1890 and 1890A that are applicable to 
        all post-acute care settings.
    ``(c) Details.--
        ``(1) Duration.--
            ``(A) In general.--Subject to subparagraph (B), the pilot 
        program shall be conducted for a period of 5 years.
            ``(B) Extension.--The Secretary may extend the duration of 
        the pilot program for providers of services and suppliers 
        participating in the pilot program as of the day before the end 
        of the 5-year period described in subparagraph (A), for a 
        period determined appropriate by the Secretary, if the 
        Secretary determines that such extension will result in 
        improving or not reducing the quality of patient care and 
        reducing spending under this title.
        ``(2) Participating providers of services and suppliers.--
            ``(A) In general.--An entity comprised of providers of 
        services and suppliers, including a hospital, a physician 
        group, a skilled nursing facility, and a home health agency, 
        who are otherwise participating under this title, may submit an 
        application to the Secretary to provide applicable services to 
        applicable individuals under this section.
            ``(B) Requirements.--The Secretary shall develop 
        requirements for entities to participate in the pilot program 
        under this section. Such requirements shall ensure that 
        applicable beneficiaries have an adequate choice of providers 
        of services and suppliers under the pilot program.
        ``(3) Payment methodology.--
            ``(A) In general.--
                ``(i) Establishment of payment methods.--The Secretary 
            shall develop payment methods for the pilot program for 
            entities participating in the pilot program. Such payment 
            methods may include bundled payments and bids from entities 
            for episodes of care. The Secretary shall make payments to 
            the entity for services covered under this section.
                ``(ii) No additional program expenditures.--Payments 
            under this section for applicable items and services under 
            this title (including payment for services described in 
            subparagraph (B)) for applicable beneficiaries for a year 
            shall be established in a manner that does not result in 
            spending more for such entity for such beneficiaries than 
            would otherwise be expended for such entity for such 
            beneficiaries for such year if the pilot program were not 
            implemented, as estimated by the Secretary.
            ``(B) Inclusion of certain services.--A payment methodology 
        tested under the pilot program shall include payment for the 
        furnishing of applicable services and other appropriate 
        services, such as care coordination, medication reconciliation, 
        discharge planning, transitional care services, and other 
        patient-centered activities as determined appropriate by the 
        Secretary.
            ``(C) Bundled payments.--
                ``(i) In general.--A bundled payment under the pilot 
            program shall--

                    ``(I) be comprehensive, covering the costs of 
                applicable services and other appropriate services 
                furnished to an individual during an episode of care 
                (as determined by the Secretary); and
                    ``(II) be made to the entity which is participating 
                in the pilot program.

                ``(ii) Requirement for provision of applicable services 
            and other appropriate services.--Applicable services and 
            other appropriate services for which payment is made under 
            this subparagraph shall be furnished or directed by the 
            entity which is participating in the pilot program.
            ``(D) Payment for post-acute care services after the 
        episode of care.--The Secretary shall establish procedures, in 
        the case where an applicable beneficiary requires continued 
        post-acute care services after the last day of the episode of 
        care, under which payment for such services shall be made.
        ``(4) Quality measures.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Secretary shall establish quality 
        measures (including quality measures of process, outcome, and 
        structure) related to care provided by entities participating 
        in the pilot program. Quality measures established under the 
        preceding sentence shall include measures of the following:
                ``(i) Functional status improvement.
                ``(ii) Reducing rates of avoidable hospital 
            readmissions.
                ``(iii) Rates of discharge to the community.
                ``(iv) Rates of admission to an emergency room after a 
            hospitalization.
                ``(v) Incidence of health care acquired infections.
                ``(vi) Efficiency measures.
                ``(vii) Measures of patient-centeredness of care.
                ``(viii) Measures of patient perception of care.
                ``(ix) Other measures, including measures of patient 
            outcomes, determined appropriate by the Secretary.
            ``(B) Reporting on quality measures.--
                ``(i) In general.--A entity shall submit data to the 
            Secretary on quality measures established under 
            subparagraph (A) during each year of the pilot program (in 
            a form and manner, subject to clause (iii), specified by 
            the Secretary).
                ``(ii) Submission of data through electronic health 
            record.--To the extent practicable, the Secretary shall 
            specify that data on measures be submitted under clause (i) 
            through the use of an qualified electronic health record 
            (as defined in section 3000(13) of the Public Health 
            Service Act (42 U.S.C. 300jj-11(13)) in a manner specified 
            by the Secretary.
    ``(d) Waiver.--The Secretary may waive such provisions of this 
title and title XI as may be necessary to carry out the pilot program.
    ``(e) Independent Evaluation and Reports on Pilot Program.--
        ``(1) Independent evaluation.--The Secretary shall conduct an 
    independent evaluation of the pilot program, including the extent 
    to which the pilot program has--
            ``(A) improved quality measures established under 
        subsection (c)(4)(A);
            ``(B) improved health outcomes;
            ``(C) improved applicable beneficiary access to care; and
            ``(D) reduced spending under this title.
        ``(2) Reports.--
            ``(A) Interim report.--Not later than 2 years after the 
        implementation of the pilot program, the Secretary shall submit 
        to Congress a report on the initial results of the independent 
        evaluation conducted under paragraph (1).
            ``(B) Final report.--Not later than 3 years after the 
        implementation of the pilot program, the Secretary shall submit 
        to Congress a report on the final results of the independent 
        evaluation conducted under paragraph (1).
    ``(f) Consultation.--The Secretary shall consult with 
representatives of small rural hospitals, including critical access 
hospitals (as defined in section 1861(mm)(1)), regarding their 
participation in the pilot program. Such consultation shall include 
consideration of innovative methods of implementing bundled payments in 
hospitals described in the preceding sentence, taking into 
consideration any difficulties in doing so as a result of the low 
volume of services provided by such hospitals.
    ``(g) Implementation Plan.--
        ``(1) In general.--Not later than January 1, 2016, the 
    Secretary shall submit a plan for the implementation of an 
    expansion of the pilot program if the Secretary determines that 
    such expansion will result in improving or not reducing the quality 
    of patient care and reducing spending under this title.
    ``(h) Administration.--Chapter 35 of title 44, United States Code, 
shall not apply to the selection, testing, and evaluation of models or 
the expansion of such models under this section.''.

SEC. 3024. INDEPENDENCE AT HOME DEMONSTRATION PROGRAM.

    Title XVIII of the Social Security Act is amended by inserting 
after section 1866D, as inserted by section 3023, the following new 
section:


      ``independence at home medical practice demonstration program

    ``Sec. 1866D.  (a) Establishment.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Secretary shall conduct a demonstration 
    program (in this section referred to as the `demonstration 
    program') to test a payment incentive and service delivery model 
    that utilizes physician and nurse practitioner directed home-based 
    primary care teams designed to reduce expenditures and improve 
    health outcomes in the provision of items and services under this 
    title to applicable beneficiaries (as defined in subsection (d)).
        ``(2) Requirement.--The demonstration program shall test 
    whether a model described in paragraph (1), which is accountable 
    for providing comprehensive, coordinated, continuous, and 
    accessible care to high-need populations at home and coordinating 
    health care across all treatment settings, results in--
            ``(A) reducing preventable hospitalizations;
            ``(B) preventing hospital readmissions;
            ``(C) reducing emergency room visits;
            ``(D) improving health outcomes commensurate with the 
        beneficiaries' stage of chronic illness;
            ``(E) improving the efficiency of care, such as by reducing 
        duplicative diagnostic and laboratory tests;
            ``(F) reducing the cost of health care services covered 
        under this title; and
            ``(G) achieving beneficiary and family caregiver 
        satisfaction.
    ``(b) Independence at Home Medical Practice.--
        ``(1) Independence at home medical practice defined.--In this 
    section:
            ``(A) In general.--The term `independence at home medical 
        practice' means a legal entity that--
                ``(i) is comprised of an individual physician or nurse 
            practitioner or group of physicians and nurse practitioners 
            that provides care as part of a team that includes 
            physicians, nurses, physician assistants, pharmacists, and 
            other health and social services staff as appropriate who 
            have experience providing home-based primary care to 
            applicable beneficiaries, make in-home visits, and are 
            available 24 hours per day, 7 days per week to carry out 
            plans of care that are tailored to the individual 
            beneficiary's chronic conditions and designed to achieve 
            the results in subsection (a);
                ``(ii) is organized at least in part for the purpose of 
            providing physicians' services;
                ``(iii) has documented experience in providing home-
            based primary care services to high-cost chronically ill 
            beneficiaries, as determined appropriate by the Secretary;
                ``(iv) furnishes services to at least 200 applicable 
            beneficiaries (as defined in subsection (d)) during each 
            year of the demonstration program;
                ``(v) has entered into an agreement with the Secretary;
                ``(vi) uses electronic health information systems, 
            remote monitoring, and mobile diagnostic technology; and
                ``(vii) meets such other criteria as the Secretary 
            determines to be appropriate to participate in the 
            demonstration program.
        The entity shall report on quality measures (in such form, 
        manner, and frequency as specified by the Secretary, which may 
        be for the group, for providers of services and suppliers, or 
        both) and report to the Secretary (in a form, manner, and 
        frequency as specified by the Secretary) such data as the 
        Secretary determines appropriate to monitor and evaluate the 
        demonstration program.
            ``(B) Physician.--The term `physician' includes, except as 
        the Secretary may otherwise provide, any individual who 
        furnishes services for which payment may be made as physicians' 
        services and has the medical training or experience to fulfill 
        the physician's role described in subparagraph (A)(i).
        ``(2) Participation of nurse practitioners and physician 
    assistants.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent 
    a nurse practitioner or physician assistant from participating in, 
    or leading, a home-based primary care team as part of an 
    independence at home medical practice if--
            ``(A) all the requirements of this section are met;
            ``(B) the nurse practitioner or physician assistant, as the 
        case may be, is acting consistent with State law; and
            ``(C) the nurse practitioner or physician assistant has the 
        medical training or experience to fulfill the nurse 
        practitioner or physician assistant role described in paragraph 
        (1)(A)(i).
        ``(3) Inclusion of providers and practitioners.--Nothing in 
    this subsection shall be construed as preventing an independence at 
    home medical practice from including a provider of services or a 
    participating practitioner described in section 1842(b)(18)(C) that 
    is affiliated with the practice under an arrangement structured so 
    that such provider of services or practitioner participates in the 
    demonstration program and shares in any savings under the 
    demonstration program.
        ``(4) Quality and performance standards.--The Secretary shall 
    develop quality performance standards for independence at home 
    medical practices participating in the demonstration program.
    ``(c) Payment Methodology.--
        ``(1) Establishment of target spending level.--The Secretary 
    shall establish an estimated annual spending target, for the amount 
    the Secretary estimates would have been spent in the absence of the 
    demonstration, for items and services covered under parts A and B 
    furnished to applicable beneficiaries for each qualifying 
    independence at home medical practice under this section. Such 
    spending targets shall be determined on a per capita basis. Such 
    spending targets shall include a risk corridor that takes into 
    account normal variation in expenditures for items and services 
    covered under parts A and B furnished to such beneficiaries with 
    the size of the corridor being related to the number of applicable 
    beneficiaries furnished services by each independence at home 
    medical practice. The spending targets may also be adjusted for 
    other factors as the Secretary determines appropriate.
        ``(2) Incentive payments.--Subject to performance on quality 
    measures, a qualifying independence at home medical practice is 
    eligible to receive an incentive payment under this section if 
    actual expenditures for a year for the applicable beneficiaries it 
    enrolls are less than the estimated spending target established 
    under paragraph (1) for such year. An incentive payment for such 
    year shall be equal to a portion (as determined by the Secretary) 
    of the amount by which actual expenditures (including incentive 
    payments under this paragraph) for applicable beneficiaries under 
    parts A and B for such year are estimated to be less than 5 percent 
    less than the estimated spending target for such year, as 
    determined under paragraph (1).
    ``(d) Applicable Beneficiaries.--
        ``(1) Definition.--In this section, the term `applicable 
    beneficiary' means, with respect to a qualifying independence at 
    home medical practice, an individual who the practice has 
    determined--
            ``(A) is entitled to benefits under part A and enrolled for 
        benefits under part B;
            ``(B) is not enrolled in a Medicare Advantage plan under 
        part C or a PACE program under section 1894;
            ``(C) has 2 or more chronic illnesses, such as congestive 
        heart failure, diabetes, other dementias designated by the 
        Secretary, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, ischemic 
        heart disease, stroke, Alzheimer's Disease and 
        neurodegenerative diseases, and other diseases and conditions 
        designated by the Secretary which result in high costs under 
        this title;
            ``(D) within the past 12 months has had a nonelective 
        hospital admission;
            ``(E) within the past 12 months has received acute or 
        subacute rehabilitation services;
            ``(F) has 2 or more functional dependencies requiring the 
        assistance of another person (such as bathing, dressing, 
        toileting, walking, or feeding); and
            ``(G) meets such other criteria as the Secretary determines 
        appropriate.
        ``(2) Patient election to participate.--The Secretary shall 
    determine an appropriate method of ensuring that applicable 
    beneficiaries have agreed to enroll in an independence at home 
    medical practice under the demonstration program. Enrollment in the 
    demonstration program shall be voluntary.
        ``(3) Beneficiary access to services.--Nothing in this section 
    shall be construed as encouraging physicians or nurse practitioners 
    to limit applicable beneficiary access to services covered under 
    this title and applicable beneficiaries shall not be required to 
    relinquish access to any benefit under this title as a condition of 
    receiving services from an independence at home medical practice.
    ``(e) Implementation.--
        ``(1) Starting date.--The demonstration program shall begin no 
    later than January 1, 2012. An agreement with an independence at 
    home medical practice under the demonstration program may cover not 
    more than a 3-year period.
        ``(2) No physician duplication in demonstration 
    participation.--The Secretary shall not pay an independence at home 
    medical practice under this section that participates in section 
    1899.
        ``(3) No beneficiary duplication in demonstration 
    participation.--The Secretary shall ensure that no applicable 
    beneficiary enrolled in an independence at home medical practice 
    under this section is participating in the programs under section 
    1899.
        ``(4) Preference.--In approving an independence at home medical 
    practice, the Secretary shall give preference to practices that 
    are--
            ``(A) located in high-cost areas of the country;
            ``(B) have experience in furnishing health care services to 
        applicable beneficiaries in the home; and
            ``(C) use electronic medical records, health information 
        technology, and individualized plans of care.
        ``(5) Limitation on number of practices.--In selecting 
    qualified independence at home medical practices to participate 
    under the demonstration program, the Secretary shall limit the 
    number of such practices so that the number of applicable 
    beneficiaries that may participate in the demonstration program 
    does not exceed 10,000.
        ``(6) Waiver.--The Secretary may waive such provisions of this 
    title and title XI as the Secretary determines necessary in order 
    to implement the demonstration program.
        ``(7) Administration.--Chapter 35 of title 44, United States 
    Code, shall not apply to this section.
    ``(f) Evaluation and Monitoring.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Secretary shall evaluate each 
    independence at home medical practice under the demonstration 
    program to assess whether the practice achieved the results 
    described in subsection (a).
        ``(2) Monitoring applicable beneficiaries.--The Secretary may 
    monitor data on expenditures and quality of services under this 
    title after an applicable beneficiary discontinues receiving 
    services under this title through a qualifying independence at home 
    medical practice.
    ``(g) Reports to Congress.--The Secretary shall conduct an 
independent evaluation of the demonstration program and submit to 
Congress a final report, including best practices under the 
demonstration program. Such report shall include an analysis of the 
demonstration program on coordination of care, expenditures under this 
title, applicable beneficiary access to services, and the quality of 
health care services provided to applicable beneficiaries.
    ``(h) Funding.--For purposes of administering and carrying out the 
demonstration program, other than for payments for items and services 
furnished under this title and incentive payments under subsection (c), 
in addition to funds otherwise appropriated, there shall be transferred 
to the Secretary for the Center for Medicare & Medicaid Services 
Program Management Account from the Federal Hospital Insurance Trust 
Fund under section 1817 and the Federal Supplementary Medical Insurance 
Trust Fund under section 1841 (in proportions determined appropriate by 
the Secretary) $5,000,000 for each of fiscal years 2010 through 2015. 
Amounts transferred under this subsection for a fiscal year shall be 
available until expended.
    ``(i) Termination.--
        ``(1) Mandatory termination.--The Secretary shall terminate an 
    agreement with an independence at home medical practice if--
            ``(A) the Secretary estimates or determines that such 
        practice will not receive an incentive payment for the second 
        of 2 consecutive years under the demonstration program; or
            ``(B) such practice fails to meet quality standards during 
        any year of the demonstration program.
        ``(2) Permissive termination.--The Secretary may terminate an 
    agreement with an independence at home medical practice for such 
    other reasons determined appropriate by the Secretary.''.

SEC. 3025. HOSPITAL READMISSIONS REDUCTION PROGRAM.

    (a) In General.--Section 1886 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395ww), as amended by sections 3001 and 3008, is amended by adding at 
the end the following new subsection:
    ``(q) Hospital Readmissions Reduction Program.--
        ``(1) In general.--With respect to payment for discharges from 
    an applicable hospital (as defined in paragraph (5)(C)) occurring 
    during a fiscal year beginning on or after October 1, 2012, in 
    order to account for excess readmissions in the hospital, the 
    Secretary shall reduce the payments that would otherwise be made to 
    such hospital under subsection (d) (or section 1814(b)(3), as the 
    case may be) for such a discharge by an amount equal to the product 
    of--
            ``(A) the base operating DRG payment amount (as defined in 
        paragraph (2)) for the discharge; and
            ``(B) the adjustment factor (described in paragraph (3)(A)) 
        for the hospital for the fiscal year.
        ``(2) Base operating drg payment amount defined.--
            ``(A) In general.--Except as provided in subparagraph (B), 
        in this subsection, the term `base operating DRG payment 
        amount' means, with respect to a hospital for a fiscal year--
                ``(i) the payment amount that would otherwise be made 
            under subsection (d) (determined without regard to 
            subsection (o)) for a discharge if this subsection did not 
            apply; reduced by
                ``(ii) any portion of such payment amount that is 
            attributable to payments under paragraphs (5)(A), (5)(B), 
            (5)(F), and (12) of subsection (d).
            ``(B) Special rules for certain hospitals.--
                ``(i) Sole community hospitals and medicare-dependent, 
            small rural hospitals.--In the case of a medicare-
            dependent, small rural hospital (with respect to discharges 
            occurring during fiscal years 2012 and 2013) or a sole 
            community hospital, in applying subparagraph (A)(i), the 
            payment amount that would otherwise be made under 
            subsection (d) shall be determined without regard to 
            subparagraphs (I) and (L) of subsection (b)(3) and 
            subparagraphs (D) and (G) of subsection (d)(5).
                ``(ii) Hospitals paid under section 1814.--In the case 
            of a hospital that is paid under section 1814(b)(3), the 
            Secretary may exempt such hospitals provided that States 
            paid under such section submit an annual report to the 
            Secretary describing how a similar program in the State for 
            a participating hospital or hospitals achieves or surpasses 
            the measured results in terms of patient health outcomes 
            and cost savings established herein with respect to this 
            section.
        ``(3) Adjustment factor.--
            ``(A) In general.--For purposes of paragraph (1), the 
        adjustment factor under this paragraph for an applicable 
        hospital for a fiscal year is equal to the greater of--
                ``(i) the ratio described in subparagraph (B) for the 
            hospital for the applicable period (as defined in paragraph 
            (5)(D)) for such fiscal year; or
                ``(ii) the floor adjustment factor specified in 
            subparagraph (C).
            ``(B) Ratio.--The ratio described in this subparagraph for 
        a hospital for an applicable period is equal to 1 minus the 
        ratio of--
                ``(i) the aggregate payments for excess readmissions 
            (as defined in paragraph (4)(A)) with respect to an 
            applicable hospital for the applicable period; and
                ``(ii) the aggregate payments for all discharges (as 
            defined in paragraph (4)(B)) with respect to such 
            applicable hospital for such applicable period.
            ``(C) Floor adjustment factor.--For purposes of 
        subparagraph (A), the floor adjustment factor specified in this 
        subparagraph for--
                ``(i) fiscal year 2013 is 0.99;
                ``(ii) fiscal year 2014 is 0.98; or
                ``(iii) fiscal year 2015 and subsequent fiscal years is 
            0.97.
        ``(4) Aggregate payments, excess readmission ratio defined.--
    For purposes of this subsection:
            ``(A) Aggregate payments for excess readmissions.--The term 
        `aggregate payments for excess readmissions' means, for a 
        hospital for an applicable period, the sum, for applicable 
        conditions (as defined in paragraph (5)(A)), of the product, 
        for each applicable condition, of--
                ``(i) the base operating DRG payment amount for such 
            hospital for such applicable period for such condition;
                ``(ii) the number of admissions for such condition for 
            such hospital for such applicable period; and
                ``(iii) the excess readmissions ratio (as defined in 
            subparagraph (C)) for such hospital for such applicable 
            period minus 1.
            ``(B) Aggregate payments for all discharges.--The term 
        `aggregate payments for all discharges' means, for a hospital 
        for an applicable period, the sum of the base operating DRG 
        payment amounts for all discharges for all conditions from such 
        hospital for such applicable period.
            ``(C) Excess readmission ratio.--
                ``(i) In general.--Subject to clause (ii), the term 
            `excess readmissions ratio' means, with respect to an 
            applicable condition for a hospital for an applicable 
            period, the ratio (but not less than 1.0) of--

                    ``(I) the risk adjusted readmissions based on 
                actual readmissions, as determined consistent with a 
                readmission measure methodology that has been endorsed 
                under paragraph (5)(A)(ii)(I), for an applicable 
                hospital for such condition with respect to such 
                applicable period; to
                    ``(II) the risk adjusted expected readmissions (as 
                determined consistent with such a methodology) for such 
                hospital for such condition with respect to such 
                applicable period.

                ``(ii) Exclusion of certain readmissions.--For purposes 
            of clause (i), with respect to a hospital, excess 
            readmissions shall not include readmissions for an 
            applicable condition for which there are fewer than a 
            minimum number (as determined by the Secretary) of 
            discharges for such applicable condition for the applicable 
            period and such hospital.
        ``(5) Definitions.--For purposes of this subsection:
            ``(A) Applicable condition.--The term `applicable 
        condition' means, subject to subparagraph (B), a condition or 
        procedure selected by the Secretary among conditions and 
        procedures for which--
                ``(i) readmissions (as defined in subparagraph (E)) 
            that represent conditions or procedures that are high 
            volume or high expenditures under this title (or other 
            criteria specified by the Secretary); and
                ``(ii) measures of such readmissions--

                    ``(I) have been endorsed by the entity with a 
                contract under section 1890(a); and
                    ``(II) such endorsed measures have exclusions for 
                readmissions that are unrelated to the prior discharge 
                (such as a planned readmission or transfer to another 
                applicable hospital).

            ``(B) Expansion of applicable conditions.--Beginning with 
        fiscal year 2015, the Secretary shall, to the extent 
        practicable, expand the applicable conditions beyond the 3 
        conditions for which measures have been endorsed as described 
        in subparagraph (A)(ii)(I) as of the date of the enactment of 
        this subsection to the additional 4 conditions that have been 
        identified by the Medicare Payment Advisory Commission in its 
        report to Congress in June 2007 and to other conditions and 
        procedures as determined appropriate by the Secretary. In 
        expanding such applicable conditions, the Secretary shall seek 
        the endorsement described in subparagraph (A)(ii)(I) but may 
        apply such measures without such an endorsement in the case of 
        a specified area or medical topic determined appropriate by the 
        Secretary for which a feasible and practical measure has not 
        been endorsed by the entity with a contract under section 
        1890(a) as long as due consideration is given to measures that 
        have been endorsed or adopted by a consensus organization 
        identified by the Secretary.
            ``(C) Applicable hospital.--The term `applicable hospital' 
        means a subsection (d) hospital or a hospital that is paid 
        under section 1814(b)(3), as the case may be.
            ``(D) Applicable period.--The term `applicable period' 
        means, with respect to a fiscal year, such period as the 
        Secretary shall specify.
            ``(E) Readmission.--The term `readmission' means, in the 
        case of an individual who is discharged from an applicable 
        hospital, the admission of the individual to the same or 
        another applicable hospital within a time period specified by 
        the Secretary from the date of such discharge. Insofar as the 
        discharge relates to an applicable condition for which there is 
        an endorsed measure described in subparagraph (A)(ii)(I), such 
        time period (such as 30 days) shall be consistent with the time 
        period specified for such measure.
        ``(6) Reporting hospital specific information.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Secretary shall make information 
        available to the public regarding readmission rates of each 
        subsection (d) hospital under the program.
            ``(B) Opportunity to review and submit corrections.--The 
        Secretary shall ensure that a subsection (d) hospital has the 
        opportunity to review, and submit corrections for, the 
        information to be made public with respect to the hospital 
        under subparagraph (A) prior to such information being made 
        public.
            ``(C) Website.--Such information shall be posted on the 
        Hospital Compare Internet website in an easily understandable 
        format.
        ``(7) Limitations on review.--There shall be no administrative 
    or judicial review under section 1869, section 1878, or otherwise 
    of the following:
            ``(A) The determination of base operating DRG payment 
        amounts.
            ``(B) The methodology for determining the adjustment factor 
        under paragraph (3), including excess readmissions ratio under 
        paragraph (4)(C), aggregate payments for excess readmissions 
        under paragraph (4)(A), and aggregate payments for all 
        discharges under paragraph (4)(B), and applicable periods and 
        applicable conditions under paragraph (5).
            ``(C) The measures of readmissions as described in 
        paragraph (5)(A)(ii).
        ``(8) Readmission rates for all patients.--
            ``(A) Calculation of readmission.--The Secretary shall 
        calculate readmission rates for all patients (as defined in 
        subparagraph (D)) for a specified hospital (as defined in 
        subparagraph (D)(ii)) for an applicable condition (as defined 
        in paragraph (5)(B)) and other conditions deemed appropriate by 
        the Secretary for an applicable period (as defined in paragraph 
        (5)(D)) in the same manner as used to calculate such 
        readmission rates for hospitals with respect to this title and 
        posted on the CMS Hospital Compare website.
            ``(B) Posting of hospital specific all patient readmission 
        rates.--The Secretary shall make information on all patient 
        readmission rates calculated under subparagraph (A) available 
        on the CMS Hospital Compare website in a form and manner 
        determined appropriate by the Secretary. The Secretary may also 
        make other information determined appropriate by the Secretary 
        available on such website.
            ``(C) Hospital submission of all patient data.--
                ``(i) Except as provided for in clause (ii), each 
            specified hospital (as defined in subparagraph (D)(ii)) 
            shall submit to the Secretary, in a form, manner and time 
            specified by the Secretary, data and information determined 
            necessary by the Secretary for the Secretary to calculate 
            the all patient readmission rates described in subparagraph 
            (A).
                ``(ii) Instead of a specified hospital submitting to 
            the Secretary the data and information described in clause 
            (i), such data and information may be submitted to the 
            Secretary, on behalf of such a specified hospital, by a 
            state or an entity determined appropriate by the Secretary.
            ``(D) Definitions.--For purposes of this paragraph:
                ``(i) The term `all patients' means patients who are 
            treated on an inpatient basis and discharged from a 
            specified hospital (as defined in clause (ii)).
                ``(ii) The term `specified hospital' means a subsection 
            (d) hospital, hospitals described in clauses (i) through 
            (v) of subsection (d)(1)(B) and, as determined feasible and 
            appropriate by the Secretary, other hospitals not otherwise 
            described in this subparagraph.''.
    (b) Quality Improvement.--Part S of title III of the Public Health 
Service Act, as amended by section 3015, is further amended by adding 
at the end the following:

``SEC. 399KK. QUALITY IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM FOR HOSPITALS WITH A HIGH 
              SEVERITY ADJUSTED READMISSION RATE.

    ``(a) Establishment.--
        ``(1) In general.--Not later than 2 years after the date of 
    enactment of this section, the Secretary shall make available a 
    program for eligible hospitals to improve their readmission rates 
    through the use of patient safety organizations (as defined in 
    section 921(4)).
        ``(2) Eligible hospital defined.--In this subsection, the term 
    `eligible hospital' means a hospital that the Secretary determines 
    has a high rate of risk adjusted readmissions for the conditions 
    described in section 1886(q)(8)(A) of the Social Security Act and 
    has not taken appropriate steps to reduce such readmissions and 
    improve patient safety as evidenced through historically high rates 
    of readmissions, as determined by the Secretary.
        ``(3) Risk adjustment.--The Secretary shall utilize appropriate 
    risk adjustment measures to determine eligible hospitals.
    ``(b) Report to the Secretary.--As determined appropriate by the 
Secretary, eligible hospitals and patient safety organizations working 
with those hospitals shall report to the Secretary on the processes 
employed by the hospital to improve readmission rates and the impact of 
such processes on readmission rates.''.

SEC. 3026. COMMUNITY-BASED CARE TRANSITIONS PROGRAM.

    (a) In General.--The Secretary shall establish a Community-Based 
Care Transitions Program under which the Secretary provides funding to 
eligible entities that furnish improved care transition services to 
high-risk Medicare beneficiaries.
    (b) Definitions.--In this section:
        (1) Eligible entity.--The term ``eligible entity'' means the 
    following:
            (A) A subsection (d) hospital (as defined in section 
        1886(d)(1)(B) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
        1395ww(d)(1)(B))) identified by the Secretary as having a high 
        readmission rate, such as under section 1886(q) of the Social 
        Security Act, as added by section 3025.
            (B) An appropriate community-based organization that 
        provides care transition services under this section across a 
        continuum of care through arrangements with subsection (d) 
        hospitals (as so defined) to furnish the services described in 
        subsection (c)(2)(B)(i) and whose governing body includes 
        sufficient representation of multiple health care stakeholders 
        (including consumers).
        (2) High-risk medicare beneficiary.--The term ``high-risk 
    Medicare beneficiary'' means a Medicare beneficiary who has 
    attained a minimum hierarchical condition category score, as 
    determined by the Secretary, based on a diagnosis of multiple 
    chronic conditions or other risk factors associated with a hospital 
    readmission or substandard transition into post-hospitalization 
    care, which may include 1 or more of the following:
            (A) Cognitive impairment.
            (B) Depression.
            (C) A history of multiple readmissions.
            (D) Any other chronic disease or risk factor as determined 
        by the Secretary.
        (3) Medicare beneficiary.--The term ``Medicare beneficiary'' 
    means an individual who is entitled to benefits under part A of 
    title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395 et seq.) and 
    enrolled under part B of such title, but not enrolled under part C 
    of such title.
        (4) Program.--The term ``program'' means the program conducted 
    under this section.
        (5) Readmission.--The term ``readmission'' has the meaning 
    given such term in section 1886(q)(5)(E) of the Social Security 
    Act, as added by section 3025.
        (6) Secretary.--The term ``Secretary'' means the Secretary of 
    Health and Human Services.
    (c) Requirements.--
        (1) Duration.--
            (A) In general.--The program shall be conducted for a 5-
        year period, beginning January 1, 2011.
            (B) Expansion.--The Secretary may expand the duration and 
        the scope of the program, to the extent determined appropriate 
        by the Secretary, if the Secretary determines (and the Chief 
        Actuary of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services, with 
        respect to spending under this title, certifies) that such 
        expansion would reduce spending under this title without 
        reducing quality.
        (2) Application; participation.--
            (A) In general.--
                (i) Application.--An eligible entity seeking to 
            participate in the program shall submit an application to 
            the Secretary at such time, in such manner, and containing 
            such information as the Secretary may require.
                (ii) Partnership.--If an eligible entity is a hospital, 
            such hospital shall enter into a partnership with a 
            community-based organization to participate in the program.
            (B) Intervention proposal.--Subject to subparagraph (C), an 
        application submitted under subparagraph (A)(i) shall include a 
        detailed proposal for at least 1 care transition intervention, 
        which may include the following:
                (i) Initiating care transition services for a high-risk 
            Medicare beneficiary not later than 24 hours prior to the 
            discharge of the beneficiary from the eligible entity.
                (ii) Arranging timely post-discharge follow-up services 
            to the high-risk Medicare beneficiary to provide the 
            beneficiary (and, as appropriate, the primary caregiver of 
            the beneficiary) with information regarding responding to 
            symptoms that may indicate additional health problems or a 
            deteriorating condition.
                (iii) Providing the high-risk Medicare beneficiary 
            (and, as appropriate, the primary caregiver of the 
            beneficiary) with assistance to ensure productive and 
            timely interactions between patients and post-acute and 
            outpatient providers.
                (iv) Assessing and actively engaging with a high-risk 
            Medicare beneficiary (and, as appropriate, the primary 
            caregiver of the beneficiary) through the provision of 
            self-management support and relevant information that is 
            specific to the beneficiary's condition.
                (v) Conducting comprehensive medication review and 
            management (including, if appropriate, counseling and self-
            management support).
            (C) Limitation.--A care transition intervention proposed 
        under subparagraph (B) may not include payment for services 
        required under the discharge planning process described in 
        section 1861(ee) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
        1395x(ee)).
        (3) Selection.--In selecting eligible entities to participate 
    in the program, the Secretary shall give priority to eligible 
    entities that--
            (A) participate in a program administered by the 
        Administration on Aging to provide concurrent care transitions 
        interventions with multiple hospitals and practitioners; or
            (B) provide services to medically underserved populations, 
        small communities, and rural areas.
    (d) Implementation.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 
the Secretary may implement the provisions of this section by program 
instruction or otherwise.
    (e) Waiver Authority.--The Secretary may waive such requirements of 
titles XI and XVIII of the Social Security Act as may be necessary to 
carry out the program.
    (f) Funding.--For purposes of carrying out this section, the 
Secretary of Health and Human Services shall provide for the transfer, 
from the Federal Hospital Insurance Trust Fund under section 1817 of 
the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395i) and the Federal Supplementary 
Medical Insurance Trust Fund under section 1841 of such Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395t), in such proportion as the Secretary determines appropriate, of 
$500,000,000, to the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services Program 
Management Account for the period of fiscal years 2011 through 2015. 
Amounts transferred under the preceding sentence shall remain available 
until expended.

SEC. 3027. EXTENSION OF GAINSHARING DEMONSTRATION.

    (a) In General.--Subsection (d)(3) of section 5007 of the Deficit 
Reduction Act of 2005 (Public Law 109-171) is amended by inserting 
``(or September 30, 2011, in the case of a demonstration project in 
operation as of October 1, 2008)'' after ``December 31, 2009''.
    (b) Funding.--
        (1) In general.--Subsection (f)(1) of such section is amended 
    by inserting ``and for fiscal year 2010, $1,600,000,'' after 
    ``$6,000,000,''.
        (2) Availability.--Subsection (f)(2) of such section is amended 
    by striking ``2010'' and inserting ``2014 or until expended''.
    (c) Reports.--
        (1) Quality improvement and savings.--Subsection (e)(3) of such 
    section is amended by striking ``December 1, 2008'' and inserting 
    ``March 31, 2011''.
        (2) Final report.--Subsection (e)(4) of such section is amended 
    by striking ``May 1, 2010'' and inserting ``March 31, 2013''.

       Subtitle B--Improving Medicare for Patients and Providers

    PART I--ENSURING BENEFICIARY ACCESS TO PHYSICIAN CARE AND OTHER 
                                SERVICES

SEC. 3101. INCREASE IN THE PHYSICIAN PAYMENT UPDATE.

    Section 1848(d) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-4(d)) 
is amended by adding at the end the following new paragraph:
        ``(10) Update for 2010.--
            ``(A) In general.--Subject to paragraphs (7)(B), (8)(B), 
        and (9)(B), in lieu of the update to the single conversion 
        factor established in paragraph (1)(C) that would otherwise 
        apply for 2010, the update to the single conversion factor 
        shall be 0.5 percent.
            ``(B) No effect on computation of conversion factor for 
        2011 and subsequent years.--The conversion factor under this 
        subsection shall be computed under paragraph (1)(A) for 2011 
        and subsequent years as if subparagraph (A) had never 
        applied.''.

SEC. 3102. EXTENSION OF THE WORK GEOGRAPHIC INDEX FLOOR AND REVISIONS 
              TO THE PRACTICE EXPENSE GEOGRAPHIC ADJUSTMENT UNDER THE 
              MEDICARE PHYSICIAN FEE SCHEDULE.

    (a) Extension of Work GPCI Floor.--Section 1848(e)(1)(E) of the 
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-4(e)(1)(E)) is amended by striking 
``before January 1, 2010'' and inserting ``before January 1, 2011''.
    (b) Practice Expense Geographic Adjustment for 2010 and Subsequent 
Years.--Section 1848(e)(1) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395w4(e)(1)) is amended--
        (1) in subparagraph (A), by striking ``and (G)'' and inserting 
    ``(G), and (H)''; and
        (2) by adding at the end the following new subparagraph:
            ``(H) Practice expense geographic adjustment for 2010 and 
        subsequent years.--
                ``(i) For 2010.--Subject to clause (iii), for services 
            furnished during 2010, the employee wage and rent portions 
            of the practice expense geographic index described in 
            subparagraph (A)(i) shall reflect \3/4\ of the difference 
            between the relative costs of employee wages and rents in 
            each of the different fee schedule areas and the national 
            average of such employee wages and rents.
                ``(ii) For 2011.--Subject to clause (iii), for services 
            furnished during 2011, the employee wage and rent portions 
            of the practice expense geographic index described in 
            subparagraph (A)(i) shall reflect \1/2\ of the difference 
            between the relative costs of employee wages and rents in 
            each of the different fee schedule areas and the national 
            average of such employee wages and rents.
                ``(iii) Hold harmless.--The practice expense portion of 
            the geographic adjustment factor applied in a fee schedule 
            area for services furnished in 2010 or 2011 shall not, as a 
            result of the application of clause (i) or (ii), be reduced 
            below the practice expense portion of the geographic 
            adjustment factor under subparagraph (A)(i) (as calculated 
            prior to the application of such clause (i) or (ii), 
            respectively) for such area for such year.
                ``(iv) Analysis.--The Secretary shall analyze current 
            methods of establishing practice expense geographic 
            adjustments under subparagraph (A)(i) and evaluate data 
            that fairly and reliably establishes distinctions in the 
            costs of operating a medical practice in the different fee 
            schedule areas. Such analysis shall include an evaluation 
            of the following:

                    ``(I) The feasibility of using actual data or 
                reliable survey data developed by medical organizations 
                on the costs of operating a medical practice, including 
                office rents and non-physician staff wages, in 
                different fee schedule areas.
                    ``(II) The office expense portion of the practice 
                expense geographic adjustment described in subparagraph 
                (A)(i), including the extent to which types of office 
                expenses are determined in local markets instead of 
                national markets.
                    ``(III) The weights assigned to each of the 
                categories within the practice expense geographic 
                adjustment described in subparagraph (A)(i).

                ``(v) Revision for 2012 and subsequent years.--As a 
            result of the analysis described in clause (iv), the 
            Secretary shall, not later than January 1, 2012, make 
            appropriate adjustments to the practice expense geographic 
            adjustment described in subparagraph (A)(i) to ensure 
            accurate geographic adjustments across fee schedule areas, 
            including--

                    ``(I) basing the office rents component and its 
                weight on office expenses that vary among fee schedule 
                areas; and
                    ``(II) considering a representative range of 
                professional and non-professional personnel employed in 
                a medical office based on the use of the American 
                Community Survey data or other reliable data for wage 
                adjustments.

            Such adjustments shall be made without regard to 
            adjustments made pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) and shall 
            be made in a budget neutral manner.''.

SEC. 3103. EXTENSION OF EXCEPTIONS PROCESS FOR MEDICARE THERAPY CAPS.

    Section 1833(g)(5) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395l(g)(5)) is amended by striking ``December 31, 2009'' and inserting 
``December 31, 2010''.

SEC. 3104. EXTENSION OF PAYMENT FOR TECHNICAL COMPONENT OF CERTAIN 
              PHYSICIAN PATHOLOGY SERVICES.

    Section 542(c) of the Medicare, Medicaid, and SCHIP Benefits 
Improvement and Protection Act of 2000 (as enacted into law by section 
1(a)(6) of Public Law 106-554), as amended by section 732 of the 
Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 
(42 U.S.C. 1395w-4 note), section 104 of division B of the Tax Relief 
and Health Care Act of 2006 (42 U.S.C. 1395w-4 note), section 104 of 
the Medicare, Medicaid, and SCHIP Extension Act of 2007 (Public Law 
110-173), and section 136 of the Medicare Improvements for Patients and 
Providers Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-275), is amended by striking 
``and 2009'' and inserting ``2009, and 2010''.

SEC. 3105. EXTENSION OF AMBULANCE ADD-ONS.

    (a) Ground Ambulance.--Section 1834(l)(13)(A) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395m(l)(13)(A)) is amended--
        (1) in the matter preceding clause (i)--
            (A) by striking ``2007, and for'' and inserting ``2007, 
        for''; and
            (B) by striking ``2010'' and inserting ``2010, and for such 
        services furnished on or after April 1, 2010, and before 
        January 1, 2011,''; and
        (2) in each of clauses (i) and (ii), by inserting ``, and on or 
    after April 1, 2010, and before January 1, 2011'' after ``January 
    1, 2010'' each place it appears.
    (b) Air Ambulance.--Section 146(b)(1) of the Medicare Improvements 
for Patients and Providers Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-275) is amended 
by striking ``December 31, 2009'' and inserting ``December 31, 2009, 
and during the period beginning on April 1, 2010, and ending on January 
1, 2011''.
    (c) Super Rural Ambulance.--Section 1834(l)(12)(A) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395m(l)(12)(A)) is amended by striking 
``2010'' and inserting ``2010, and on or after April 1, 2010, and 
before January 1, 2011''.

SEC. 3106. EXTENSION OF CERTAIN PAYMENT RULES FOR LONG-TERM CARE 
              HOSPITAL SERVICES AND OF MORATORIUM ON THE ESTABLISHMENT 
              OF CERTAIN HOSPITALS AND FACILITIES.

    (a) Extension of Certain Payment Rules.--Section 114(c) of the 
Medicare, Medicaid, and SCHIP Extension Act of 2007 (42 U.S.C. 1395ww 
note), as amended by section 4302(a) of the American Recovery and 
Reinvestment Act (Public Law 111-5), is further amended by striking 
``3-year period'' each place it appears and inserting ``4-year 
period''.
    (b) Extension of Moratorium.--Section 114(d)(1) of such Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395ww note), in the matter preceding subparagraph (A), is 
amended by striking ``3-year period'' and inserting ``4-year period''.

SEC. 3107. EXTENSION OF PHYSICIAN FEE SCHEDULE MENTAL HEALTH ADD-ON.

    Section 138(a)(1) of the Medicare Improvements for Patients and 
Providers Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-275) is amended by striking 
``December 31, 2009'' and inserting ``December 31, 2010''.

SEC. 3108. PERMITTING PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS TO ORDER POST-HOSPITAL 
              EXTENDED CARE SERVICES.

    (a) Ordering Post-Hospital Extended Care Services.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1814(a)(2) of the Social Security Act 
    (42 U.S.C. 1395f(a)(2)), in the matter preceding subparagraph (A), 
    is amended by striking ``or clinical nurse specialist'' and 
    inserting ``, a clinical nurse specialist, or a physician assistant 
    (as those terms are defined in section 1861(aa)(5))'' after ``nurse 
    practitioner''.
        (2) Conforming amendment.--Section 1814(a) of the Social 
    Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395f(a)) is amended, in the second 
    sentence, by striking ``or clinical nurse specialist'' and 
    inserting ``clinical nurse specialist, or physician assistant'' 
    after ``nurse practitioner,''.
    (b) Effective Date.--The amendments made by this section shall 
apply to items and services furnished on or after January 1, 2011.

SEC. 3109. EXEMPTION OF CERTAIN PHARMACIES FROM ACCREDITATION 
              REQUIREMENTS.

    (a) In General.--Section 1834(a)(20) of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395m(a)(20)), as added by section 154(b)(1)(A) of the Medicare 
Improvements for Patients and Providers Act of 2008 (Public Law 100-
275), is amended--
        (1) in subparagraph (F)(i)--
            (A) by inserting ``and subparagraph (G)'' after ``clause 
        (ii)''; and
            (B) by inserting ``, except that the Secretary shall not 
        require a pharmacy to have submitted to the Secretary such 
        evidence of accreditation prior to January 1, 2011'' before the 
        semicolon at the end; and
        (2) by adding at the end the following new subparagraph:
            ``(G) Application of accreditation requirement to certain 
        pharmacies.--
                ``(i) In general.--With respect to items and services 
            furnished on or after January 1, 2011, in implementing 
            quality standards under this paragraph--

                    ``(I) subject to subclause (II), in applying such 
                standards and the accreditation requirement of 
                subparagraph (F)(i) with respect to pharmacies 
                described in clause (ii) furnishing such items and 
                services, such standards and accreditation requirement 
                shall not apply to such pharmacies; and
                    ``(II) the Secretary may apply to such pharmacies 
                an alternative accreditation requirement established by 
                the Secretary if the Secretary determines such 
                alternative accreditation requirement is more 
                appropriate for such pharmacies.

                ``(ii) Pharmacies described.--A pharmacy described in 
            this clause is a pharmacy that meets each of the following 
            criteria:

                    ``(I) The total billings by the pharmacy for such 
                items and services under this title are less than 5 
                percent of total pharmacy sales, as determined based on 
                the average total pharmacy sales for the previous 3 
                calendar years, 3 fiscal years, or other yearly period 
                specified by the Secretary.
                    ``(II) The pharmacy has been enrolled under section 
                1866(j) as a supplier of durable medical equipment, 
                prosthetics, orthotics, and supplies, has been issued 
                (which may include the renewal of) a provider number 
                for at least 5 years, and for which a final adverse 
                action (as defined in section 424.57(a) of title 42, 
                Code of Federal Regulations) has not been imposed in 
                the past 5 years.
                    ``(III) The pharmacy submits to the Secretary an 
                attestation, in a form and manner, and at a time, 
                specified by the Secretary, that the pharmacy meets the 
                criteria described in subclauses (I) and (II). Such 
                attestation shall be subject to section 1001 of title 
                18, United States Code.
                    ``(IV) The pharmacy agrees to submit materials as 
                requested by the Secretary, or during the course of an 
                audit conducted on a random sample of pharmacies 
                selected annually, to verify that the pharmacy meets 
                the criteria described in subclauses (I) and (II). 
                Materials submitted under the preceding sentence shall 
                include a certification by an accountant on behalf of 
                the pharmacy or the submission of tax returns filed by 
                the pharmacy during the relevant periods, as requested 
                by the Secretary.''.

    (b) Administration.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 
the Secretary may implement the amendments made by subsection (a) by 
program instruction or otherwise.
    (c) Rule of Construction.--Nothing in the provisions of or 
amendments made by this section shall be construed as affecting the 
application of an accreditation requirement for pharmacies to qualify 
for bidding in a competitive acquisition area under section 1847 of the 
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-3).

SEC. 3110. PART B SPECIAL ENROLLMENT PERIOD FOR DISABLED TRICARE 
              BENEFICIARIES.

    (a) In General.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1837 of the Social Security Act (42 
    U.S.C. 1395p) is amended by adding at the end the following new 
    subsection:
    ``(l)(1) In the case of any individual who is a covered beneficiary 
(as defined in section 1072(5) of title 10, United States Code) at the 
time the individual is entitled to part A under section 226(b) or 
section 226A and who is eligible to enroll but who has elected not to 
enroll (or to be deemed enrolled) during the individual's initial 
enrollment period, there shall be a special enrollment period described 
in paragraph (2).
    ``(2) The special enrollment period described in this paragraph, 
with respect to an individual, is the 12-month period beginning on the 
day after the last day of the initial enrollment period of the 
individual or, if later, the 12-month period beginning with the month 
the individual is notified of enrollment under this section.
    ``(3) In the case of an individual who enrolls during the special 
enrollment period provided under paragraph (1), the coverage period 
under this part shall begin on the first day of the month in which the 
individual enrolls, or, at the option of the individual, the first 
month after the end of the individual's initial enrollment period.
    ``(4) An individual may only enroll during the special enrollment 
period provided under paragraph (1) one time during the individual's 
lifetime.
    ``(5) The Secretary shall ensure that the materials relating to 
coverage under this part that are provided to an individual described 
in paragraph (1) prior to the individual's initial enrollment period 
contain information concerning the impact of not enrolling under this 
part, including the impact on health care benefits under the TRICARE 
program under chapter 55 of title 10, United States Code.
    ``(6) The Secretary of Defense shall collaborate with the Secretary 
of Health and Human Services and the Commissioner of Social Security to 
provide for the accurate identification of individuals described in 
paragraph (1). The Secretary of Defense shall provide such individuals 
with notification with respect to this subsection. The Secretary of 
Defense shall collaborate with the Secretary of Health and Human 
Services and the Commissioner of Social Security to ensure appropriate 
follow up pursuant to any notification provided under the preceding 
sentence.''.
        (2) Effective date.--The amendment made by paragraph (1) shall 
    apply to elections made with respect to initial enrollment periods 
    that end after the date of the enactment of this Act.
    (b) Waiver of Increase of Premium.--Section 1839(b) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395r(b)) is amended by striking ``section 
1837(i)(4)'' and inserting ``subsection (i)(4) or (l) of section 
1837''.

SEC. 3111. PAYMENT FOR BONE DENSITY TESTS.

    (a) Payment.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1848 of the Social Security Act (42 
    U.S.C. 1395w-4) is amended--
            (A) in subsection (b)--
                (i) in paragraph (4)(B), by inserting ``, and for 2010 
            and 2011, dual-energy x-ray absorptiometry services (as 
            described in paragraph (6))'' before the period at the end; 
            and
                (ii) by adding at the end the following new paragraph:
        ``(6) Treatment of bone mass scans.--For dual-energy x-ray 
    absorptiometry services (identified in 2006 by HCPCS codes 76075 
    and 76077 (and any succeeding codes)) furnished during 2010 and 
    2011, instead of the payment amount that would otherwise be 
    determined under this section for such years, the payment amount 
    shall be equal to 70 percent of the product of--
            ``(A) the relative value for the service (as determined in 
        subsection (c)(2)) for 2006;
            ``(B) the conversion factor (established under subsection 
        (d)) for 2006; and
            ``(C) the geographic adjustment factor (established under 
        subsection (e)(2)) for the service for the fee schedule area 
        for 2010 and 2011, respectively.''; and
            (B) in subsection (c)(2)(B)(iv)--
                (i) in subclause (II), by striking ``and'' at the end;
                (ii) in subclause (III), by striking the period at the 
            end and inserting ``; and''; and
                (iii) by adding at the end the following new subclause:

                    ``(IV) subsection (b)(6) shall not be taken into 
                account in applying clause (ii)(II) for 2010 or 
                2011.''.

        (2) Implementation.--Notwithstanding any other provision of 
    law, the Secretary may implement the amendments made by paragraph 
    (1) by program instruction or otherwise.
    (b) Study and Report by the Institute of Medicine.--
        (1) In general.--The Secretary of Health and Human Services is 
    authorized to enter into an agreement with the Institute of 
    Medicine of the National Academies to conduct a study on the 
    ramifications of Medicare payment reductions for dual-energy x-ray 
    absorptiometry (as described in section 1848(b)(6) of the Social 
    Security Act, as added by subsection (a)(1)) during 2007, 2008, and 
    2009 on beneficiary access to bone mass density tests.
        (2) Report.--An agreement entered into under paragraph (1) 
    shall provide for the Institute of Medicine to submit to the 
    Secretary and to Congress a report containing the results of the 
    study conducted under such paragraph.

SEC. 3112. REVISION TO THE MEDICARE IMPROVEMENT FUND.

    Section 1898(b)(1)(A) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395iii) is amended by striking ``$22,290,000,000'' and inserting 
``$0''.

SEC. 3113. TREATMENT OF CERTAIN COMPLEX DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY TESTS.

    (a) Demonstration Project.--
        (1) In general.--The Secretary of Health and Human Services (in 
    this section referred to as the ``Secretary'') shall conduct a 
    demonstration project under part B title XVIII of the Social 
    Security Act under which separate payments are made under such part 
    for complex diagnostic laboratory tests provided to individuals 
    under such part. Under the demonstration project, the Secretary 
    shall establish appropriate payment rates for such tests.
        (2) Covered complex diagnostic laboratory test defined.--In 
    this section, the term ``complex diagnostic laboratory test'' means 
    a diagnostic laboratory test--
            (A) that is an analysis of gene protein expression, 
        topographic genotyping, or a cancer chemotherapy sensitivity 
        assay;
            (B) that is determined by the Secretary to be a laboratory 
        test for which there is not an alternative test having 
        equivalent performance characteristics;
            (C) which is billed using a Health Care Procedure Coding 
        System (HCPCS) code other than a not otherwise classified code 
        under such Coding System;
            (D) which is approved or cleared by the Food and Drug 
        Administration or is covered under title XVIII of the Social 
        Security Act; and
            (E) is described in section 1861(s)(3) of the Social 
        Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395x(s)(3)).
        (3) Separate payment defined.--In this section, the term 
    ``separate payment'' means direct payment to a laboratory 
    (including a hospital-based or independent laboratory) that 
    performs a complex diagnostic laboratory test with respect to a 
    specimen collected from an individual during a period in which the 
    individual is a patient of a hospital if the test is performed 
    after such period of hospitalization and if separate payment would 
    not otherwise be made under title XVIII of the Social Security Act 
    by reason of sections 1862(a)(14) and 1866(a)(1)(H)(i) of the such 
    Act (42 U.S.C. 1395y(a)(14); 42 U.S.C. 1395cc(a)(1)(H)(i)).
    (b) Duration.--Subject to subsection (c)(2), the Secretary shall 
conduct the demonstration project under this section for the 2-year 
period beginning on July 1, 2011.
    (c) Payments and Limitation.--Payments under the demonstration 
project under this section shall--
        (1) be made from the Federal Supplemental Medical Insurance 
    Trust Fund under section 1841 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
    1395t); and
        (2) may not exceed $100,000,000.
    (d) Report.--Not later than 2 years after the completion of the 
demonstration project under this section, the Secretary shall submit to 
Congress a report on the project. Such report shall include--
        (1) an assessment of the impact of the demonstration project on 
    access to care, quality of care, health outcomes, and expenditures 
    under title XVIII of the Social Security Act (including any savings 
    under such title); and
        (2) such recommendations as the Secretary determines 
    appropriate.
    (e) Implementation Funding.--For purposes of administering this 
section (including preparing and submitting the report under subsection 
(d)), the Secretary shall provide for the transfer, from the Federal 
Supplemental Medical Insurance Trust Fund under section 1841 of the 
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395t), to the Centers for Medicare & 
Medicaid Services Program Management Account, of $5,000,000. Amounts 
transferred under the preceding sentence shall remain available until 
expended.

SEC. 3114. IMPROVED ACCESS FOR CERTIFIED NURSE-MIDWIFE SERVICES.

    Section 1833(a)(1)(K) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395l(a)(1)(K)) is amended by inserting ``(or 100 percent for services 
furnished on or after January 1, 2011)'' after ``1992, 65 percent''.

                       PART II--RURAL PROTECTIONS

SEC. 3121. EXTENSION OF OUTPATIENT HOLD HARMLESS PROVISION.

    (a) In General.--Section 1833(t)(7)(D)(i) of the Social Security 
Act (42 U.S.C. 1395l(t)(7)(D)(i)) is amended--
        (1) in subclause (II)--
            (A) in the first sentence, by striking ``2010''and 
        inserting ``2011''; and
            (B) in the second sentence, by striking ``or 2009'' and 
        inserting ``, 2009, or 2010''; and
        (2) in subclause (III), by striking ``January 1, 2010'' and 
    inserting ``January 1, 2011''.
    (b) Permitting All Sole Community Hospitals To Be Eligible for Hold 
Harmless.--Section 1833(t)(7)(D)(i)(III) of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395l(t)(7)(D)(i)(III)) is amended by adding at the end the 
following new sentence: ``In the case of covered OPD services furnished 
on or after January 1, 2010, and before January 1, 2011, the preceding 
sentence shall be applied without regard to the 100-bed limitation.''.

SEC. 3122. EXTENSION OF MEDICARE REASONABLE COSTS PAYMENTS FOR CERTAIN 
              CLINICAL DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY TESTS FURNISHED TO 
              HOSPITAL PATIENTS IN CERTAIN RURAL AREAS.

    Section 416(b) of the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and 
Modernization Act of 2003 (42 U.S.C. 1395l-4), as amended by section 
105 of division B of the Tax Relief and Health Care Act of 2006 (42 
U.S.C. 1395l note) and section 107 of the Medicare, Medicaid, and SCHIP 
Extension Act of 2007 (42 U.S.C. 1395l note), is amended by inserting 
``or during the 1-year period beginning on July 1, 2010'' before the 
period at the end.

SEC. 3123. EXTENSION OF THE RURAL COMMUNITY HOSPITAL DEMONSTRATION 
              PROGRAM.

    (a) One-year Extension.--Section 410A of the Medicare Prescription 
Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 (Public Law 108-173; 
117 Stat. 2272) is amended by adding at the end the following new 
subsection:
    ``(g) One-Year Extension of Demonstration Program.--
        ``(1) In general.--Subject to the succeeding provisions of this 
    subsection, the Secretary shall conduct the demonstration program 
    under this section for an additional 1-year period (in this section 
    referred to as the `1-year extension period') that begins on the 
    date immediately following the last day of the initial 5-year 
    period under subsection (a)(5).
        ``(2) Expansion of demonstration states.--Notwithstanding 
    subsection (a)(2), during the 1-year extension period, the 
    Secretary shall expand the number of States with low population 
    densities determined by the Secretary under such subsection to 20. 
    In determining which States to include in such expansion, the 
    Secretary shall use the same criteria and data that the Secretary 
    used to determine the States under such subsection for purposes of 
    the initial 5-year period.
        ``(3) Increase in maximum number of hospitals participating in 
    the demonstration program.--Notwithstanding subsection (a)(4), 
    during the 1-year extension period, not more than 30 rural 
    community hospitals may participate in the demonstration program 
    under this section.
        ``(4) No affect on hospitals in demonstration program on date 
    of enactment.--In the case of a rural community hospital that is 
    participating in the demonstration program under this section as of 
    the last day of the initial 5-year period, the Secretary shall 
    provide for the continued participation of such rural community 
    hospital in the demonstration program during the 1-year extension 
    period unless the rural community hospital makes an election, in 
    such form and manner as the Secretary may specify, to discontinue 
    such participation.''.
    (b) Conforming Amendments.--Subsection (a)(5) of section 410A of 
the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 
2003 (Public Law 108-173; 117 Stat. 2272) is amended by inserting ``(in 
this section referred to as the `initial 5-year period') and, as 
provided in subsection (g), for the 1-year extension period'' after 
``5-year period''.
    (c) Technical Amendments.--
        (1) Subsection (b) of section 410A of the Medicare Prescription 
    Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 (Public Law 108-
    173; 117 Stat. 2272) is amended--
            (A) in paragraph (1)(B)(ii), by striking ``2)'' and 
        inserting ``2))''; and
            (B) in paragraph (2), by inserting ``cost'' before 
        ``reporting period'' the first place such term appears in each 
        of subparagraphs (A) and (B).
        (2) Subsection (f)(1) of section 410A of the Medicare 
    Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 
    (Public Law 108-173; 117 Stat. 2272) is amended--
            (A) in subparagraph (A)(ii), by striking ``paragraph (2)'' 
        and inserting ``subparagraph (B)''; and
            (B) in subparagraph (B), by striking ``paragraph (1)(B)'' 
        and inserting ``subparagraph (A)(ii)''.

SEC. 3124. EXTENSION OF THE MEDICARE-DEPENDENT HOSPITAL (MDH) PROGRAM.

    (a) Extension of Payment Methodology.--Section 1886(d)(5)(G) of the 
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ww(d)(5)(G)) is amended--
        (1) in clause (i), by striking ``October 1, 2011'' and 
    inserting ``October 1, 2012''; and
        (2) in clause (ii)(II), by striking ``October 1, 2011'' and 
    inserting ``October 1, 2012''.
    (b) Conforming Amendments.--
        (1) Extension of target amount.--Section 1886(b)(3)(D) of the 
    Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ww(b)(3)(D)) is amended--
            (A) in the matter preceding clause (i), by striking 
        ``October 1, 2011'' and inserting ``October 1, 2012''; and
            (B) in clause (iv), by striking ``through fiscal year 
        2011'' and inserting ``through fiscal year 2012''.
        (2) Permitting hospitals to decline reclassification.--Section 
    13501(e)(2) of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993 (42 
    U.S.C. 1395ww note) is amended by striking ``through fiscal year 
    2011'' and inserting ``through fiscal year 2012''.

SEC. 3125. TEMPORARY IMPROVEMENTS TO THE MEDICARE INPATIENT HOSPITAL 
              PAYMENT ADJUSTMENT FOR LOW-VOLUME HOSPITALS.

    Section 1886(d)(12) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395ww(d)(12)) is amended--
        (1) in subparagraph (A), by inserting ``or (D)'' after 
    ``subparagraph (B)'';
        (2) in subparagraph (B), in the matter preceding clause (i), by 
    striking ``The Secretary'' and inserting ``For discharges occurring 
    in fiscal years 2005 through 2010 and for discharges occurring in 
    fiscal year 2013 and subsequent fiscal years, the Secretary'';
        (3) in subparagraph (C)(i)--
            (A) by inserting ``(or, with respect to fiscal years 2011 
        and 2012, 15 road miles)'' after ``25 road miles''; and
            (B) by inserting ``(or, with respect to fiscal years 2011 
        and 2012, 1,500 discharges of individuals entitled to, or 
        enrolled for, benefits under part A)'' after ``800 
        discharges''; and
        (4) by adding at the end the following new subparagraph:
            ``(D) Temporary applicable percentage increase.--For 
        discharges occurring in fiscal years 2011 and 2012, the 
        Secretary shall determine an applicable percentage increase for 
        purposes of subparagraph (A) using a continuous linear sliding 
        scale ranging from 25 percent for low-volume hospitals with 200 
        or fewer discharges of individuals entitled to, or enrolled 
        for, benefits under part A in the fiscal year to 0 percent for 
        low-volume hospitals with greater than 1,500 discharges of such 
        individuals in the fiscal year.''.

SEC. 3126. IMPROVEMENTS TO THE DEMONSTRATION PROJECT ON COMMUNITY 
              HEALTH INTEGRATION MODELS IN CERTAIN RURAL COUNTIES.

    (a) Removal of Limitation on Number of Eligible Counties 
Selected.--Subsection (d)(3) of section 123 of the Medicare 
Improvements for Patients and Providers Act of 2008 (42 U.S.C. 1395i-4 
note) is amended by striking ``not more than 6''.
    (b) Removal of References to Rural Health Clinic Services and 
Inclusion of Physicians' Services in Scope of Demonstration Project.--
Such section 123 is amended--
        (1) in subsection (d)(4)(B)(i)(3), by striking subclause (III); 
    and
        (2) in subsection (j)--
            (A) in paragraph (8), by striking subparagraph (B) and 
        inserting the following:
            ``(B) Physicians' services (as defined in section 1861(q) 
        of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395x(q)).'';
            (B) by striking paragraph (9); and
            (C) by redesignating paragraph (10) as paragraph (9).

SEC. 3127. MEDPAC STUDY ON ADEQUACY OF MEDICARE PAYMENTS FOR HEALTH 
              CARE PROVIDERS SERVING IN RURAL AREAS.

    (a) Study.--The Medicare Payment Advisory Commission shall conduct 
a study on the adequacy of payments for items and services furnished by 
providers of services and suppliers in rural areas under the Medicare 
program under title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395 et 
seq.). Such study shall include an analysis of--
        (1) any adjustments in payments to providers of services and 
    suppliers that furnish items and services in rural areas;
        (2) access by Medicare beneficiaries to items and services in 
    rural areas;
        (3) the adequacy of payments to providers of services and 
    suppliers that furnish items and services in rural areas; and
        (4) the quality of care furnished in rural areas.
    (b) Report.--Not later than January 1, 2011, the Medicare Payment 
Advisory Commission shall submit to Congress a report containing the 
results of the study conducted under subsection (a). Such report shall 
include recommendations on appropriate modifications to any adjustments 
in payments to providers of services and suppliers that furnish items 
and services in rural areas, together with recommendations for such 
legislation and administrative action as the Medicare Payment Advisory 
Commission determines appropriate.

SEC. 3128. TECHNICAL CORRECTION RELATED TO CRITICAL ACCESS HOSPITAL 
              SERVICES.

    (a) In General.--Subsections (g)(2)(A) and (l)(8) of section 1834 
of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395m) are each amended by 
inserting ``101 percent of'' before ``the reasonable costs''.
    (b) Effective Date.--The amendments made by subsection (a) shall 
take effect as if included in the enactment of section 405(a) of the 
Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 
(Public Law 108-173; 117 Stat. 2266).

SEC. 3129. EXTENSION OF AND REVISIONS TO MEDICARE RURAL HOSPITAL 
              FLEXIBILITY PROGRAM.

    (a) Authorization.--Section 1820(j) of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395i-4(j)) is amended--
        (1) by striking ``2010, and for'' and inserting ``2010, for''; 
    and
        (2) by inserting ``and for making grants to all States under 
    subsection (g), such sums as may be necessary in each of fiscal 
    years 2011 and 2012, to remain available until expended'' before 
    the period at the end.
    (b) Use of Funds.--Section 1820(g)(3) of the Social Security Act 
(42 U.S.C. 1395i-4(g)(3)) is amended--
        (1) in subparagraph (A), by inserting ``and to assist such 
    hospitals in participating in delivery system reforms under the 
    provisions of and amendments made by the Patient Protection and 
    Affordable Care Act, such as value-based purchasing programs, 
    accountable care organizations under section 1899, the National 
    pilot program on payment bundling under section 1866D, and other 
    delivery system reform programs determined appropriate by the 
    Secretary'' before the period at the end; and
        (2) in subparagraph (E)--
            (A) by striking ``, and to offset'' and inserting ``, to 
        offset''; and
            (B) by inserting ``and to participate in delivery system 
        reforms under the provisions of and amendments made by the 
        Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, such as value-based 
        purchasing programs, accountable care organizations under 
        section 1899, the National pilot program on payment bundling 
        under section 1866D, and other delivery system reform programs 
        determined appropriate by the Secretary'' before the period at 
        the end.
    (c) Effective Date.--The amendments made by this section shall 
apply to grants made on or after January 1, 2010.

                  PART III--IMPROVING PAYMENT ACCURACY

SEC. 3131. PAYMENT ADJUSTMENTS FOR HOME HEALTH CARE.

    (a) Rebasing Home Health Prospective Payment Amount.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1895(b)(3)(A) of the Social Security 
    Act (42 U.S.C. 1395fff(b)(3)(A)) is amended--
            (A) in clause (i)(III), by striking ``For periods'' and 
        inserting ``Subject to clause (iii), for periods''; and
            (B) by adding at the end the following new clause:
                ``(iii) Adjustment for 2013 and subsequent years.--

                    ``(I) In general.--Subject to subclause (II), for 
                2013 and subsequent years, the amount (or amounts) that 
                would otherwise be applicable under clause (i)(III) 
                shall be adjusted by a percentage determined 
                appropriate by the Secretary to reflect such factors as 
                changes in the number of visits in an episode, the mix 
                of services in an episode, the level of intensity of 
                services in an episode, the average cost of providing 
                care per episode, and other factors that the Secretary 
                considers to be relevant. In conducting the analysis 
                under the preceding sentence, the Secretary may 
                consider differences between hospital-based and 
                freestanding agencies, between for-profit and nonprofit 
                agencies, and between the resource costs of urban and 
                rural agencies. Such adjustment shall be made before 
                the update under subparagraph (B) is applied for the 
                year.
                    ``(II) Transition.--The Secretary shall provide for 
                a 4-year phase-in (in equal increments) of the 
                adjustment under subclause (I), with such adjustment 
                being fully implemented for 2016. During each year of 
                such phase-in, the amount of any adjustment under 
                subclause (I) for the year may not exceed 3.5 percent 
                of the amount (or amounts) applicable under clause 
                (i)(III) as of the date of enactment of the Patient 
                Protection and Affordable Care Act.''.

        (2) MedPAC study and report.--
            (A) Study.--The Medicare Payment Advisory Commission shall 
        conduct a study on the implementation of the amendments made by 
        paragraph (1). Such study shall include an analysis of the 
        impact of such amendments on--
                (i) access to care;
                (ii) quality outcomes;
                (iii) the number of home health agencies; and
                (iv) rural agencies, urban agencies, for-profit 
            agencies, and nonprofit agencies.
            (B) Report.--Not later than January 1, 2015, the Medicare 
        Payment Advisory Commission shall submit to Congress a report 
        on the study conducted under subparagraph (A), together with 
        recommendations for such legislation and administrative action 
        as the Commission determines appropriate.
    (b) Program-specific Outlier Cap.--Section 1895(b) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395fff(b)) is amended--
        (1) in paragraph (3)(C), by striking ``the aggregate'' and all 
    that follows through the period at the end and inserting ``5 
    percent of the total payments estimated to be made based on the 
    prospective payment system under this subsection for the period.''; 
    and
        (2) in paragraph (5)--
            (A) by striking ``Outliers.--The Secretary'' and inserting 
        the following: ``Outliers.--
            ``(A) In general.--Subject to subparagraph (B), the 
        Secretary'';
            (B) in subparagraph (A), as added by subparagraph (A), by 
        striking ``5 percent'' and inserting ``2.5 percent''; and
            (C) by adding at the end the following new subparagraph:
            ``(B) Program specific outlier cap.--The estimated total 
        amount of additional payments or payment adjustments made under 
        subparagraph (A) with respect to a home health agency for a 
        year (beginning with 2011) may not exceed an amount equal to 10 
        percent of the estimated total amount of payments made under 
        this section (without regard to this paragraph) with respect to 
        the home health agency for the year.''.
    (c) Application of the Medicare Rural Home Health Add-on Policy.--
Section 421 of the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and 
Modernization Act of 2003 (Public Law 108-173; 117 Stat. 2283), as 
amended by section 5201(b) of the Deficit Reduction Act of 2005 (Public 
Law 109-171; 120 Stat. 46), is amended--
        (1) in the section heading, by striking ``one-year'' and 
    inserting ``temporary''; and
        (2) in subsection (a)--
            (A) by striking ``, and episodes'' and inserting ``, 
        episodes'';
            (B) by inserting ``and episodes and visits ending on or 
        after April 1, 2010, and before January 1, 2016,'' after 
        ``January 1, 2007,''; and
            (C) by inserting ``(or, in the case of episodes and visits 
        ending on or after April 1, 2010, and before January 1, 2016, 3 
        percent)'' before the period at the end.
    (d) Study and Report on the Development of Home Health Payment 
Reforms in Order To Ensure Access to Care and Quality Services.--
        (1) In general.--The Secretary of Health and Human Services (in 
    this section referred to as the ``Secretary'') shall conduct a 
    study to evaluate the costs and quality of care among efficient 
    home health agencies relative to other such agencies in providing 
    ongoing access to care and in treating Medicare beneficiaries with 
    varying severity levels of illness. Such study shall include an 
    analysis of the following:
            (A) Methods to revise the home health prospective payment 
        system under section 1895 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
        1395fff) to more accurately account for the costs related to 
        patient severity of illness or to improving beneficiary access 
        to care, including--
                (i) payment adjustments for services that may be under- 
            or over-valued;
                (ii) necessary changes to reflect the resource use 
            relative to providing home health services to low-income 
            Medicare beneficiaries or Medicare beneficiaries living in 
            medically underserved areas;
                (iii) ways the outlier payment may be improved to more 
            accurately reflect the cost of treating Medicare 
            beneficiaries with high severity levels of illness;
                (iv) the role of quality of care incentives and 
            penalties in driving provider and patient behavior;
                (v) improvements in the application of a wage index; 
            and
                (vi) other areas determined appropriate by the 
            Secretary.
            (B) The validity and reliability of responses on the OASIS 
        instrument with particular emphasis on questions that relate to 
        higher payment under the home health prospective payment system 
        and higher outcome scores under Home Care Compare.
            (C) Additional research or payment revisions under the home 
        health prospective payment system that may be necessary to set 
        the payment rates for home health services based on costs of 
        high-quality and efficient home health agencies or to improve 
        Medicare beneficiary access to care.
            (D) A timetable for implementation of any appropriate 
        changes based on the analysis of the matters described in 
        subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C).
            (E) Other areas determined appropriate by the Secretary.
        (2) Considerations.--In conducting the study under paragraph 
    (1), the Secretary shall consider whether certain factors should be 
    used to measure patient severity of illness and access to care, 
    such as--
            (A) population density and relative patient access to care;
            (B) variations in service costs for providing care to 
        individuals who are dually eligible under the Medicare and 
        Medicaid programs;
            (C) the presence of severe or chronic diseases, as 
        evidenced by multiple, discontinuous home health episodes;
            (D) poverty status, as evidenced by the receipt of 
        Supplemental Security Income under title XVI of the Social 
        Security Act;
            (E) the absence of caregivers;
            (F) language barriers;
            (G) atypical transportation costs;
            (H) security costs; and
            (I) other factors determined appropriate by the Secretary.
        (3) Report.--Not later than March 1, 2011, the Secretary shall 
    submit to Congress a report on the study conducted under paragraph 
    (1), together with recommendations for such legislation and 
    administrative action as the Secretary determines appropriate.
        (4) Consultations.--In conducting the study under paragraph (1) 
    and preparing the report under paragraph (3), the Secretary shall 
    consult with--
            (A) stakeholders representing home health agencies;
            (B) groups representing Medicare beneficiaries;
            (C) the Medicare Payment Advisory Commission;
            (D) the Inspector General of the Department of Health and 
        Human Services; and
            (E) the Comptroller General of the United States.

SEC. 3132. HOSPICE REFORM.

    (a) Hospice Care Payment Reforms.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1814(i) of the Social Security Act (42 
    U.S.C. 1395f(i)), as amended by section 3004(c), is amended--
            (A) by redesignating paragraph (6) as paragraph (7); and
            (B) by inserting after paragraph (5) the following new 
        paragraph:
        ``(6)(A) The Secretary shall collect additional data and 
    information as the Secretary determines appropriate to revise 
    payments for hospice care under this subsection pursuant to 
    subparagraph (D) and for other purposes as determined appropriate 
    by the Secretary. The Secretary shall begin to collect such data by 
    not later than January 1, 2011.
        ``(B) The additional data and information to be collected under 
    subparagraph (A) may include data and information on--
            ``(i) charges and payments;
            ``(ii) the number of days of hospice care which are 
        attributable to individuals who are entitled to, or enrolled 
        for, benefits under part A; and
            ``(iii) with respect to each type of service included in 
        hospice care--
                ``(I) the number of days of hospice care attributable 
            to the type of service;
                ``(II) the cost of the type of service; and
                ``(III) the amount of payment for the type of service;
            ``(iv) charitable contributions and other revenue of the 
        hospice program;
            ``(v) the number of hospice visits;
            ``(vi) the type of practitioner providing the visit; and
            ``(vii) the length of the visit and other basic information 
        with respect to the visit.
        ``(C) The Secretary may collect the additional data and 
    information under subparagraph (A) on cost reports, claims, or 
    other mechanisms as the Secretary determines to be appropriate.
        ``(D)(i) Notwithstanding the preceding paragraphs of this 
    subsection, not earlier than October 1, 2013, the Secretary shall, 
    by regulation, implement revisions to the methodology for 
    determining the payment rates for routine home care and other 
    services included in hospice care under this part, as the Secretary 
    determines to be appropriate. Such revisions may be based on an 
    analysis of data and information collected under subparagraph (A). 
    Such revisions may include adjustments to per diem payments that 
    reflect changes in resource intensity in providing such care and 
    services during the course of the entire episode of hospice care.
        ``(ii) Revisions in payment implemented pursuant to clause (i) 
    shall result in the same estimated amount of aggregate expenditures 
    under this title for hospice care furnished in the fiscal year in 
    which such revisions in payment are implemented as would have been 
    made under this title for such care in such fiscal year if such 
    revisions had not been implemented.
        ``(E) The Secretary shall consult with hospice programs and the 
    Medicare Payment Advisory Commission regarding the additional data 
    and information to be collected under subparagraph (A) and the 
    payment revisions under subparagraph (D).''.
        (2) Conforming amendments.--Section 1814(i)(1)(C) of the Social 
    Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395f(i)(1)(C)) is amended--
            (A) in clause (ii)--
                (i) in the matter preceding subclause (I), by inserting 
            ``(before the first fiscal year in which the payment 
            revisions described in paragraph (6)(D) are implemented)'' 
            after ``subsequent fiscal year''; and
                (ii) in subclause (VII), by inserting ``(before the 
            first fiscal year in which the payment revisions described 
            in paragraph (6)(D) are implemented), subject to clause 
            (iv),'' after ``subsequent fiscal year''; and
            (B) by adding at the end the following new clause:
                ``(iii) With respect to routine home care and other 
            services included in hospice care furnished during fiscal 
            years subsequent to the first fiscal year in which payment 
            revisions described in paragraph (6)(D) are implemented, 
            the payment rates for such care and services shall be the 
            payment rates in effect under this clause during the 
            preceding fiscal year increased by, subject to clause (iv), 
            the market basket percentage increase (as defined in 
            section 1886(b)(3)(B)(iii)) for the fiscal year.''.
    (b) Adoption of MedPAC Hospice Program Eligibility Recertification 
Recommendations.--Section 1814(a)(7) of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395f(a)(7)) is amended--
        (1) in subparagraph (B), by striking ``and'' at the end; and
        (2) by adding at the end the following new subparagraph:
            ``(D) on and after January 1, 2011--
                ``(i) a hospice physician or nurse practitioner has a 
            face-to-face encounter with the individual to determine 
            continued eligibility of the individual for hospice care 
            prior to the 180th-day recertification and each subsequent 
            recertification under subparagraph (A)(ii) and attests that 
            such visit took place (in accordance with procedures 
            established by the Secretary); and
                ``(ii) in the case of hospice care provided an 
            individual for more than 180 days by a hospice program for 
            which the number of such cases for such program comprises 
            more than a percent (specified by the Secretary) of the 
            total number of such cases for all programs under this 
            title, the hospice care provided to such individual is 
            medically reviewed (in accordance with procedures 
            established by the Secretary); and''.

SEC. 3133. IMPROVEMENT TO MEDICARE DISPROPORTIONATE SHARE HOSPITAL 
              (DSH) PAYMENTS.

    Section 1886 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ww), as 
amended by sections 3001, 3008, and 3025, is amended--
        (1) in subsection (d)(5)(F)(i), by striking ``For'' and 
    inserting ``Subject to subsection (r), for''; and
        (2) by adding at the end the following new subsection:
    ``(r) Adjustments to Medicare DSH Payments.--
        ``(1) Empirically justified dsh payments.--For fiscal year 2015 
    and each subsequent fiscal year, instead of the amount of 
    disproportionate share hospital payment that would otherwise be 
    made under subsection (d)(5)(F) to a subsection (d) hospital for 
    the fiscal year, the Secretary shall pay to the subsection (d) 
    hospital 25 percent of such amount (which represents the 
    empirically justified amount for such payment, as determined by the 
    Medicare Payment Advisory Commission in its March 2007 Report to 
    the Congress).
        ``(2) Additional payment.--In addition to the payment made to a 
    subsection (d) hospital under paragraph (1), for fiscal year 2015 
    and each subsequent fiscal year, the Secretary shall pay to such 
    subsection (d) hospitals an additional amount equal to the product 
    of the following factors:
            ``(A) Factor one.--A factor equal to the difference 
        between--
                ``(i) the aggregate amount of payments that would be 
            made to subsection (d) hospitals under subsection (d)(5)(F) 
            if this subsection did not apply for such fiscal year (as 
            estimated by the Secretary); and
                ``(ii) the aggregate amount of payments that are made 
            to subsection (d) hospitals under paragraph (1) for such 
            fiscal year (as so estimated).
            ``(B) Factor two.--
                ``(i) Fiscal years 2015, 2016, and 2017.--For each of 
            fiscal years 2015, 2016, and 2017, a factor equal to 1 
            minus the percent change (divided by 100) in the percent of 
            individuals under the age of 65 who are uninsured, as 
            determined by comparing the percent of such individuals--

                    ``(I) who are uninsured in 2012, the last year 
                before coverage expansion under the Patient Protection 
                and Affordable Care Act (as calculated by the Secretary 
                based on the most recent estimates available from the 
                Director of the Congressional Budget Office before a 
                vote in either House on such Act that, if determined in 
                the affirmative, would clear such Act for enrollment); 
                and
                    ``(II) who are uninsured in the most recent period 
                for which data is available (as so calculated).

                ``(ii) 2018 and subsequent years.--For fiscal year 2018 
            and each subsequent fiscal year, a factor equal to 1 minus 
            the percent change (divided by 100) in the percent of 
            individuals who are uninsured, as determined by comparing 
            the percent of individuals--

                    ``(I) who are uninsured in 2012 (as estimated by 
                the Secretary, based on data from the Census Bureau or 
                other sources the Secretary determines appropriate, and 
                certified by the Chief Actuary of the Centers for 
                Medicare & Medicaid Services); and
                    ``(II) who are uninsured in the most recent period 
                for which data is available (as so estimated and 
                certified).

            ``(C) Factor three.--A factor equal to the percent, for 
        each subsection (d) hospital, that represents the quotient of--
                ``(i) the amount of uncompensated care for such 
            hospital for a period selected by the Secretary (as 
            estimated by the Secretary, based on appropriate data 
            (including, in the case where the Secretary determines that 
            alternative data is available which is a better proxy for 
            the costs of subsection (d) hospitals for treating the 
            uninsured, the use of such alternative data)); and
                ``(ii) the aggregate amount of uncompensated care for 
            all subsection (d) hospitals that receive a payment under 
            this subsection for such period (as so estimated, based on 
            such data).
        ``(3) Limitations on review.--There shall be no administrative 
    or judicial review under section 1869, section 1878, or otherwise 
    of the following:
            ``(A) Any estimate of the Secretary for purposes of 
        determining the factors described in paragraph (2).
            ``(B) Any period selected by the Secretary for such 
        purposes.''.

SEC. 3134. MISVALUED CODES UNDER THE PHYSICIAN FEE SCHEDULE.

    (a) In General.--Section 1848(c)(2) of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395w-4(c)(2)) is amended by adding at the end the following new 
subparagraphs:
            ``(K) Potentially misvalued codes.--
                ``(i) In general.--The Secretary shall--

                    ``(I) periodically identify services as being 
                potentially misvalued using criteria specified in 
                clause (ii); and
                    ``(II) review and make appropriate adjustments to 
                the relative values established under this paragraph 
                for services identified as being potentially misvalued 
                under subclause (I).

                ``(ii) Identification of potentially misvalued codes.--
            For purposes of identifying potentially misvalued services 
            pursuant to clause (i)(I), the Secretary shall examine (as 
            the Secretary determines to be appropriate) codes (and 
            families of codes as appropriate) for which there has been 
            the fastest growth; codes (and families of codes as 
            appropriate) that have experienced substantial changes in 
            practice expenses; codes for new technologies or services 
            within an appropriate period (such as 3 years) after the 
            relative values are initially established for such codes; 
            multiple codes that are frequently billed in conjunction 
            with furnishing a single service; codes with low relative 
            values, particularly those that are often billed multiple 
            times for a single treatment; codes which have not been 
            subject to review since the implementation of the RBRVS 
            (the so-called `Harvard-valued codes'); and such other 
            codes determined to be appropriate by the Secretary.
                ``(iii) Review and adjustments.--

                    ``(I) The Secretary may use existing processes to 
                receive recommendations on the review and appropriate 
                adjustment of potentially misvalued services described 
                in clause (i)(II).
                    ``(II) The Secretary may conduct surveys, other 
                data collection activities, studies, or other analyses 
                as the Secretary determines to be appropriate to 
                facilitate the review and appropriate adjustment 
                described in clause (i)(II).
                    ``(III) The Secretary may use analytic contractors 
                to identify and analyze services identified under 
                clause (i)(I), conduct surveys or collect data, and 
                make recommendations on the review and appropriate 
                adjustment of services described in clause (i)(II).
                    ``(IV) The Secretary may coordinate the review and 
                appropriate adjustment described in clause (i)(II) with 
                the periodic review described in subparagraph (B).
                    ``(V) As part of the review and adjustment 
                described in clause (i)(II), including with respect to 
                codes with low relative values described in clause 
                (ii), the Secretary may make appropriate coding 
                revisions (including using existing processes for 
                consideration of coding changes) which may include 
                consolidation of individual services into bundled codes 
                for payment under the fee schedule under subsection 
                (b).
                    ``(VI) The provisions of subparagraph (B)(ii)(II) 
                shall apply to adjustments to relative value units made 
                pursuant to this subparagraph in the same manner as 
                such provisions apply to adjustments under subparagraph 
                (B)(ii)(II).

            ``(L) Validating relative value units.--
                ``(i) In general.--The Secretary shall establish a 
            process to validate relative value units under the fee 
            schedule under subsection (b).
                ``(ii) Components and elements of work.--The process 
            described in clause (i) may include validation of work 
            elements (such as time, mental effort and professional 
            judgment, technical skill and physical effort, and stress 
            due to risk) involved with furnishing a service and may 
            include validation of the pre-, post-, and intra-service 
            components of work.
                ``(iii) Scope of codes.--The validation of work 
            relative value units shall include a sampling of codes for 
            services that is the same as the codes listed under 
            subparagraph (K)(ii).
                ``(iv) Methods.--The Secretary may conduct the 
            validation under this subparagraph using methods described 
            in subclauses (I) through (V) of subparagraph (K)(iii) as 
            the Secretary determines to be appropriate.
                ``(v) Adjustments.--The Secretary shall make 
            appropriate adjustments to the work relative value units 
            under the fee schedule under subsection (b). The provisions 
            of subparagraph (B)(ii)(II) shall apply to adjustments to 
            relative value units made pursuant to this subparagraph in 
            the same manner as such provisions apply to adjustments 
            under subparagraph (B)(ii)(II).''.
    (b) Implementation.--
        (1) Administration.--
            (A) Chapter 35 of title 44, United States Code and the 
        provisions of the Federal Advisory Committee Act (5 U.S.C. 
        App.) shall not apply to this section or the amendment made by 
        this section.
            (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 
        Secretary may implement subparagraphs (K) and (L) of 1848(c)(2) 
        of the Social Security Act, as added by subsection (a), by 
        program instruction or otherwise.
            (C) Section 4505(d) of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997 is 
        repealed.
            (D) Except for provisions related to confidentiality of 
        information, the provisions of the Federal Acquisition 
        Regulation shall not apply to this section or the amendment 
        made by this section.
        (2) Focusing cms resources on potentially overvalued codes.--
    Section 1868(a) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ee(a)) is 
    repealed.

SEC. 3135. MODIFICATION OF EQUIPMENT UTILIZATION FACTOR FOR ADVANCED 
              IMAGING SERVICES.

    (a) Adjustment in Practice Expense To Reflect Higher Presumed 
Utilization.--Section 1848 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-
4) is amended--
        (1) in subsection (b)(4)--
            (A) in subparagraph (B), by striking ``subparagraph (A)'' 
        and inserting ``this paragraph''; and
            (B) by adding at the end the following new subparagraph:
            ``(C) Adjustment in practice expense to reflect higher 
        presumed utilization.--Consistent with the methodology for 
        computing the number of practice expense relative value units 
        under subsection (c)(2)(C)(ii) with respect to advanced 
        diagnostic imaging services (as defined in section 
        1834(e)(1)(B)) furnished on or after January 1, 2010, the 
        Secretary shall adjust such number of units so it reflects--
                ``(i) in the case of services furnished on or after 
            January 1, 2010, and before January 1, 2013, a 65 percent 
            (rather than 50 percent) presumed rate of utilization of 
            imaging equipment;
                ``(ii) in the case of services furnished on or after 
            January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2014, a 70 percent 
            (rather than 50 percent) presumed rate of utilization of 
            imaging equipment; and
                ``(iii) in the case of services furnished on or after 
            January 1, 2014, a 75 percent (rather than 50 percent) 
            presumed rate of utilization of imaging equipment.''; and
        (2) in subsection (c)(2)(B)(v), by adding at the end the 
    following new subclauses:

                    ``(III) Change in presumed utilization level of 
                certain advanced diagnostic imaging services for 2010 
                through 2012.--Effective for fee schedules established 
                beginning with 2010 and ending with 2012, reduced 
                expenditures attributable to the presumed rate of 
                utilization of imaging equipment of 65 percent under 
                subsection (b)(4)(C)(i) instead of a presumed rate of 
                utilization of such equipment of 50 percent.
                    ``(IV) Change in presumed utilization level of 
                certain advanced diagnostic imaging services for 
                2013.--Effective for fee schedules established for 
                2013, reduced expenditures attributable to the presumed 
                rate of utilization of imaging equipment of 70 percent 
                under subsection (b)(4)(C)(ii) instead of a presumed 
                rate of utilization of such equipment of 50 percent.
                    ``(V) Change in presumed utilization level of 
                certain advanced diagnostic imaging services for 2014 
                and subsequent years.--Effective for fee schedules 
                established beginning with 2014, reduced expenditures 
                attributable to the presumed rate of utilization of 
                imaging equipment of 75 percent under subsection 
                (b)(4)(C)(iii) instead of a presumed rate of 
                utilization of such equipment of 50 percent.''.

    (b) Adjustment in Technical Component ``discount'' on Single-
session Imaging to Consecutive Body Parts.--Section 1848 of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-4), as amended by subsection (a), is 
amended--
        (1) in subsection (b)(4), by adding at the end the following 
    new subparagraph:
            ``(D) Adjustment in technical component discount on single-
        session imaging involving consecutive body parts.--For services 
        furnished on or after July 1, 2010, the Secretary shall 
        increase the reduction in payments attributable to the multiple 
        procedure payment reduction applicable to the technical 
        component for imaging under the final rule published by the 
        Secretary in the Federal Register on November 21, 2005 (part 
        405 of title 42, Code of Federal Regulations) from 25 percent 
        to 50 percent.''; and
        (2) in subsection (c)(2)(B)(v), by adding at the end the 
    following new subclause:

                    ``(VI) Additional reduced payment for multiple 
                imaging procedures.--Effective for fee schedules 
                established beginning with 2010 (but not applied for 
                services furnished prior to July 1, 2010), reduced 
                expenditures attributable to the increase in the 
                multiple procedure payment reduction from 25 to 50 
                percent (as described in subsection (b)(4)(D)).''.

    (c) Analysis by the Chief Actuary of the Centers for Medicare & 
Medicaid Services.--Not later than January 1, 2013, the Chief Actuary 
of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services shall make publicly 
available an analysis of whether, for the period of 2010 through 2019, 
the cumulative expenditure reductions under title XVIII of the Social 
Security Act that are attributable to the adjustments under the 
amendments made by this section are projected to exceed $3,000,000,000.

SEC. 3136. REVISION OF PAYMENT FOR POWER-DRIVEN WHEELCHAIRS.

    (a) In General.--Section 1834(a)(7)(A) of the Social Security Act 
(42 U.S.C. 1395m(a)(7)(A)) is amended--
        (1) in clause (i)--
            (A) in subclause (II), by inserting ``subclause (III) and'' 
        after ``Subject to''; and
            (B) by adding at the end the following new subclause:

                    ``(III) Special rule for power-driven 
                wheelchairs.--For purposes of payment for power-driven 
                wheelchairs, subclause (II) shall be applied by 
                substituting `15 percent' and `6 percent' for `10 
                percent' and `7.5 percent', respectively.''; and

        (2) in clause (iii)--
            (A) in the heading, by inserting ``complex, 
        rehabilitative'' before ``power-driven''; and
            (B) by inserting ``complex, rehabilitative'' before 
        ``power-driven''.
    (b) Technical Amendment.--Section 1834(a)(7)(C)(ii)(II) of the 
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395m(a)(7)(C)(ii)(II)) is amended by 
striking ``(A)(ii) or''.
    (c) Effective Date.--
        (1) In general.--Subject to paragraph (2), the amendments made 
    by subsection (a) shall take effect on January 1, 2011, and shall 
    apply to power-driven wheelchairs furnished on or after such date.
        (2) Application to competitive bidding.--The amendments made by 
    subsection (a) shall not apply to payment made for items and 
    services furnished pursuant to contracts entered into under section 
    1847 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-3) prior to 
    January 1, 2011, pursuant to the implementation of subsection 
    (a)(1)(B)(i)(I) of such section 1847.

SEC. 3137. HOSPITAL WAGE INDEX IMPROVEMENT.

    (a) Extension of Section 508 Hospital Reclassifications.--
        (1) In general.--Subsection (a) of section 106 of division B of 
    the Tax Relief and Health Care Act of 2006 (42 U.S.C. 1395 note), 
    as amended by section 117 of the Medicare, Medicaid, and SCHIP 
    Extension Act of 2007 (Public Law 110-173) and section 124 of the 
    Medicare Improvements for Patients and Providers Act of 2008 
    (Public Law 110-275), is amended by striking ``September 30, 2009'' 
    and inserting ``September 30, 2010''.
        (2) Use of particular wage index in fiscal year 2010.--For 
    purposes of implementation of the amendment made by this subsection 
    during fiscal year 2010, the Secretary shall use the hospital wage 
    index that was promulgated by the Secretary in the Federal Register 
    on August 27, 2009 (74 Fed. Reg. 43754), and any subsequent 
    corrections.
    (b) Plan for Reforming the Medicare Hospital Wage Index System.--
        (1) In general.--Not later than December 31, 2011, the 
    Secretary of Health and Human Services (in this section referred to 
    as the ``Secretary'') shall submit to Congress a report that 
    includes a plan to reform the hospital wage index system under 
    section 1886 of the Social Security Act.
        (2) Details.--In developing the plan under paragraph (1), the 
    Secretary shall take into account the goals for reforming such 
    system set forth in the Medicare Payment Advisory Commission June 
    2007 report entitled ``Report to Congress: Promoting Greater 
    Efficiency in Medicare'', including establishing a new hospital 
    compensation index system that--
            (A) uses Bureau of Labor Statistics data, or other data or 
        methodologies, to calculate relative wages for each geographic 
        area involved;
            (B) minimizes wage index adjustments between and within 
        metropolitan statistical areas and statewide rural areas;
            (C) includes methods to minimize the volatility of wage 
        index adjustments that result from implementation of policy, 
        while maintaining budget neutrality in applying such 
        adjustments;
            (D) takes into account the effect that implementation of 
        the system would have on health care providers and on each 
        region of the country;
            (E) addresses issues related to occupational mix, such as 
        staffing practices and ratios, and any evidence on the effect 
        on quality of care or patient safety as a result of the 
        implementation of the system; and
            (F) provides for a transition.
        (3) Consultation.--In developing the plan under paragraph (1), 
    the Secretary shall consult with relevant affected parties.
    (c) Use of Particular Criteria for Determining Reclassifications.--
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in making decisions on 
applications for reclassification of a subsection (d) hospital (as 
defined in paragraph (1)(B) of section 1886(d) of the Social Security 
Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ww(d)) for the purposes described in paragraph 
(10)(D)(v) of such section for fiscal year 2011 and each subsequent 
fiscal year (until the first fiscal year beginning on or after the date 
that is 1 year after the Secretary of Health and Human Services submits 
the report to Congress under subsection (b)), the Geographic 
Classification Review Board established under paragraph (10) of such 
section shall use the average hourly wage comparison criteria used in 
making such decisions as of September 30, 2008. The preceding sentence 
shall be effected in a budget neutral manner.

SEC. 3138. TREATMENT OF CERTAIN CANCER HOSPITALS.

    Section 1833(t) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395l(t)) is 
amended by adding at the end the following new paragraph:
        ``(18) Authorization of adjustment for cancer hospitals.--
            ``(A) Study.--The Secretary shall conduct a study to 
        determine if, under the system under this subsection, costs 
        incurred by hospitals described in section 1886(d)(1)(B)(v) 
        with respect to ambulatory payment classification groups exceed 
        those costs incurred by other hospitals furnishing services 
        under this subsection (as determined appropriate by the 
        Secretary). In conducting the study under this subparagraph, 
        the Secretary shall take into consideration the cost of drugs 
        and biologicals incurred by such hospitals.
            ``(B) Authorization of adjustment.--Insofar as the 
        Secretary determines under subparagraph (A) that costs incurred 
        by hospitals described in section 1886(d)(1)(B)(v) exceed those 
        costs incurred by other hospitals furnishing services under 
        this subsection, the Secretary shall provide for an appropriate 
        adjustment under paragraph (2)(E) to reflect those higher costs 
        effective for services furnished on or after January 1, 
        2011.''.

SEC. 3139. PAYMENT FOR BIOSIMILAR BIOLOGICAL PRODUCTS.

    (a) In General.--Section 1847A of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395w-3a) is amended--
        (1) in subsection (b)--
            (A) in paragraph (1)--
                (i) in subparagraph (A), by striking ``or'' at the end;
                (ii) in subparagraph (B), by striking the period at the 
            end and inserting ``; or''; and
                (iii) by adding at the end the following new 
            subparagraph:
            ``(C) in the case of a biosimilar biological product (as 
        defined in subsection (c)(6)(H)), the amount determined under 
        paragraph (8).''; and
            (B) by adding at the end the following new paragraph:
        ``(8) Biosimilar biological product.--The amount specified in 
    this paragraph for a biosimilar biological product described in 
    paragraph (1)(C) is the sum of--
            ``(A) the average sales price as determined using the 
        methodology described under paragraph (6) applied to a 
        biosimilar biological product for all National Drug Codes 
        assigned to such product in the same manner as such paragraph 
        is applied to drugs described in such paragraph; and
            ``(B) 6 percent of the amount determined under paragraph 
        (4) for the reference biological product (as defined in 
        subsection (c)(6)(I)).''; and
        (2) in subsection (c)(6), by adding at the end the following 
    new subparagraph:
            ``(H) Biosimilar biological product.--The term `biosimilar 
        biological product' means a biological product approved under 
        an abbreviated application for a license of a biological 
        product that relies in part on data or information in an 
        application for another biological product licensed under 
        section 351 of the Public Health Service Act.
            ``(I) Reference biological product.--The term `reference 
        biological product' means the biological product licensed under 
        such section 351 that is referred to in the application 
        described in subparagraph (H) of the biosimilar biological 
        product.''.
    (b) Effective Date.--The amendments made by subsection (a) shall 
apply to payments for biosimilar biological products beginning with the 
first day of the second calendar quarter after enactment of legislation 
providing for a biosimilar pathway (as determined by the Secretary).

SEC. 3140. MEDICARE HOSPICE CONCURRENT CARE DEMONSTRATION PROGRAM.

    (a) Establishment.--
        (1) In general.--The Secretary of Health and Human Services (in 
    this section referred to as the ``Secretary'') shall establish a 
    Medicare Hospice Concurrent Care demonstration program at 
    participating hospice programs under which Medicare beneficiaries 
    are furnished, during the same period, hospice care and any other 
    items or services covered under title XVIII of the Social Security 
    Act (42 U.S.C. 1395 et seq.) from funds otherwise paid under such 
    title to such hospice programs.
        (2) Duration.--The demonstration program under this section 
    shall be conducted for a 3-year period.
        (3) Sites.--The Secretary shall select not more than 15 hospice 
    programs at which the demonstration program under this section 
    shall be conducted. Such hospice programs shall be located in urban 
    and rural areas.
    (b) Independent Evaluation and Reports.--
        (1) Independent evaluation.--The Secretary shall provide for 
    the conduct of an independent evaluation of the demonstration 
    program under this section. Such independent evaluation shall 
    determine whether the demonstration program has improved patient 
    care, quality of life, and cost-effectiveness for Medicare 
    beneficiaries participating in the demonstration program.
        (2) Reports.--The Secretary shall submit to Congress a report 
    containing the results of the evaluation conducted under paragraph 
    (1), together with such recommendations as the Secretary determines 
    appropriate.
    (c) Budget Neutrality.--With respect to the 3-year period of the 
demonstration program under this section, the Secretary shall ensure 
that the aggregate expenditures under title XVIII for such period shall 
not exceed the aggregate expenditures that would have been expended 
under such title if the demonstration program under this section had 
not been implemented.

SEC. 3141. APPLICATION OF BUDGET NEUTRALITY ON A NATIONAL BASIS IN THE 
              CALCULATION OF THE MEDICARE HOSPITAL WAGE INDEX FLOOR.

    In the case of discharges occurring on or after October 1, 2010, 
for purposes of applying section 4410 of the Balanced Budget Act of 
1997 (42 U.S.C. 1395ww note) and paragraph (h)(4) of section 412.64 of 
title 42, Code of Federal Regulations, the Secretary of Health and 
Human Services shall administer subsection (b) of such section 4410 and 
paragraph (e) of such section 412.64 in the same manner as the 
Secretary administered such subsection (b) and paragraph (e) for 
discharges occurring during fiscal year 2008 (through a uniform, 
national adjustment to the area wage index).

SEC. 3142. HHS STUDY ON URBAN MEDICARE-DEPENDENT HOSPITALS.

    (a) Study.--
        (1) In general.--The Secretary of Health and Human Services (in 
    this section referred to as the ``Secretary'') shall conduct a 
    study on the need for an additional payment for urban Medicare-
    dependent hospitals for inpatient hospital services under section 
    1886 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ww). Such study 
    shall include an analysis of--
            (A) the Medicare inpatient margins of urban Medicare-
        dependent hospitals, as compared to other hospitals which 
        receive 1 or more additional payments or adjustments under such 
        section (including those payments or adjustments described in 
        paragraph (2)(A)); and
            (B) whether payments to medicare-dependent, small rural 
        hospitals under subsection (d)(5)(G) of such section should be 
        applied to urban Medicare-dependent hospitals.
        (2) Urban medicare-dependent hospital defined.--For purposes of 
    this section, the term ``urban Medicare-dependent hospital'' means 
    a subsection (d) hospital (as defined in subsection (d)(1)(B) of 
    such section) that--
            (A) does not receive any additional payment or adjustment 
        under such section, such as payments for indirect medical 
        education costs under subsection (d)(5)(B) of such section, 
        disproportionate share payments under subsection (d)(5)(A) of 
        such section, payments to a rural referral center under 
        subsection (d)(5)(C) of such section, payments to a critical 
        access hospital under section 1814(l) of such Act (42 U.S.C. 
        1395f(l)), payments to a sole community hospital under 
        subsection (d)(5)(D) of such section 1886, or payments to a 
        medicare-dependent, small rural hospital under subsection 
        (d)(5)(G) of such section 1886; and
            (B) for which more than 60 percent of its inpatient days or 
        discharges during 2 of the 3 most recently audited cost 
        reporting periods for which the Secretary has a settled cost 
        report were attributable to inpatients entitled to benefits 
        under part A of title XVIII of such Act.
    (b) Report.--Not later than 9 months after the date of enactment of 
this Act, the Secretary shall submit to Congress a report containing 
the results of the study conducted under subsection (a), together with 
recommendations for such legislation and administrative action as the 
Secretary determines appropriate.

SEC. 3143. PROTECTING HOME HEALTH BENEFITS.

    Nothing in the provisions of, or amendments made by, this Act shall 
result in the reduction of guaranteed home health benefits under title 
XVIII of the Social Security Act.

               Subtitle C--Provisions Relating to Part C

SEC. 3201. MEDICARE ADVANTAGE PAYMENT.

    (a) MA Benchmark Based on Plan's Competitive Bids.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1853(j) of the Social Security Act (42 
    U.S.C. 1395w-23(j)) is amended--
            (A) by striking ``Amounts.--For purposes'' and inserting 
        ``Amounts.--
        ``(1) In general.--For purposes'';
            (B) by redesignating paragraphs (1) and (2) as 
        subparagraphs (A) and (B), respectively, and indenting the 
        subparagraphs appropriately;
            (C) in subparagraph (A), as redesignated by subparagraph 
        (B)--
                (i) by redesignating subparagraphs (A) and (B) as 
            clauses (i) and (ii), respectively, and indenting the 
            clauses appropriately; and
                (ii) in clause (i), as redesignated by clause (i), by 
            striking ``an amount equal to'' and all that follows 
            through the end and inserting ``an amount equal to--

                    ``(I) for years before 2007, \1/12\ of the annual 
                MA capitation rate under section 1853(c)(1) for the 
                area for the year, adjusted as appropriate for the 
                purpose of risk adjustment;
                    ``(II) for 2007 through 2011, \1/12\ of the 
                applicable amount determined under subsection (k)(1) 
                for the area for the year;
                    ``(III) for 2012, the sum of--

                        ``(aa) \2/3\ of the quotient of--
                            ``(AA) the applicable amount determined 
                        under subsection (k)(1) for the area for the 
                        year; and
                            ``(BB) 12; and
                        ``(bb) \1/3\ of the MA competitive benchmark 
                    amount (determined under paragraph (2)) for the 
                    area for the month;

                    ``(IV) for 2013, the sum of--

                        ``(aa) \1/3\ of the quotient of--
                            ``(AA) the applicable amount determined 
                        under subsection (k)(1) for the area for the 
                        year; and
                            ``(BB) 12; and
                        ``(bb) \2/3\ of the MA competitive benchmark 
                    amount (as so determined) for the area for the 
                    month;

                    ``(V) for 2014, the MA competitive benchmark amount 
                for the area for a month in 2013 (as so determined), 
                increased by the national per capita MA growth 
                percentage, described in subsection (c)(6) for 2014, 
                but not taking into account any adjustment under 
                subparagraph (C) of such subsection for a year before 
                2004; and
                    ``(VI) for 2015 and each subsequent year, the MA 
                competitive benchmark amount (as so determined) for the 
                area for the month; or'';

                (iii) in clause (ii), as redesignated by clause (i), by 
            striking ``subparagraph (A)'' and inserting ``clause (i)'';
            (D) by adding at the end the following new paragraphs:
        ``(2) Computation of ma competitive benchmark amount.--
            ``(A) In general.--Subject to subparagraph (B) and 
        paragraph (3), for months in each year (beginning with 2012) 
        for each MA payment area the Secretary shall compute an MA 
        competitive benchmark amount equal to the weighted average of 
        the unadjusted MA statutory non-drug monthly bid amount (as 
        defined in section 1854(b)(2)(E)) for each MA plan in the area, 
        with the weight for each plan being equal to the average number 
        of beneficiaries enrolled under such plan in the reference 
        month (as defined in section 1858(f)(4), except that, in 
        applying such definition for purposes of this paragraph, `to 
        compute the MA competitive benchmark amount under section 
        1853(j)(2)' shall be substituted for `to compute the percentage 
        specified in subparagraph (A) and other relevant percentages 
        under this part').
            ``(B) Weighting rules.--
                ``(i) Single plan rule.--In the case of an MA payment 
            area in which only a single MA plan is being offered, the 
            weight under subparagraph (A) shall be equal to 1.
                ``(ii) Use of simple average among multiple plans if no 
            plans offered in previous year.--In the case of an MA 
            payment area in which no MA plan was offered in the 
            previous year and more than 1 MA plan is offered in the 
            current year, the Secretary shall use a simple average of 
            the unadjusted MA statutory non-drug monthly bid amount (as 
            so defined) for purposes of computing the MA competitive 
            benchmark amount under subparagraph (A).
        ``(3) Cap on ma competitive benchmark amount.--In no case shall 
    the MA competitive benchmark amount for an area for a month in a 
    year be greater than the applicable amount that would (but for the 
    application of this subsection) be determined under subsection 
    (k)(1) for the area for the month in the year.''; and
            (E) in subsection (k)(2)(B)(ii)(III), by striking 
        ``(j)(1)(A)'' and inserting ``(j)(1)(A)(i)''.
        (2) Conforming amendments.--
            (A) Section 1853(k)(2) of the Social Security Act (42 
        U.S.C. 1395w-23(k)(2)) is amended--
                (i) in subparagraph (A), by striking ``through 2010'' 
            and inserting ``and subsequent years''; and
                (ii) in subparagraph (C)--

                    (I) in clause (iii), by striking ``and'' at the 
                end;
                    (II) in clause (iv), by striking the period at the 
                end and inserting ``; and''; and
                    (III) by adding at the end the following new 
                clause:

                ``(v) for 2011 and subsequent years, 0.00.''.
            (B) Section 1854(b) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
        1395w-24(b)) is amended--
                (i) in paragraph (3)(B)(i), by striking ``1853(j)(1)'' 
            and inserting ``1853(j)(1)(A)''; and
                (ii) in paragraph (4)(B)(i), by striking ``1853(j)(2)'' 
            and inserting ``1853(j)(1)(B)''.
            (C) Section 1858(f) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
        1395w-27(f)) is amended--
                (i) in paragraph (1), by striking ``1853(j)(2)'' and 
            inserting ``1853(j)(1)(B)''; and
                (ii) in paragraph (3)(A), by striking ``1853(j)(1)(A)'' 
            and inserting ``1853(j)(1)(A)(i)''.
            (D) Section 1860C-1(d)(1)(A) of the Social Security Act (42 
        U.S.C. 1395w-29(d)(1)(A)) is amended by striking 
        ``1853(j)(1)(A)'' and inserting ``1853(j)(1)(A)(i)''.
    (b) Reduction of National Per Capita Growth Percentage for 2011.--
Section 1853(c)(6) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-
23(c)(6)) is amended--
        (1) in clause (v), by striking ``and'' at the end;
        (2) in clause (vi)--
            (A) by striking ``for a year after 2002'' and inserting 
        ``for 2003 through 2010''; and
            (B) by striking the period at the end and inserting a 
        comma; and
            (C) by adding at the end the following new clauses:
                ``(vii) for 2011, 3 percentage points; and
                ``(viii) for a year after 2011, 0 percentage points.''.
    (c) Enhancement of Beneficiary Rebates.--Section 1854(b)(1)(C)(i) 
of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-24(b)(1)(C)(i)) is amended 
by inserting ``(or 100 percent in the case of plan years beginning on 
or after January 1, 2014)'' after ``75 percent''.
    (d) Bidding Rules.--
        (1) Requirements for information submitted.--Section 
    1854(a)(6)(A) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-
    24(a)(6)(A)) is amended, in the flush matter following clause (v), 
    by adding at the end the following sentence: ``Information to be 
    submitted under this paragraph shall be certified by a qualified 
    member of the American Academy of Actuaries and shall meet 
    actuarial guidelines and rules established by the Secretary under 
    subparagraph (B)(v).''.
        (2) Establishment of actuarial guidelines.--Section 
    1854(a)(6)(B) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-
    24(a)(6)(B)) is amended--
            (A) in clause (i), by striking ``(iii) and (iv)'' and 
        inserting ``(iii), (iv), and (v)''; and
            (B) by adding at the end the following new clause:
                ``(v) Establishment of actuarial guidelines.--

                    ``(I) In general.--In order to establish fair MA 
                competitive benchmarks under section 1853(j)(1)(A)(i), 
                the Secretary, acting through the Chief Actuary of the 
                Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (in this 
                clause referred to as the `Chief Actuary'), shall 
                establish--

                        ``(aa) actuarial guidelines for the submission 
                    of bid information under this paragraph; and
                        ``(bb) bidding rules that are appropriate to 
                    ensure accurate bids and fair competition among MA 
                    plans.

                    ``(II) Denial of bid amounts.--The Secretary shall 
                deny monthly bid amounts submitted under subparagraph 
                (A) that do not meet the actuarial guidelines and rules 
                established under subclause (I).
                    ``(III) Refusal to accept certain bids due to 
                misrepresentations and failures to adequately meet 
                requirements.--In the case where the Secretary 
                determines that information submitted by an MA 
                organization under subparagraph (A) contains consistent 
                misrepresentations and failures to adequately meet 
                requirements of the organization, the Secretary may 
                refuse to accept any additional such bid amounts from 
                the organization for the plan year and the Chief 
                Actuary shall, if the Chief Actuary determines that the 
                actuaries of the organization were complicit in those 
                misrepresentations and failures, report those actuaries 
                to the Actuarial Board for Counseling and 
                Discipline.''.

        (3) Effective date.--The amendments made by this subsection 
    shall apply to bid amounts submitted on or after January 1, 2012.
    (e) MA Local Plan Service Areas.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1853(d) of the Social Security Act (42 
    U.S.C. 1395w-23(d)) is amended--
            (A) in the subsection heading, by striking ``MA Region'' 
        and inserting ``MA Region; MA Local Plan Service Area'';
            (B) in paragraph (1), by striking subparagraph (A) and 
        inserting the following:
            ``(A) with respect to an MA local plan--
                ``(i) for years before 2012, an MA local area (as 
            defined in paragraph (2)); and
                ``(ii) for 2012 and succeeding years, a service area 
            that is an entire urban or rural area, as applicable (as 
            described in paragraph (5)); and''; and
            (C) by adding at the end the following new paragraph:
        ``(5) MA local plan service area.--For 2012 and succeeding 
    years, the service area for an MA local plan shall be an entire 
    urban or rural area in each State as follows:
            ``(A) Urban areas.--
                ``(i) In general.--Subject to clause (ii) and 
            subparagraphs (C) and (D), the service area for an MA local 
            plan in an urban area shall be the Core Based Statistical 
            Area (in this paragraph referred to as a `CBSA') or, if 
            applicable, a conceptually similar alternative 
            classification, as defined by the Director of the Office of 
            Management and Budget.
                ``(ii) CBSA covering more than one state.--In the case 
            of a CBSA (or alternative classification) that covers more 
            than one State, the Secretary shall divide the CBSA (or 
            alternative classification) into separate service areas 
            with respect to each State covered by the CBSA (or 
            alternative classification).
            ``(B) Rural areas.--Subject to subparagraphs (C) and (D), 
        the service area for an MA local plan in a rural area shall be 
        a county that does not qualify for inclusion in a CBSA (or 
        alternative classification), as defined by the Director of the 
        Office of Management and Budget.
            ``(C) Refinements to service areas.--For 2015 and 
        succeeding years, in order to reflect actual patterns of health 
        care service utilization, the Secretary may adjust the 
        boundaries of service areas for MA local plans in urban areas 
        and rural areas under subparagraphs (A) and (B), respectively, 
        but may only do so based on recent analyses of actual patterns 
        of care.
            ``(D) Additional authority to make limited exceptions to 
        service area requirements for ma local plans.--The Secretary 
        may, in addition to any adjustments under subparagraph (C), 
        make limited exceptions to service area requirements otherwise 
        applicable under this part for MA local plans that have in 
        effect (as of the date of enactment of the Patient Protection 
        and Affordable Care Act)--
                ``(i) agreements with another MA organization or MA 
            plan that preclude the offering of benefits throughout an 
            entire service area; or
                ``(ii) limitations in their structural capacity to 
            support adequate networks throughout an entire service area 
            as a result of the delivery system model of the MA local 
            plan.''.
        (2) Conforming amendments.--
            (A) In general.--
                (i) Section 1851(b)(1) of the Social Security Act (42 
            U.S.C. 1395w-21(b)(1)) is amended by striking subparagraph 
            (C).
                (ii) Section 1853(b)(1)(B)(i) of such Act (42 U.S.C. 
            1395w-23(b)(1)(B)(i))--

                    (I) in the matter preceding subclause (I), by 
                striking ``MA payment area'' and inserting ``MA local 
                area (as defined in subsection (d)(2))''; and
                    (II) in subclause (I), by striking ``MA payment 
                area'' and inserting ``MA local area (as so defined)''.

                (iii) Section 1853(b)(4) of such Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-
            23(b)(4)) is amended by striking ``Medicare Advantage 
            payment area'' and inserting ``MA local area (as so 
            defined)''.
                (iv) Section 1853(c)(1) of such Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-
            23(c)(1)) is amended--

                    (I) in the matter preceding subparagraph (A), by 
                striking ``a Medicare Advantage payment area that is''; 
                and
                    (II) in subparagraph (D)(i), by striking ``MA 
                payment area'' and inserting ``MA local area (as 
                defined in subsection (d)(2))''.

                (v) Section 1854 of such Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-24) is 
            amended by striking subsection (h).
            (B) Effective date.--The amendments made by this paragraph 
        shall take effect on January 1, 2012.
    (f) Performance Bonuses.--
        (1) MA plans.--
            (A) In general.--Section 1853 of the Social Security Act 
        (42 U.S.C. 1395w-23) is amended by adding at the end the 
        following new subsection:
    ``(n) Performance Bonuses.--
        ``(1) Care coordination and management performance bonus.--
            ``(A) In general.--For years beginning with 2014, subject 
        to subparagraph (B), in the case of an MA plan that conducts 1 
        or more programs described in subparagraph (C) with respect to 
        the year, the Secretary shall, in addition to any other payment 
        provided under this part, make monthly payments, with respect 
        to coverage of an individual under this part, to the MA plan in 
        an amount equal to the product of--
                ``(i) 0.5 percent of the national monthly per capita 
            cost for expenditures for individuals enrolled under the 
            original medicare fee-for-service program for the year; and
                ``(ii) the total number of programs described in 
            clauses (i) through (ix) of subparagraph (C) that the 
            Secretary determines the plan is conducting for the year 
            under such subparagraph.
            ``(B) Limitation.--In no case may the total amount of 
        payment with respect to a year under subparagraph (A) be 
        greater than 2 percent of the national monthly per capita cost 
        for expenditures for individuals enrolled under the original 
        medicare fee-for-service program for the year, as determined 
        prior to the application of risk adjustment under paragraph 
        (4).
            ``(C) Programs described.--The following programs are 
        described in this paragraph:
                ``(i) Care management programs that--

                    ``(I) target individuals with 1 or more chronic 
                conditions;
                    ``(II) identify gaps in care; and
                    ``(III) facilitate improved care by using 
                additional resources like nurses, nurse practitioners, 
                and physician assistants.

                ``(ii) Programs that focus on patient education and 
            self-management of health conditions, including 
            interventions that--

                    ``(I) help manage chronic conditions;
                    ``(II) reduce declines in health status; and
                    ``(III) foster patient and provider collaboration.

                ``(iii) Transitional care interventions that focus on 
            care provided around a hospital inpatient episode, 
            including programs that target post-discharge patient care 
            in order to reduce unnecessary health complications and 
            readmissions.
                ``(iv) Patient safety programs, including provisions 
            for hospital-based patient safety programs in contracts 
            that the Medicare Advantage organization offering the MA 
            plan has with hospitals.
                ``(v) Financial policies that promote systematic 
            coordination of care by primary care physicians across the 
            full spectrum of specialties and sites of care, such as 
            medical homes, capitation arrangements, or pay-for-
            performance programs.
                ``(vi) Programs that address, identify, and ameliorate 
            health care disparities among principal at-risk 
            subpopulations.
                ``(vii) Medication therapy management programs that are 
            more extensive than is required under section 1860D-4(c) 
            (as determined by the Secretary).
                ``(viii) Health information technology programs, 
            including clinical decision support and other tools to 
            facilitate data collection and ensure patient-centered, 
            appropriate care.
                ``(ix) Such other care management and coordination 
            programs as the Secretary determines appropriate.
            ``(D) Conduct of program in urban and rural areas.--An MA 
        plan may conduct a program described in subparagraph (C) in a 
        manner appropriate for an urban or rural area, as applicable.
            ``(E) Reporting of data.--Each Medicare Advantage 
        organization shall provide to the Secretary the information 
        needed to determine whether they are eligible for a care 
        coordination and management performance bonus at a time and in 
        a manner specified by the Secretary.
            ``(F) Periodic auditing.--The Secretary shall provide for 
        the annual auditing of programs described in subparagraph (C) 
        for which an MA plan receives a care coordination and 
        management performance bonus under this paragraph. The 
        Comptroller General shall monitor auditing activities conducted 
        under this subparagraph.
        ``(2) Quality performance bonuses.--
            ``(A) Quality bonus.--For years beginning with 2014, the 
        Secretary shall, in addition to any other payment provided 
        under this part, make monthly payments, with respect to 
        coverage of an individual under this part, to an MA plan that 
        achieves at least a 3 star rating (or comparable rating) on a 
        rating system described in subparagraph (C) in an amount equal 
        to--
                ``(i) in the case of a plan that achieves a 3 star 
            rating (or comparable rating) on such system 2 percent of 
            the national monthly per capita cost for expenditures for 
            individuals enrolled under the original medicare fee-for-
            service program for the year; and
                ``(ii) in the case of a plan that achieves a 4 or 5 
            star rating (or comparable rating on such system, 4 percent 
            of such national monthly per capita cost for the year.
            ``(B) Improved quality bonus.--For years beginning with 
        2014, in the case of an MA plan that does not receive a quality 
        bonus under subparagraph (A) and is an improved quality MA plan 
        with respect to the year (as identified by the Secretary), the 
        Secretary shall, in addition to any other payment provided 
        under this part, make monthly payments, with respect to 
        coverage of an individual under this part, to the MA plan in an 
        amount equal to 1 percent of such national monthly per capita 
        cost for the year.
            ``(C) Use of rating system.--For purposes of subparagraph 
        (A), a rating system described in this paragraph is--
                ``(i) a rating system that uses up to 5 stars to rate 
            clinical quality and enrollee satisfaction and performance 
            at the Medicare Advantage contract or MA plan level; or
                ``(ii) such other system established by the Secretary 
            that provides for the determination of a comparable quality 
            performance rating to the rating system described in clause 
            (i).
            ``(D) Data used in determining score.--
                ``(i) In general.--The rating of an MA plan under the 
            rating system described in subparagraph (C) with respect to 
            a year shall be based on based on the most recent data 
            available.
                ``(ii) Plans that fail to report data.--An MA plan 
            which does not report data that enables the Secretary to 
            rate the plan for purposes of subparagraph (A) or identify 
            the plan for purposes of subparagraph (B) shall be counted, 
            for purposes of such rating or identification, as having 
            the lowest plan performance rating and the lowest 
            percentage improvement, respectively.
        ``(3) Quality bonus for new and low enrollment ma plans.--
            ``(A) New ma plans.--For years beginning with 2014, in the 
        case of an MA plan that first submits a bid under section 
        1854(a)(1)(A) for 2012 or a subsequent year, only receives 
        enrollments made during the coverage election periods described 
        in section 1851(e), and is not able to receive a bonus under 
        subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) for the year, the 
        Secretary shall, in addition to any other payment provided 
        under this part, make monthly payments, with respect to 
        coverage of an individual under this part, to the MA plan in an 
        amount equal to 2 percent of national monthly per capita cost 
        for expenditures for individuals enrolled under the original 
        medicare fee-for-service program for the year. In its fourth 
        year of operation, the MA plan shall be paid in the same manner 
        as other MA plans with comparable enrollment.
            ``(B) Low enrollment plans.--For years beginning with 2014, 
        in the case of an MA plan that has low enrollment (as defined 
        by the Secretary) and would not otherwise be able to receive a 
        bonus under subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) or 
        subparagraph (A) of this paragraph for the year (referred to in 
        this subparagraph as a `low enrollment plan'), the Secretary 
        shall use a regional or local mean of the rating of all MA 
        plans in the region or local area, as determined appropriate by 
        the Secretary, on measures used to determine whether MA plans 
        are eligible for a quality or an improved quality bonus, as 
        applicable, to determine whether the low enrollment plan is 
        eligible for a bonus under such a subparagraph.
        ``(4) Risk adjustment.--The Secretary shall risk adjust a 
    performance bonus under this subsection in the same manner as the 
    Secretary risk adjusts beneficiary rebates described in section 
    1854(b)(1)(C).
        ``(5) Notification.--The Secretary, in the annual announcement 
    required under subsection (b)(1)(B) for 2014 and each succeeding 
    year, shall notify the Medicare Advantage organization of any 
    performance bonus (including a care coordination and management 
    performance bonus under paragraph (1), a quality performance bonus 
    under paragraph (2), and a quality bonus for new and low enrollment 
    plans under paragraph (3)) that the organization will receive under 
    this subsection with respect to the year. The Secretary shall 
    provide for the publication of the information described in the 
    previous sentence on the Internet website of the Centers for 
    Medicare & Medicaid Services.''
            (B) Conforming amendment.--Section 1853(a)(1)(B) of the 
        Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-23(a)(1)(B)) is amended--
                (i) in clause (i), by inserting ``and any performance 
            bonus under subsection (n)'' before the period at the end; 
            and
                (ii) in clause (ii), by striking ``(G)'' and inserting 
            ``(G), plus the amount (if any) of any performance bonus 
            under subsection (n)''.
        (2) Application of performance bonuses to ma regional plans.--
    Section 1858 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-27a) is 
    amended--
            (A) in subsection (f)(1), by striking ``subsection (e)'' 
        and inserting ``subsections (e) and (i)''; and
            (B) by adding at the end the following new subsection:
    ``(i) Application of Performance Bonuses to MA Regional Plans.--For 
years beginning with 2014, the Secretary shall apply the performance 
bonuses under section 1853(n) (relating to bonuses for care 
coordination and management, quality performance, and new and low 
enrollment MA plans) to MA regional plans in a similar manner as such 
performance bonuses apply to MA plans under such subsection.''.
    (g) Grandfathering Supplemental Benefits for Current Enrollees 
After Implementation of Competitive Bidding.--Section 1853 of the 
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-23), as amended by subsection (f), 
is amended by adding at the end the following new subsection:
    ``(o) Grandfathering Supplemental Benefits for Current Enrolles 
After Implementation of Competitive Bidding.--
        ``(1) Identification of areas.--The Secretary shall identify MA 
    local areas in which, with respect to 2009, average bids submitted 
    by an MA organization under section 1854(a) for MA local plans in 
    the area are not greater than 75 percent of the adjusted average 
    per capita cost for the year involved, determined under section 
    1876(a)(4), for the area for individuals who are not enrolled in an 
    MA plan under this part for the year, but adjusted to exclude costs 
    attributable to payments under section 1848(o), 1886(n), and 
    1886(h).
        ``(2) Election to provide rebates to grandfathered enrollees.--
            ``(A) In general.--For years beginning with 2012, each 
        Medicare Advantage organization offering an MA local plan in an 
        area identified by the Secretary under paragraph (1) may elect 
        to provide rebates to grandfathered enrollees under section 
        1854(b)(1)(C). In the case where an MA organization makes such 
        an election, the monthly per capita dollar amount of such 
        rebates shall not exceed the applicable amount for the year (as 
        defined in subparagraph (B)).
            ``(B) Applicable amount.--For purposes of this subsection, 
        the term `applicable amount' means--
                ``(i) for 2012, the monthly per capita dollar amount of 
            such rebates provided to enrollees under the MA local plan 
            with respect to 2011; and
                ``(ii) for a subsequent year, 95 percent of the amount 
            determined under this subparagraph for the preceding year.
        ``(3) Special rules for plans in identified areas.--
    Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the following 
    shall apply with respect to each Medicare Advantage organization 
    offering an MA local plan in an area identified by the Secretary 
    under paragraph (1) that makes an election described in paragraph 
    (2):
            ``(A) Payments.--The amount of the monthly payment under 
        this section to the Medicare Advantage organization, with 
        respect to coverage of a grandfathered enrollee under this part 
        in the area for a month, shall be equal to--
                ``(i) for 2012 and 2013, the sum of--

                    ``(I) the bid amount under section 1854(a) for the 
                MA local plan; and
                    ``(II) the applicable amount (as defined in 
                paragraph (2)(B)) for the MA local plan for the year.

                ``(ii) for 2014 and subsequent years, the sum of--

                    ``(I) the MA competitive benchmark amount under 
                subsection (j)(1)(A)(i) for the area for the month, 
                adjusted, only to the extent the Secretary determines 
                necessary, to account for induced utilization as a 
                result of rebates provided to grandfathered enrollees 
                (except that such adjustment shall not exceed 0.5 
                percent of such MA competitive benchmark amount); and
                    ``(II) the applicable amount (as so defined) for 
                the MA local plan for the year.

            ``(B) Requirement to submit bids under competitive 
        bidding.--The Medicare Advantage organization shall submit a 
        single bid amount under section 1854(a) for the MA local plan. 
        The Medicare Advantage organization shall remove from such bid 
        amount any effects of induced demand for care that may result 
        from the higher rebates available to grandfathered enrollees 
        under this subsection.
            ``(C) Nonapplication of bonus payments and any other 
        rebates.--The Medicare Advantage organization offering the MA 
        local plan shall not be eligible for any bonus payment under 
        subsection (n) or any rebate under this part (other than as 
        provided under this subsection) with respect to grandfathered 
        enrollees.
            ``(D) Nonapplication of uniform bid and premium amounts to 
        grandfathered enrollees.--Section 1854(c) shall not apply with 
        respect to the MA local plan.
            ``(E) Nonapplication of limitation on application of plan 
        rebates toward payment of part b premium.--Notwithstanding 
        clause (iii) of section 1854(b)(1)(C), in the case of a 
        grandfathered enrollee, a rebate under such section may be used 
        for the purpose described in clause (ii)(III) of such section.
            ``(F) Risk adjustment.--The Secretary shall risk adjust 
        rebates to grandfathered enrollees under this subsection in the 
        same manner as the Secretary risk adjusts beneficiary rebates 
        described in section 1854(b)(1)(C).
        ``(4) Definition of grandfathered enrollee.--In this 
    subsection, the term `grandfathered enrollee' means an individual 
    who is enrolled (effective as of the date of enactment of this 
    subsection) in an MA local plan in an area that is identified by 
    the Secretary under paragraph (1).''.
    (h) Transitional Extra Benefits.--Section 1853 of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-23), as amended by subsections (f) and 
(g), is amended by adding at the end the following new subsection:
    ``(p) Transitional Extra Benefits.--
        ``(1) In general.--For years beginning with 2012, the Secretary 
    shall provide transitional rebates under section 1854(b)(1)(C) for 
    the provision of extra benefits (as specified by the Secretary) to 
    enrollees described in paragraph (2).
        ``(2) Enrollees described.--An enrollee described in this 
    paragraph is an individual who--
            ``(A) enrolls in an MA local plan in an applicable area; 
        and
            ``(B) experiences a significant reduction in extra benefits 
        described in clause (ii) of section 1854(b)(1)(C) as a result 
        of competitive bidding under this part (as determined by the 
        Secretary).
        ``(3) Applicable areas.--In this subsection, the term 
    `applicable area' means the following:
            ``(A) The 2 largest metropolitan statistical areas, if the 
        Secretary determines that the total amount of such extra 
        benefits for each enrollee for the month in those areas is 
        greater than $100.
            ``(B) A county where--
                ``(i) the MA area-specific non-drug monthly benchmark 
            amount for a month in 2011 is equal to the legacy urban 
            floor amount (as described in subsection (c)(1)(B)(iii)), 
            as determined by the Secretary for the area for 2011;
                ``(ii) the percentage of Medicare Advantage eligible 
            beneficiaries in the county who are enrolled in an MA plan 
            for 2009 is greater than 30 percent (as determined by the 
            Secretary); and
                ``(iii) average bids submitted by an MA organization 
            under section 1854(a) for MA local plans in the county for 
            2011 are not greater than the adjusted average per capita 
            cost for the year involved, determined under section 
            1876(a)(4), for the county for individuals who are not 
            enrolled in an MA plan under this part for the year, but 
            adjusted to exclude costs attributable to payments under 
            section 1848(o), 1886(n), and 1886(h).
            ``(C) If the Secretary determines appropriate, a county 
        contiguous to an area or county described in subparagraph (A) 
        or (B), respectively.
        ``(4) Review of plan bids.--In the case of a bid submitted by 
    an MA organization under section 1854(a) for an MA local plan in an 
    applicable area, the Secretary shall review such bid in order to 
    ensure that extra benefits (as specified by the Secretary) are 
    provided to enrollees described in paragraph (2).
        ``(5) Funding.--The Secretary shall provide for the transfer 
    from the Federal Hospital Insurance Trust Fund under section 1817 
    and the Federal Supplementary Medical Insurance Trust Fund 
    established under section 1841, in such proportion as the Secretary 
    determines appropriate, of an amount not to exceed $5,000,000,000 
    for the period of fiscal years 2012 through 2019 for the purpose of 
    providing transitional rebates under section 1854(b)(1)(C) for the 
    provision of extra benefits under this subsection.''.
    (i) Nonapplication of Competitive Bidding and Related Provisions 
and Clarification of MA Payment Area for PACE Programs.--
        (1) Nonapplication of competitive bidding and related 
    provisions for pace programs.--Section 1894 of the Social Security 
    Act (42 U.S.C. 1395eee) is amended--
            (A) by redesignating subsections (h) and (i) as subsections 
        (i) and (j), respectively;
            (B) by inserting after subsection (g) the following new 
        subsection:
    ``(h) Nonapplication of Competitive Bidding and Related Provisions 
Under Part C.--With respect to a PACE program under this section, the 
following provisions (and regulations relating to such provisions) 
shall not apply:
        ``(1) Section 1853(j)(1)(A)(i), relating to MA area-specific 
    non-drug monthly benchmark amount being based on competitive bids.
        ``(2) Section 1853(d)(5), relating to the establishment of MA 
    local plan service areas.
        ``(3) Section 1853(n), relating to the payment of performance 
    bonuses.
        ``(4) Section 1853(o), relating to grandfathering supplemental 
    benefits for current enrollees after implementation of competitive 
    bidding.
        ``(5) Section 1853(p), relating to transitional extra 
    benefits.''.
        (2) Special rule for ma payment area for pace programs.--
    Section 1853(d) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-23(d)), 
    as amended by subsection (e), is amended by adding at the end the 
    following new paragraph:
        ``(6) Special rule for ma payment area for pace programs.--For 
    years beginning with 2012, in the case of a PACE program under 
    section 1894, the MA payment area shall be the MA local area (as 
    defined in paragraph (2)).''.

SEC. 3202. BENEFIT PROTECTION AND SIMPLIFICATION.

    (a) Limitation on Variation of Cost Sharing for Certain Benefits.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1852(a)(1)(B) of the Social Security 
    Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-22(a)(1)(B)) is amended--
            (A) in clause (i), by inserting ``, subject to clause 
        (iii),'' after ``and B or''; and
            (B) by adding at the end the following new clauses:
                ``(iii) Limitation on variation of cost sharing for 
            certain benefits.--Subject to clause (v), cost-sharing for 
            services described in clause (iv) shall not exceed the 
            cost-sharing required for those services under parts A and 
            B.
                ``(iv) Services described.--The following services are 
            described in this clause:

                    ``(I) Chemotherapy administration services.
                    ``(II) Renal dialysis services (as defined in 
                section 1881(b)(14)(B)).
                    ``(III) Skilled nursing care.
                    ``(IV) Such other services that the Secretary 
                determines appropriate (including services that the 
                Secretary determines require a high level of 
                predictability and transparency for beneficiaries).

                ``(v) Exception.--In the case of services described in 
            clause (iv) for which there is no cost-sharing required 
            under parts A and B, cost-sharing may be required for those 
            services in accordance with clause (i).''.
        (2) Effective date.--The amendments made by this subsection 
    shall apply to plan years beginning on or after January 1, 2011.
    (b) Application of Rebates, Performance Bonuses, and Premiums.--
        (1) Application of rebates.--Section 1854(b)(1)(C) of the 
    Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-24(b)(1)(C)) is amended--
            (A) in clause (ii), by striking ``rebate.--A rebate'' and 
        inserting ``rebate for plan years before 2012.--For plan years 
        before 2012, a rebate'';
            (B) by redesignating clauses (iii) and (iv) as clauses (iv) 
        and (v); and
            (C) by inserting after clause (ii) the following new 
        clause:
                ``(iii) Form of rebate for plan year 2012 and 
            subsequent plan years.--For plan years beginning on or 
            after January 1, 2012, a rebate required under this 
            subparagraph may not be used for the purpose described in 
            clause (ii)(III) and shall be provided through the 
            application of the amount of the rebate in the following 
            priority order:

                    ``(I) First, to use the most significant share to 
                meaningfully reduce cost-sharing otherwise applicable 
                for benefits under the original medicare fee-for-
                service program under parts A and B and for qualified 
                prescription drug coverage under part D, including the 
                reduction of any deductibles, copayments, and maximum 
                limitations on out-of-pocket expenses otherwise 
                applicable. Any reduction of maximum limitations on 
                out-of-pocket expenses under the preceding sentence 
                shall apply to all benefits under the original medicare 
                fee-for-service program option. The Secretary may 
                provide guidance on meaningfully reducing cost-sharing 
                under this subclause, except that such guidance may not 
                require a particular amount of cost-sharing or 
                reduction in cost-sharing.
                    ``(II) Second, to use the next most significant 
                share to meaningfully provide coverage of preventive 
                and wellness health care benefits (as defined by the 
                Secretary) which are not benefits under the original 
                medicare fee-for-service program, such as smoking 
                cessation, a free flu shot, and an annual physical 
                examination.
                    ``(III) Third, to use the remaining share to 
                meaningfully provide coverage of other health care 
                benefits which are not benefits under the original 
                medicare fee-for-service program, such as eye 
                examinations and dental coverage, and are not benefits 
                described in subclause (II).''.

        (2) Application of performance bonuses.--Section 1853(n) of the 
    Social Security Act, as added by section 3201(f), is amended by 
    adding at the end the following new paragraph:
        ``(6) Application of performance bonuses.--For plan years 
    beginning on or after January 1, 2014, any performance bonus paid 
    to an MA plan under this subsection shall be used for the purposes, 
    and in the priority order, described in subclauses (I) through 
    (III) of section 1854(b)(1)(C)(iii).''.
        (3) Application of ma monthly supplementary beneficiary 
    premium.--Section 1854(b)(2)(C) of the Social Security Act (42 
    U.S.C. 1395w-24(b)(2)(C)) is amended--
            (A) by striking ``Premium.--The term'' and inserting 
        ``premium.--
                ``(i) In general.--The term''; and
            (B) by adding at the end the following new clause:
                ``(ii) Application of ma monthly supplementary 
            beneficiary premium.--For plan years beginning on or after 
            January 1, 2012, any MA monthly supplementary beneficiary 
            premium charged to an individual enrolled in an MA plan 
            shall be used for the purposes, and in the priority order, 
            described in subclauses (I) through (III) of paragraph 
            (1)(C)(iii).''.

SEC. 3203. APPLICATION OF CODING INTENSITY ADJUSTMENT DURING MA PAYMENT 
              TRANSITION.

    Section 1853(a)(1)(C) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-
23(a)(1)(C)) is amended by adding at the end the following new clause:
                ``(iii) Application of coding intensity adjustment for 
            2011 and subsequent years.--

                    ``(I) Requirement to apply in 2011 through 2013.--
                In order to ensure payment accuracy, the Secretary 
                shall conduct an analysis of the differences described 
                in clause (ii)(I). The Secretary shall ensure that the 
                results of such analysis are incorporated into the risk 
                scores for 2011, 2012, and 2013.
                    ``(II) Authority to apply in 2014 and subsequent 
                years.--The Secretary may, as appropriate, incorporate 
                the results of such analysis into the risk scores for 
                2014 and subsequent years.''.

SEC. 3204. SIMPLIFICATION OF ANNUAL BENEFICIARY ELECTION PERIODS.

    (a) Annual 45-day Period for Disenrollment From MA Plans To Elect 
To Receive Benefits Under the Original Medicare Fee-for-service 
Program.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1851(e)(2)(C) of the Social Security 
    Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-1(e)(2)(C)) is amended to read as follows:
            ``(C) Annual 45-day period for disenrollment from ma plans 
        to elect to receive benefits under the original medicare fee-
        for-service program.--Subject to subparagraph (D), at any time 
        during the first 45 days of a year (beginning with 2011), an 
        individual who is enrolled in a Medicare Advantage plan may 
        change the election under subsection (a)(1), but only with 
        respect to coverage under the original medicare fee-for-service 
        program under parts A and B, and may elect qualified 
        prescription drug coverage in accordance with section 1860D-
        1.''.
        (2) Effective date.--The amendment made by paragraph (1) shall 
    apply with respect to 2011 and succeeding years.
    (b) Timing of the Annual, Coordinated Election Period Under Parts C 
and D.--Section 1851(e)(3)(B) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395w-1(e)(3)(B)) is amended--
        (1) in clause (iii), by striking ``and'' at the end;
        (2) in clause (iv)--
            (A) by striking ``and succeeding years'' and inserting ``, 
        2008, 2009, and 2010''; and
            (B) by striking the period at the end and inserting ``; 
        and''; and
        (3) by adding at the end the following new clause:
                ``(v) with respect to 2012 and succeeding years, the 
            period beginning on October 15 and ending on December 7 of 
            the year before such year.''.

SEC. 3205. EXTENSION FOR SPECIALIZED MA PLANS FOR SPECIAL NEEDS 
              INDIVIDUALS.

    (a) Extension of SNP Authority.--Section 1859(f)(1) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-28(f)(1)), as amended by section 164(a) 
of the Medicare Improvements for Patients and Providers Act of 2008 
(Public Law 110-275), is amended by striking ``2011'' and inserting 
``2014''.
    (b) Authority To Apply Frailty Adjustment Under PACE Payment 
Rules.--Section 1853(a)(1)(B) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395w-23(a)(1)(B)) is amended by adding at the end the following new 
clause:
                ``(iv) Authority to apply frailty adjustment under pace 
            payment rules for certain specialized ma plans for special 
            needs individuals.--

                    ``(I) In general.--Notwithstanding the preceding 
                provisions of this paragraph, for plan year 2011 and 
                subsequent plan years, in the case of a plan described 
                in subclause (II), the Secretary may apply the payment 
                rules under section 1894(d) (other than paragraph (3) 
                of such section) rather than the payment rules that 
                would otherwise apply under this part, but only to the 
                extent necessary to reflect the costs of treating high 
                concentrations of frail individuals.
                    ``(II) Plan described.--A plan described in this 
                subclause is a specialized MA plan for special needs 
                individuals described in section 1859(b)(6)(B)(ii) that 
                is fully integrated with capitated contracts with 
                States for Medicaid benefits, including long-term care, 
                and that have similar average levels of frailty (as 
                determined by the Secretary) as the PACE program.''.

    (c) Transition and Exception Regarding Restriction on Enrollment.--
Section 1859(f) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-28(f)) is 
amended by adding at the end the following new paragraph:
        ``(6) Transition and exception regarding restriction on 
    enrollment.--
            ``(A) In general.--Subject to subparagraph (C), the 
        Secretary shall establish procedures for the transition of 
        applicable individuals to--
                ``(i) a Medicare Advantage plan that is not a 
            specialized MA plan for special needs individuals (as 
            defined in subsection (b)(6)); or
                ``(ii) the original medicare fee-for-service program 
            under parts A and B.
            ``(B) Applicable individuals.--For purposes of clause (i), 
        the term `applicable individual' means an individual who--
                ``(i) is enrolled under a specialized MA plan for 
            special needs individuals (as defined in subsection 
            (b)(6)); and
                ``(ii) is not within the 1 or more of the classes of 
            special needs individuals to which enrollment under the 
            plan is restricted to.
            ``(C) Exception.--The Secretary shall provide for an 
        exception to the transition described in subparagraph (A) for a 
        limited period of time for individuals enrolled under a 
        specialized MA plan for special needs individuals described in 
        subsection (b)(6)(B)(ii) who are no longer eligible for medical 
        assistance under title XIX.
            ``(D) Timeline for initial transition.--The Secretary shall 
        ensure that applicable individuals enrolled in a specialized MA 
        plan for special needs individuals (as defined in subsection 
        (b)(6)) prior to January 1, 2010, are transitioned to a plan or 
        the program described in subparagraph (A) by not later than 
        January 1, 2013.''.
    (d) Temporary Extension of Authority To Operate but No Service Area 
Expansion for Dual Special Needs Plans That Do Not Meet Certain 
Requirements.--Section 164(c)(2) of the Medicare Improvements for 
Patients and Providers Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-275) is amended by 
striking ``December 31, 2010'' and inserting ``December 31, 2012''.
    (e) Authority To Require Special Needs Plans Be NCQA Approved.--
Section 1859(f) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-28(f)), as 
amended by subsections (a) and (c), is amended--
        (1) in paragraph (2), by adding at the end the following new 
    subparagraph:
            ``(C) If applicable, the plan meets the requirement 
        described in paragraph (7).'';
        (2) in paragraph (3), by adding at the end the following new 
    subparagraph:
            ``(E) If applicable, the plan meets the requirement 
        described in paragraph (7).'';
        (3) in paragraph (4), by adding at the end the following new 
    subparagraph:
            ``(C) If applicable, the plan meets the requirement 
        described in paragraph (7).''; and
        (4) by adding at the end the following new paragraph:
        ``(7) Authority to require special needs plans be ncqa 
    approved.--For 2012 and subsequent years, the Secretary shall 
    require that a Medicare Advantage organization offering a 
    specialized MA plan for special needs individuals be approved by 
    the National Committee for Quality Assurance (based on standards 
    established by the Secretary).''.
    (f) Risk Adjustment.--Section 1853(a)(1)(C) of the Social Security 
Act (42 U.S.C. 1395i-23(a)(1)(C)) is amended by adding at the end the 
following new clause:
                ``(iii) Improvements to risk adjustment for special 
            needs individuals with chronic health conditions.--

                    ``(I) In general.--For 2011 and subsequent years, 
                for purposes of the adjustment under clause (i) with 
                respect to individuals described in subclause (II), the 
                Secretary shall use a risk score that reflects the 
                known underlying risk profile and chronic health status 
                of similar individuals. Such risk score shall be used 
                instead of the default risk score for new enrollees in 
                Medicare Advantage plans that are not specialized MA 
                plans for special needs individuals (as defined in 
                section 1859(b)(6)).
                    ``(II) Individuals described.--An individual 
                described in this subclause is a special needs 
                individual described in subsection (b)(6)(B)(iii) who 
                enrolls in a specialized MA plan for special needs 
                individuals on or after January 1, 2011.
                    ``(III) Evaluation.--For 2011 and periodically 
                thereafter, the Secretary shall evaluate and revise the 
                risk adjustment system under this subparagraph in order 
                to, as accurately as possible, account for higher 
                medical and care coordination costs associated with 
                frailty, individuals with multiple, comorbid chronic 
                conditions, and individuals with a diagnosis of mental 
                illness, and also to account for costs that may be 
                associated with higher concentrations of beneficiaries 
                with those conditions.
                    ``(IV) Publication of evaluation and revisions.--
                The Secretary shall publish, as part of an announcement 
                under subsection (b), a description of any evaluation 
                conducted under subclause (III) during the preceding 
                year and any revisions made under such subclause as a 
                result of such evaluation.''.

    (g) Technical Correction.--Section 1859(f)(5) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-28(f)(5)) is amended, in the matter 
preceding subparagraph (A), by striking ``described in subsection 
(b)(6)(B)(i)''.

SEC. 3206. EXTENSION OF REASONABLE COST CONTRACTS.

    Section 1876(h)(5)(C)(ii) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395mm(h)(5)(C)(ii)) is amended, in the matter preceding subclause (I), 
by striking ``January 1, 2010'' and inserting ``January 1, 2013''.

SEC. 3207. TECHNICAL CORRECTION TO MA PRIVATE FEE-FOR-SERVICE PLANS.

    For plan year 2011 and subsequent plan years, to the extent that 
the Secretary of Health and Human Services is applying the 2008 service 
area extension waiver policy (as modified in the April 11, 2008, 
Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services' memorandum with the subject 
``2009 Employer Group Waiver-Modification of the 2008 Service Area 
Extension Waiver Granted to Certain MA Local Coordinated Care Plans'') 
to Medicare Advantage coordinated care plans, the Secretary shall 
extend the application of such waiver policy to employers who contract 
directly with the Secretary as a Medicare Advantage private fee-for-
service plan under section 1857(i)(2) of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395w-27(i)(2)) and that had enrollment as of October 1, 2009.

SEC. 3208. MAKING SENIOR HOUSING FACILITY DEMONSTRATION PERMANENT.

    (a) In General.--Section 1859 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395w-28) is amended by adding at the end the following new subsection:
    ``(g) Special Rules for Senior Housing Facility Plans.--
        ``(1) In general.--In the case of a Medicare Advantage senior 
    housing facility plan described in paragraph (2), notwithstanding 
    any other provision of this part to the contrary and in accordance 
    with regulations of the Secretary, the service area of such plan 
    may be limited to a senior housing facility in a geographic area.
        ``(2) Medicare advantage senior housing facility plan 
    described.--For purposes of this subsection, a Medicare Advantage 
    senior housing facility plan is a Medicare Advantage plan that--
            ``(A) restricts enrollment of individuals under this part 
        to individuals who reside in a continuing care retirement 
        community (as defined in section 1852(l)(4)(B));
            ``(B) provides primary care services onsite and has a ratio 
        of accessible physicians to beneficiaries that the Secretary 
        determines is adequate;
            ``(C) provides transportation services for beneficiaries to 
        specialty providers outside of the facility; and
            ``(D) has participated (as of December 31, 2009) in a 
        demonstration project established by the Secretary under which 
        such a plan was offered for not less than 1 year.''.
    (b) Effective Date.--The amendment made by this section shall take 
effect on January 1, 2010, and shall apply to plan years beginning on 
or after such date.

SEC. 3209. AUTHORITY TO DENY PLAN BIDS.

    (a) In General.--Section 1854(a)(5) of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395w-24(a)(5)) is amended by adding at the end the following 
new subparagraph:
            ``(C) Rejection of bids.--
                ``(i) In general.--Nothing in this section shall be 
            construed as requiring the Secretary to accept any or every 
            bid submitted by an MA organization under this subsection.
                ``(ii) Authority to deny bids that propose significant 
            increases in cost sharing or decreases in benefits.--The 
            Secretary may deny a bid submitted by an MA organization 
            for an MA plan if it proposes significant increases in cost 
            sharing or decreases in benefits offered under the plan.''.
    (b) Application Under Part D.--Section 1860D-11(d) of such Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395w-111(d)) is amended by adding at the end the following new 
paragraph:
        ``(3) Rejection of bids.--Paragraph (5)(C) of section 1854(a) 
    shall apply with respect to bids submitted by a PDP sponsor under 
    subsection (b) in the same manner as such paragraph applies to bids 
    submitted by an MA organization under such section 1854(a).''.
    (c) Effective Date.--The amendments made by this section shall 
apply to bids submitted for contract years beginning on or after 
January 1, 2011.

SEC. 3210. DEVELOPMENT OF NEW STANDARDS FOR CERTAIN MEDIGAP PLANS.

    (a) In General.--Section 1882 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395ss) is amended by adding at the end the following new subsection:
    ``(y) Development of New Standards for Certain Medicare 
Supplemental Policies.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Secretary shall request the National 
    Association of Insurance Commissioners to review and revise the 
    standards for benefit packages described in paragraph (2) under 
    subsection (p)(1), to otherwise update standards to include 
    requirements for nominal cost sharing to encourage the use of 
    appropriate physicians' services under part B. Such revisions shall 
    be based on evidence published in peer-reviewed journals or current 
    examples used by integrated delivery systems and made consistent 
    with the rules applicable under subsection (p)(1)(E) with the 
    reference to the `1991 NAIC Model Regulation' deemed a reference to 
    the NAIC Model Regulation as published in the Federal Register on 
    December 4, 1998, and as subsequently updated by the National 
    Association of Insurance Commissioners to reflect previous changes 
    in law and the reference to `date of enactment of this subsection' 
    deemed a reference to the date of enactment of the Patient 
    Protection and Affordable Care Act. To the extent practicable, such 
    revision shall provide for the implementation of revised standards 
    for benefit packages as of January 1, 2015.
        ``(2) Benefit packages described.--The benefit packages 
    described in this paragraph are benefit packages classified as `C' 
    and `F'.''.
    (b) Conforming Amendment.--Section 1882(o)(1) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ss(o)(1)) is amended by striking ``, and 
(w)'' and inserting ``(w), and (y)''.

 Subtitle D--Medicare Part D Improvements for Prescription Drug Plans 
                            and MA-PD Plans

SEC. 3301. MEDICARE COVERAGE GAP DISCOUNT PROGRAM.

    (a) Condition for Coverage of Drugs Under Part D.--Part D of Title 
XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-101 et seq.), is 
amended by adding at the end the following new section:


            ``condition for coverage of drugs under this part

    ``Sec. 1860D-43.  (a) In General.--In order for coverage to be 
available under this part for covered part D drugs (as defined in 
section 1860D-2(e)) of a manufacturer, the manufacturer must--
        ``(1) participate in the Medicare coverage gap discount program 
    under section 1860D-14A;
        ``(2) have entered into and have in effect an agreement 
    described in subsection (b) of such section with the Secretary; and
        ``(3) have entered into and have in effect, under terms and 
    conditions specified by the Secretary, a contract with a third 
    party that the Secretary has entered into a contract with under 
    subsection (d)(3) of such section.
    ``(b) Effective Date.--Subsection (a) shall apply to covered part D 
drugs dispensed under this part on or after July 1, 2010.
    ``(c) Authorizing Coverage for Drugs Not Covered Under 
Agreements.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to the dispensing of a 
covered part D drug if--
        ``(1) the Secretary has made a determination that the 
    availability of the drug is essential to the health of 
    beneficiaries under this part; or
        ``(2) the Secretary determines that in the period beginning on 
    July 1, 2010, and ending on December 31, 2010, there were 
    extenuating circumstances.
    ``(d) Definition of Manufacturer.--In this section, the term 
`manufacturer' has the meaning given such term in section 1860D-
14A(g)(5).''.
    (b) Medicare Coverage Gap Discount Program.--Part D of title XVIII 
of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-101) is amended by 
inserting after section 1860D-14 the following new section:


                 ``medicare coverage gap discount program

    ``Sec. 1860D-14A.  (a) Establishment.--The Secretary shall 
establish a Medicare coverage gap discount program (in this section 
referred to as the `program') by not later than July 1, 2010. Under the 
program, the Secretary shall enter into agreements described in 
subsection (b) with manufacturers and provide for the performance of 
the duties described in subsection (c)(1). The Secretary shall 
establish a model agreement for use under the program by not later than 
April 1, 2010, in consultation with manufacturers, and allow for 
comment on such model agreement.
    ``(b) Terms of Agreement.--
        ``(1) In general.--
            ``(A) Agreement.--An agreement under this section shall 
        require the manufacturer to provide applicable beneficiaries 
        access to discounted prices for applicable drugs of the 
        manufacturer.
            ``(B) Provision of discounted prices at the point-of-
        sale.--Except as provided in subsection (c)(1)(A)(iii), such 
        discounted prices shall be provided to the applicable 
        beneficiary at the pharmacy or by the mail order service at the 
        point-of-sale of an applicable drug.
            ``(C) Timing of agreement.--
                ``(i) Special rule for 2010 and 2011.--In order for an 
            agreement with a manufacturer to be in effect under this 
            section with respect to the period beginning on July 1, 
            2010, and ending on December 31, 2011, the manufacturer 
            shall enter into such agreement not later than May 1, 2010.
                ``(ii) 2012 and subsequent years.--In order for an 
            agreement with a manufacturer to be in effect under this 
            section with respect to plan year 2012 or a subsequent plan 
            year, the manufacturer shall enter into such agreement (or 
            such agreement shall be renewed under paragraph (4)(A)) not 
            later than January 30 of the preceding year.
        ``(2) Provision of appropriate data.--Each manufacturer with an 
    agreement in effect under this section shall collect and have 
    available appropriate data, as determined by the Secretary, to 
    ensure that it can demonstrate to the Secretary compliance with the 
    requirements under the program.
        ``(3) Compliance with requirements for administration of 
    program.--Each manufacturer with an agreement in effect under this 
    section shall comply with requirements imposed by the Secretary or 
    a third party with a contract under subsection (d)(3), as 
    applicable, for purposes of administering the program, including 
    any determination under clause (i) of subsection (c)(1)(A) or 
    procedures established under such subsection (c)(1)(A).
        ``(4) Length of agreement.--
            ``(A) In general.--An agreement under this section shall be 
        effective for an initial period of not less than 18 months and 
        shall be automatically renewed for a period of not less than 1 
        year unless terminated under subparagraph (B).
            ``(B) Termination.--
                ``(i) By the secretary.--The Secretary may provide for 
            termination of an agreement under this section for a 
            knowing and willful violation of the requirements of the 
            agreement or other good cause shown. Such termination shall 
            not be effective earlier than 30 days after the date of 
            notice to the manufacturer of such termination. The 
            Secretary shall provide, upon request, a manufacturer with 
            a hearing concerning such a termination, and such hearing 
            shall take place prior to the effective date of the 
            termination with sufficient time for such effective date to 
            be repealed if the Secretary determines appropriate.
                ``(ii) By a manufacturer.--A manufacturer may terminate 
            an agreement under this section for any reason. Any such 
            termination shall be effective, with respect to a plan 
            year--

                    ``(I) if the termination occurs before January 30 
                of a plan year, as of the day after the end of the plan 
                year; and
                    ``(II) if the termination occurs on or after 
                January 30 of a plan year, as of the day after the end 
                of the succeeding plan year.

                ``(iii) Effectiveness of termination.--Any termination 
            under this subparagraph shall not affect discounts for 
            applicable drugs of the manufacturer that are due under the 
            agreement before the effective date of its termination.
                ``(iv) Notice to third party.--The Secretary shall 
            provide notice of such termination to a third party with a 
            contract under subsection (d)(3) within not less than 30 
            days before the effective date of such termination.
    ``(c) Duties Described and Special Rule for Supplemental 
Benefits.--
        ``(1) Duties described.--The duties described in this 
    subsection are the following:
            ``(A) Administration of program.--Administering the 
        program, including--
                ``(i) the determination of the amount of the discounted 
            price of an applicable drug of a manufacturer;
                ``(ii) except as provided in clause (iii), the 
            establishment of procedures under which discounted prices 
            are provided to applicable beneficiaries at pharmacies or 
            by mail order service at the point-of-sale of an applicable 
            drug;
                ``(iii) in the case where, during the period beginning 
            on July 1, 2010, and ending on December 31, 2011, it is not 
            practicable to provide such discounted prices at the point-
            of-sale (as described in clause (ii)), the establishment of 
            procedures to provide such discounted prices as soon as 
            practicable after the point-of-sale;
                ``(iv) the establishment of procedures to ensure that, 
            not later than the applicable number of calendar days after 
            the dispensing of an applicable drug by a pharmacy or mail 
            order service, the pharmacy or mail order service is 
            reimbursed for an amount equal to the difference between--

                    ``(I) the negotiated price of the applicable drug; 
                and
                    ``(II) the discounted price of the applicable drug;

                ``(v) the establishment of procedures to ensure that 
            the discounted price for an applicable drug under this 
            section is applied before any coverage or financial 
            assistance under other health benefit plans or programs 
            that provide coverage or financial assistance for the 
            purchase or provision of prescription drug coverage on 
            behalf of applicable beneficiaries as the Secretary may 
            specify;
                ``(vi) the establishment of procedures to implement the 
            special rule for supplemental benefits under paragraph (2); 
            and
                ``(vii) providing a reasonable dispute resolution 
            mechanism to resolve disagreements between manufacturers, 
            applicable beneficiaries, and the third party with a 
            contract under subsection (d)(3).
            ``(B) Monitoring compliance.--
                ``(i) In general.--The Secretary shall monitor 
            compliance by a manufacturer with the terms of an agreement 
            under this section.
                ``(ii) Notification.--If a third party with a contract 
            under subsection (d)(3) determines that the manufacturer is 
            not in compliance with such agreement, the third party 
            shall notify the Secretary of such noncompliance for 
            appropriate enforcement under subsection (e).
            ``(C) Collection of data from prescription drug plans and 
        ma-pd plans.--The Secretary may collect appropriate data from 
        prescription drug plans and MA-PD plans in a timeframe that 
        allows for discounted prices to be provided for applicable 
        drugs under this section.
        ``(2) Special rule for supplemental benefits.--For plan year 
    2010 and each subsequent plan year, in the case where an applicable 
    beneficiary has supplemental benefits with respect to applicable 
    drugs under the prescription drug plan or MA-PD plan that the 
    applicable beneficiary is enrolled in, the applicable beneficiary 
    shall not be provided a discounted price for an applicable drug 
    under this section until after such supplemental benefits have been 
    applied with respect to the applicable drug.
    ``(d) Administration.--
        ``(1) In general.--Subject to paragraph (2), the Secretary 
    shall provide for the implementation of this section, including the 
    performance of the duties described in subsection (c)(1).
        ``(2) Limitation.--
            ``(A) In general.--Subject to subparagraph (B), in 
        providing for such implementation, the Secretary shall not 
        receive or distribute any funds of a manufacturer under the 
        program.
            ``(B) Exception.--The limitation under subparagraph (A) 
        shall not apply to the Secretary with respect to drugs 
        dispensed during the period beginning on July 1, 2010, and 
        ending on December 31, 2010, but only if the Secretary 
        determines that the exception to such limitation under this 
        subparagraph is necessary in order for the Secretary to begin 
        implementation of this section and provide applicable 
        beneficiaries timely access to discounted prices during such 
        period.
        ``(3) Contract with third parties.--The Secretary shall enter 
    into a contract with 1 or more third parties to administer the 
    requirements established by the Secretary in order to carry out 
    this section. At a minimum, the contract with a third party under 
    the preceding sentence shall require that the third party--
            ``(A) receive and transmit information between the 
        Secretary, manufacturers, and other individuals or entities the 
        Secretary determines appropriate;
            ``(B) receive, distribute, or facilitate the distribution 
        of funds of manufacturers to appropriate individuals or 
        entities in order to meet the obligations of manufacturers 
        under agreements under this section;
            ``(C) provide adequate and timely information to 
        manufacturers, consistent with the agreement with the 
        manufacturer under this section, as necessary for the 
        manufacturer to fulfill its obligations under this section; and
            ``(D) permit manufacturers to conduct periodic audits, 
        directly or through contracts, of the data and information used 
        by the third party to determine discounts for applicable drugs 
        of the manufacturer under the program.
        ``(4) Performance requirements.--The Secretary shall establish 
    performance requirements for a third party with a contract under 
    paragraph (3) and safeguards to protect the independence and 
    integrity of the activities carried out by the third party under 
    the program under this section.
        ``(5) Implementation.--The Secretary may implement the program 
    under this section by program instruction or otherwise.
        ``(6) Administration.--Chapter 35 of title 44, United States 
    Code, shall not apply to the program under this section.
    ``(e) Enforcement.--
        ``(1) Audits.--Each manufacturer with an agreement in effect 
    under this section shall be subject to periodic audit by the 
    Secretary.
        ``(2) Civil money penalty.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Secretary shall impose a civil money 
        penalty on a manufacturer that fails to provide applicable 
        beneficiaries discounts for applicable drugs of the 
        manufacturer in accordance with such agreement for each such 
        failure in an amount the Secretary determines is commensurate 
        with the sum of--
                ``(i) the amount that the manufacturer would have paid 
            with respect to such discounts under the agreement, which 
            will then be used to pay the discounts which the 
            manufacturer had failed to provide; and
                ``(ii) 25 percent of such amount.
            ``(B) Application.--The provisions of section 1128A (other 
        than subsections (a) and (b)) shall apply to a civil money 
        penalty under this paragraph in the same manner as such 
        provisions apply to a penalty or proceeding under section 
        1128A(a).
    ``(f) Clarification Regarding Availability of Other Covered Part D 
Drugs.--Nothing in this section shall prevent an applicable beneficiary 
from purchasing a covered part D drug that is not an applicable drug 
(including a generic drug or a drug that is not on the formulary of the 
prescription drug plan or MA-PD plan that the applicable beneficiary is 
enrolled in).
    ``(g) Definitions.--In this section:
        ``(1) Applicable beneficiary.--The term `applicable 
    beneficiary' means an individual who, on the date of dispensing an 
    applicable drug--
            ``(A) is enrolled in a prescription drug plan or an MA-PD 
        plan;
            ``(B) is not enrolled in a qualified retiree prescription 
        drug plan;
            ``(C) is not entitled to an income-related subsidy under 
        section 1860D-14(a);
            ``(D) is not subject to a reduction in premium subsidy 
        under section 1839(i); and
            ``(E) who--
                ``(i) has reached or exceeded the initial coverage 
            limit under section 1860D-2(b)(3) during the year; and
                ``(ii) has not incurred costs for covered part D drugs 
            in the year equal to the annual out-of-pocket threshold 
            specified in section 1860D-2(b)(4)(B).
        ``(2) Applicable drug.--The term `applicable drug' means, with 
    respect to an applicable beneficiary, a covered part D drug--
            ``(A) approved under a new drug application under section 
        505(b) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act or, in the 
        case of a biologic product, licensed under section 351 of the 
        Public Health Service Act (other than a product licensed under 
        subsection (k) of such section 351); and
            ``(B)(i) if the PDP sponsor of the prescription drug plan 
        or the MA organization offering the MA-PD plan uses a 
        formulary, which is on the formulary of the prescription drug 
        plan or MA-PD plan that the applicable beneficiary is enrolled 
        in;
            ``(ii) if the PDP sponsor of the prescription drug plan or 
        the MA organization offering the MA-PD plan does not use a 
        formulary, for which benefits are available under the 
        prescription drug plan or MA-PD plan that the applicable 
        beneficiary is enrolled in; or
            ``(iii) is provided through an exception or appeal.
        ``(3) Applicable number of calendar days.--The term `applicable 
    number of calendar days' means--
            ``(A) with respect to claims for reimbursement submitted 
        electronically, 14 days; and
            ``(B) with respect to claims for reimbursement submitted 
        otherwise, 30 days.
        ``(4) Discounted price.--
            ``(A) In general.--The term `discounted price' means 50 
        percent of the negotiated price of the applicable drug of a 
        manufacturer.
            ``(B) Clarification.--Nothing in this section shall be 
        construed as affecting the responsibility of an applicable 
        beneficiary for payment of a dispensing fee for an applicable 
        drug.
            ``(C) Special case for certain claims.--In the case where 
        the entire amount of the negotiated price of an individual 
        claim for an applicable drug with respect to an applicable 
        beneficiary does not fall at or above the initial coverage 
        limit under section 1860D-2(b)(3) and below the annual out-of-
        pocket threshold specified in section 1860D-2(b)(4)(B) for the 
        year, the manufacturer of the applicable drug shall provide the 
        discounted price under this section on only the portion of the 
        negotiated price of the applicable drug that falls at or above 
        such initial coverage limit and below such annual out-of-pocket 
        threshold.
        ``(5) Manufacturer.--The term `manufacturer' means any entity 
    which is engaged in the production, preparation, propagation, 
    compounding, conversion, or processing of prescription drug 
    products, either directly or indirectly by extraction from 
    substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical 
    synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical 
    synthesis. Such term does not include a wholesale distributor of 
    drugs or a retail pharmacy licensed under State law.
        ``(6) Negotiated price.--The term `negotiated price' has the 
    meaning given such term in section 423.100 of title 42, Code of 
    Federal Regulations (as in effect on the date of enactment of this 
    section), except that such negotiated price shall not include any 
    dispensing fee for the applicable drug.
        ``(7) Qualified retiree prescription drug plan.--The term 
    `qualified retiree prescription drug plan' has the meaning given 
    such term in section 1860D-22(a)(2).''.
    (c) Inclusion in Incurred Costs.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1860D-2(b)(4) of the Social Security 
    Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-102(b)(4)) is amended--
            (A) in subparagraph (C), in the matter preceding clause 
        (i), by striking ``In applying'' and inserting ``Except as 
        provided in subparagraph (E), in applying''; and
            (B) by adding at the end the following new subparagraph:
            ``(E) Inclusion of costs of applicable drugs under medicare 
        coverage gap discount program.--In applying subparagraph (A), 
        incurred costs shall include the negotiated price (as defined 
        in paragraph (6) of section 1860D-14A(g)) of an applicable drug 
        (as defined in paragraph (2) of such section) of a manufacturer 
        that is furnished to an applicable beneficiary (as defined in 
        paragraph (1) of such section) under the Medicare coverage gap 
        discount program under section 1860D-14A, regardless of whether 
        part of such costs were paid by a manufacturer under such 
        program.''.
        (2) Effective date.--The amendments made by this subsection 
    shall apply to costs incurred on or after July 1, 2010.
    (d) Conforming Amendment Permitting Prescription Drug Discounts.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1128B(b)(3) of the Social Security Act 
    (42 U.S.C. 1320a-7b(b)(3)) is amended--
            (A) by striking ``and'' at the end of subparagraph (G);
            (B) in the subparagraph (H) added by section 237(d) of the 
        Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act 
        of 2003 (Public Law 108-173; 117 Stat. 2213)--
                (i) by moving such subparagraph 2 ems to the left; and
                (ii) by striking the period at the end and inserting a 
            semicolon;
            (C) in the subparagraph (H) added by section 431(a) of such 
        Act (117 Stat. 2287)--
                (i) by redesignating such subparagraph as subparagraph 
            (I);
                (ii) by moving such subparagraph 2 ems to the left; and
                (iii) by striking the period at the end and inserting 
            ``; and''; and
            (D) by adding at the end the following new subparagraph:
            ``(J) a discount in the price of an applicable drug (as 
        defined in paragraph (2) of section 1860D-14A(g)) of a 
        manufacturer that is furnished to an applicable beneficiary (as 
        defined in paragraph (1) of such section) under the Medicare 
        coverage gap discount program under section 1860D-14A.''.
        (2) Conforming amendment to definition of best price under 
    medicaid.--Section 1927(c)(1)(C)(i)(VI) of the Social Security Act 
    (42 U.S.C. 1396r-8(c)(1)(C)(i)(VI)) is amended by inserting ``, or 
    any discounts provided by manufacturers under the Medicare coverage 
    gap discount program under section 1860D-14A'' before the period at 
    the end.
        (3) Effective date.--The amendments made by this subsection 
    shall apply to drugs dispensed on or after July 1, 2010.

SEC. 3302. IMPROVEMENT IN DETERMINATION OF MEDICARE PART D LOW-INCOME 
              BENCHMARK PREMIUM.

    (a) In General.--Section 1860D-14(b)(2)(B)(iii) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-114(b)(2)(B)(iii)) is amended by 
inserting ``, determined without regard to any reduction in such 
premium as a result of any beneficiary rebate under section 
1854(b)(1)(C) or bonus payment under section 1853(n)'' before the 
period at the end.
    (b) Effective Date.--The amendment made by subsection (a) shall 
apply to premiums for months beginning on or after January 1, 2011.

SEC. 3303. VOLUNTARY DE MINIMIS POLICY FOR SUBSIDY ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS 
              UNDER PRESCRIPTION DRUG PLANS AND MA-PD PLANS.

    (a) In General.--Section 1860D-14(a) of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395w-114(a)) is amended by adding at the end the following new 
paragraph:
        ``(5) Waiver of de minimis premiums.--The Secretary shall, 
    under procedures established by the Secretary, permit a 
    prescription drug plan or an MA-PD plan to waive the monthly 
    beneficiary premium for a subsidy eligible individual if the amount 
    of such premium is de minimis. If such premium is waived under the 
    plan, the Secretary shall not reassign subsidy eligible individuals 
    enrolled in the plan to other plans based on the fact that the 
    monthly beneficiary premium under the plan was greater than the 
    low-income benchmark premium amount.''.
    (b) Authorizing the Secretary To Auto-enroll Subsidy Eligible 
Individuals in Plans That Waive De Minimis Premiums.--Section 1860D-
1(b)(1) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-101(b)(1)) is 
amended--
        (1) in subparagraph (C), by inserting ``except as provided in 
    subparagraph (D),'' after ``shall include,''
        (2) by adding at the end the following new subparagraph:
            ``(D) Special rule for plans that waive de minimis 
        premiums.--The process established under subparagraph (A) may 
        include, in the case of a part D eligible individual who is a 
        subsidy eligible individual (as defined in section 1860D-
        14(a)(3)) who has failed to enroll in a prescription drug plan 
        or an MA-PD plan, for the enrollment in a prescription drug 
        plan or MA-PD plan that has waived the monthly beneficiary 
        premium for such subsidy eligible individual under section 
        1860D-14(a)(5). If there is more than one such plan available, 
        the Secretary shall enroll such an individual under the 
        preceding sentence on a random basis among all such plans in 
        the PDP region. Nothing in the previous sentence shall prevent 
        such an individual from declining or changing such 
        enrollment.''.
    (c) Effective Date.--The amendments made by this subsection shall 
apply to premiums for months, and enrollments for plan years, beginning 
on or after January 1, 2011.

SEC. 3304. SPECIAL RULE FOR WIDOWS AND WIDOWERS REGARDING ELIGIBILITY 
              FOR LOW-INCOME ASSISTANCE.

    (a) In General.--Section 1860D-14(a)(3)(B) of the Social Security 
Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-114(a)(3)(B)) is amended by adding at the end the 
following new clause:
                ``(vi) Special rule for widows and widowers.--
            Notwithstanding the preceding provisions of this 
            subparagraph, in the case of an individual whose spouse 
            dies during the effective period for a determination or 
            redetermination that has been made under this subparagraph, 
            such effective period shall be extended through the date 
            that is 1 year after the date on which the determination or 
            redetermination would (but for the application of this 
            clause) otherwise cease to be effective.''.
    (b) Effective Date.--The amendment made by subsection (a) shall 
take effect on January 1, 2011.

SEC. 3305. IMPROVED INFORMATION FOR SUBSIDY ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS 
              REASSIGNED TO PRESCRIPTION DRUG PLANS AND MA-PD PLANS.

    Section 1860D-14 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-114) 
is amended--
        (1) by redesignating subsection (d) as subsection (e); and
        (2) by inserting after subsection (c) the following new 
    subsection:
    ``(d) Facilitation of Reassignments.--Beginning not later than 
January 1, 2011, the Secretary shall, in the case of a subsidy eligible 
individual who is enrolled in one prescription drug plan and is 
subsequently reassigned by the Secretary to a new prescription drug 
plan, provide the individual, within 30 days of such reassignment, 
with--
        ``(1) information on formulary differences between the 
    individual's former plan and the plan to which the individual is 
    reassigned with respect to the individual's drug regimens; and
        ``(2) a description of the individual's right to request a 
    coverage determination, exception, or reconsideration under section 
    1860D-4(g), bring an appeal under section 1860D-4(h), or resolve a 
    grievance under section 1860D-4(f).''.

SEC. 3306. FUNDING OUTREACH AND ASSISTANCE FOR LOW-INCOME PROGRAMS.

    (a) Additional Funding for State Health Insurance Programs.--
Subsection (a)(1)(B) of section 119 of the Medicare Improvements for 
Patients and Providers Act of 2008 (42 U.S.C. 1395b-3 note) is amended 
by striking ``(42 U.S.C. 1395w-23(f))'' and all that follows through 
the period at the end and inserting ``(42 U.S.C. 1395w-23(f)), to the 
Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services Program Management Account--
                ``(i) for fiscal year 2009, of $7,500,000; and
                ``(ii) for the period of fiscal years 2010 through 
            2012, of $15,000,000.
        Amounts appropriated under this subparagraph shall remain 
        available until expended.''.
    (b) Additional Funding for Area Agencies on Aging.--Subsection 
(b)(1)(B) of such section 119 is amended by striking ``(42 U.S.C. 
1395w-23(f))'' and all that follows through the period at the end and 
inserting ``(42 U.S.C. 1395w-23(f)), to the Administration on Aging--
                ``(i) for fiscal year 2009, of $7,500,000; and
                ``(ii) for the period of fiscal years 2010 through 
            2012, of $15,000,000.
        Amounts appropriated under this subparagraph shall remain 
        available until expended.''.
    (c) Additional Funding for Aging and Disability Resource Centers.--
Subsection (c)(1)(B) of such section 119 is amended by striking ``(42 
U.S.C. 1395w-23(f))'' and all that follows through the period at the 
end and inserting ``(42 U.S.C. 1395w-23(f)), to the Administration on 
Aging--
                ``(i) for fiscal year 2009, of $5,000,000; and
                ``(ii) for the period of fiscal years 2010 through 
            2012, of $10,000,000.
        Amounts appropriated under this subparagraph shall remain 
        available until expended.''.
    (d) Additional Funding for Contract With the National Center for 
Benefits and Outreach Enrollment.--Subsection (d)(2) of such section 
119 is amended by striking ``(42 U.S.C. 1395w-23(f))'' and all that 
follows through the period at the end and inserting ``(42 U.S.C. 1395w-
23(f)), to the Administration on Aging--
                ``(i) for fiscal year 2009, of $5,000,000; and
                ``(ii) for the period of fiscal years 2010 through 
            2012, of $5,000,000.
        Amounts appropriated under this subparagraph shall remain 
        available until expended.''.
    (e) Secretarial Authority To Enlist Support in Conducting Certain 
Outreach Activities.--Such section 119 is amended by adding at the end 
the following new subsection:
    ``(g) Secretarial Authority To Enlist Support in Conducting Certain 
Outreach Activities.--The Secretary may request that an entity awarded 
a grant under this section support the conduct of outreach activities 
aimed at preventing disease and promoting wellness. Notwithstanding any 
other provision of this section, an entity may use a grant awarded 
under this subsection to support the conduct of activities described in 
the preceding sentence.''.

SEC. 3307. IMPROVING FORMULARY REQUIREMENTS FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUG PLANS 
              AND MA-PD PLANS WITH RESPECT TO CERTAIN CATEGORIES OR 
              CLASSES OF DRUGS.

    (a) Improving Formulary Requirements.--Section 1860D-4(b)(3)(G) of 
the Social Security Act is amended to read as follows:
            ``(G) Required inclusion of drugs in certain categories and 
        classes.--
                ``(i) Formulary requirements.--

                    ``(I) In general.--Subject to subclause (II), a PDP 
                sponsor offering a prescription drug plan shall be 
                required to include all covered part D drugs in the 
                categories and classes identified by the Secretary 
                under clause (ii)(I).
                    ``(II) Exceptions.--The Secretary may establish 
                exceptions that permit a PDP sponsor offering a 
                prescription drug plan to exclude from its formulary a 
                particular covered part D drug in a category or class 
                that is otherwise required to be included in the 
                formulary under subclause (I) (or to otherwise limit 
                access to such a drug, including through prior 
                authorization or utilization management).

                ``(ii) Identification of drugs in certain categories 
            and classes.--

                    ``(I) In general.--Subject to clause (iv), the 
                Secretary shall identify, as appropriate, categories 
                and classes of drugs for which the Secretary determines 
                are of clinical concern.
                    ``(II) Criteria.--The Secretary shall use criteria 
                established by the Secretary in making any 
                determination under subclause (I).

                ``(iii) Implementation.--The Secretary shall establish 
            the criteria under clause (ii)(II) and any exceptions under 
            clause (i)(II) through the promulgation of a regulation 
            which includes a public notice and comment period.
                ``(iv) Requirement for certain categories and classes 
            until criteria established.--Until such time as the 
            Secretary establishes the criteria under clause (ii)(II) 
            the following categories and classes of drugs shall be 
            identified under clause (ii)(I):

                    ``(I) Anticonvulsants.
                    ``(II) Antidepressants.
                    ``(III) Antineoplastics.
                    ``(IV) Antipsychotics.
                    ``(V) Antiretrovirals.
                    ``(VI) Immunosuppressants for the treatment of 
                transplant rejection.''.

    (b) Effective Date.--The amendments made by this section shall 
apply to plan year 2011 and subsequent plan years.

SEC. 3308. REDUCING PART D PREMIUM SUBSIDY FOR HIGH-INCOME 
              BENEFICIARIES.

    (a) Income-Related Increase in Part D Premium.--
        (1) In general.--Section 1860D-13(a) of the Social Security Act 
    (42 U.S.C. 1395w-113(a)) is amended by adding at the end the 
    following new paragraph:
        ``(7) Increase in base beneficiary premium based on income.--
            ``(A) In general.--In the case of an individual whose 
        modified adjusted gross income exceeds the threshold amount 
        applicable under paragraph (2) of section 1839(i) (including 
        application of paragraph (5) of such section) for the calendar 
        year, the monthly amount of the beneficiary premium applicable 
        under this section for a month after December 2010 shall be 
        increased by the monthly adjustment amount specified in 
        subparagraph (B).
            ``(B) Monthly adjustment amount.--The monthly adjustment 
        amount specified in this subparagraph for an individual for a 
        month in a year is equal to the product of--
                ``(i) the quotient obtained by dividing--

                    ``(I) the applicable percentage determined under 
                paragraph (3)(C) of section 1839(i) (including 
                application of paragraph (5) of such section) for the 
                individual for the calendar year reduced by 25.5 
                percent; by
                    ``(II) 25.5 percent; and

                ``(ii) the base beneficiary premium (as computed under 
            paragraph (2)).
            ``(C) Modified adjusted gross income.--For purposes of this 
        paragraph, the term `modified adjusted gross income' has the 
        meaning given such term in subparagraph (A) of section 
        1839(i)(4), determined for the taxable year applicable under 
        subparagraphs (B) and (C) of such section.
            ``(D) Determination by commissioner of social security.--
        The Commissioner of Social Security shall make any 
        determination necessary to carry out the income-related 
        increase in the base beneficiary premium under this paragraph.
            ``(E) Procedures to assure correct income-related increase 
        in base beneficiary premium.--
                ``(i) Disclosure of base beneficiary premium.--Not 
            later than September 15 of each year beginning with 2010, 
            the Secretary shall disclose to the Commissioner of Social 
            Security the amount of the base beneficiary premium (as 
            computed under paragraph (2)) for the purpose of carrying 
            out the income-related increase in the base beneficiary 
            premium under this paragraph with respect to the following 
            year.
                ``(ii) Additional disclosure.--Not later than October 
            15 of each year beginning with 2010, the Secretary shall 
            disclose to the Commissioner of Social Security the 
            following information for the purpose of carrying out the 
            income-related increase in the base beneficiary premium 
            under this paragraph with respect to the following year:

                    ``(I) The modified adjusted gross income threshold 
                applicable under paragraph (2) of section 1839(i) 
                (including application of paragraph (5) of such 
                section).
                    ``(II) The applicable percentage determined under 
                paragraph (3)(C) of section 1839(i) (including 
                application of paragraph (5) of such section).
                    ``(III) The monthly adjustment amount specified in 
                subparagraph (B).
                    ``(IV) Any other information the Commissioner of 
                Social Security determines necessary to carry out the 
                income-related increase in the base beneficiary premium 
                under this paragraph.

            ``(F) Rule of construction.--The formula used to determine 
        the monthly adjustment amount specified under subparagraph (B) 
        shall only be used for the purpose of determining such monthly 
        adjustment amount under such subparagraph.''.
        (2) Collection of monthly adjustment amount.--Section 1860D-
    13(c) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-113(c)) is 
    amended--
            (A) in paragraph (1), by striking ``(2) and (3)'' and 
        inserting ``(2), (3), and (4)''; and
            (B) by adding at the end the following new paragraph:
        ``(4) Collection of monthly adjustment amount.--
            ``(A) In general.--Notwithstanding any provision of this 
        subsection or section 1854(d)(2), subject to subparagraph (B), 
        the amount of the income-related increase in the base 
        beneficiary premium for an individual for a month (as 
        determined under subsection (a)(7)) shall be paid through 
        withholding from benefit payments in the manner provided under 
        section 1840.
            ``(B) Agreements.--In the case where the monthly benefit 
        payments of an individual that are withheld under subparagraph 
        (A) are insufficient to pay the amount described in such 
        subparagraph, the Commissioner of Social Security shall enter 
        into agreements with the Secretary, the Director of the Office 
        of Personnel Management, and the Railroad Retirement Board as 
        necessary in order to allow other agencies to collect the 
        amount described in subparagraph (A) that was not withheld 
        under such subparagraph.''.
    (b) Conforming Amendments.--
        (1) Medicare.--Section 1860D-13(a)(1) of the Social Security 
    Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-113(a)(1)) is amended--
            (A) by redesignating subparagraph (F) as subparagraph (G);
            (B) in subparagraph (G), as redesignated by subparagraph 
        (A), by striking ``(D) and (E)'' and inserting ``(D), (E), and 
        (F)''; and
            (C) by inserting after subparagraph (E) the following new 
        subparagraph:
            ``(F) Increase based on income.--The monthly beneficiary 
        premium shall be increased pursuant to paragraph (7).''.
        (2) Internal revenue code.--Section 6103(l)(20) of the Internal 
    Revenue Code of 1986 (relating to disclosure of return information 
    to carry out Medicare part B premium subsidy adjustment) is 
    amended--
            (A) in the heading, by inserting ``and part d base 
        beneficiary premium increase'' after ``part b premium subsidy 
        adjustment'';
            (B) in subparagraph (A)--
                (i) in the matter preceding clause (i), by inserting 
            ``or increase under section 1860D-13(a)(7)'' after 
            ``1839(i)''; and
                (ii) in clause (vii), by inserting after ``subsection 
            (i) of such section'' the following: ``or increase under 
            section 1860D-13(a)(7) of such Act''; and
            (C) in subparagraph (B)--
                (i) by striking ``Return information'' and inserting 
            the following:
                ``(i) In general.--Return information'';
                (ii) by inserting ``or increase under such section 
            1860D-13(a)(7)'' before the period at the end;
                (iii) as amended by clause (i), by inserting ``or for 
            the purpose of resolving taxpayer appeals with respect to 
            any such premium adjustment or increase'' before the period 
            at the end; and
                (iv) by adding at the end the following new clause:
                ``(ii) Disclosure to other agencies.--Officers, 
            employees, and contractors of the Social Security 
            Administration may disclose--

                    ``(I) the taxpayer identity information and the 
                amount of the premium subsidy adjustment or premium 
                increase with respect to a taxpayer described in 
                subparagraph (A) to officers, employees, and 
                contractors of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 
                Services, to the extent that such disclosure is 
                necessary for the collection of the premium subsidy 
                amount or the increased premium amount,
                    ``(II) the taxpayer identity information and the 
                amount of the premium subsidy adjustment or the 
                increased premium amount with respect to a taxpayer 
                described in subparagraph (A) to officers and employees 
                of the Office of Personnel Management and the Railroad 
                Retirement Board, to the extent that such disclosure is 
                necessary for the collection of the premium subsidy 
                amount or the increased premium amount,
                    ``(III) return information with respect to a 
                taxpayer described in subparagraph (A) to officers and 
                employees of the Department of Health and Human 
                Services to the extent necessary to resolve 
                administrative appeals of such premium subsidy 
                adjustment or increased premium, and
                    ``(IV) return information with respect to a 
                taxpayer described in subparagraph (A) to officers and 
                employees of the Department of Justice for use in 
                judicial proceedings to the extent necessary to carry 
                out the purposes described in clause (i).''.

SEC. 3309. ELIMINATION OF COST SHARING FOR CERTAIN DUAL ELIGIBLE 
              INDIVIDUALS.

    Section 1860D-14(a)(1)(D)(i) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 
1395w-114(a)(1)(D)(i)) is amended by inserting ``or, effective on a 
date specified by the Secretary (but in no case earlier than January 1, 
2012), who would be such an institutionalized individual or couple, if 
the full-benefit dual eligible individual were not receiving services 
under a home and community-based waiver authorized for a State under 
section 1115 or subsection (c) or (d) of section 1915 or under a State 
plan amendment under subsection (i) of such section or services 
provided through enrollment in a medicaid managed care organization 
with a contract under section 1903(m) or under section 1932'' after 
``1902(q)(1)(B))''.

SEC. 3310. REDUCING WASTEFUL DISPENSING OF OUTPATIENT PRESCRIPTION 
              DRUGS IN LONG-TERM CARE FACILITIES UNDER PRESCRIPTION 
              DRUG PLANS AND MA-PD PLANS.

    (a) In General.--Section 1860D-4(c) of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395w-104(c)) is amended by adding at the end the following new 
paragraph:
        ``(3) Reducing wasteful dispensing of outpatient prescription 
    drugs in long-term care facilities.--The Secretary shall require 
    PDP sponsors of prescription drug plans to utilize specific, 
    uniform dispensing techniques, as determined by the Secretary, in 
    consultation with relevant stakeholders (including representatives 
    of nursing facilities, residents of nursing facilities, 
    pharmacists, the pharmacy industry (including retail and long-term 
    care pharmacy), prescription drug plans, MA-PD plans, and any other 
    stakeholders the Secretary determines appropriate), such as weekly, 
    daily, or automated dose dispensing, when dispensing covered part D 
    drugs to enrollees who reside in a long-term care facility in order 
    to reduce waste associated with 30-day fills.''.
    (b) Effective Date.--The amendment made by subsection (a) shall 
apply to plan years beginning on or after January 1, 2012.

SEC. 3311. IMPROVED MEDICARE PRESCRIPTION DRUG PLAN AND MA-PD PLAN 
              COMPLAINT SYSTEM.

    (a) In General.--The Secretary shall develop and maintain a 
complaint system, that is widely known and easy to use, to collect and 
maintain information on MA-PD plan and prescription drug plan 
complaints that are received (including by telephone, letter, e-mail, 
or any other means) by the Secretary (including by a regional office of 
the Department of Health and Human Services, the Medicare Beneficiary 
Ombudsman, a subcontractor, a carrier, a fiscal intermediary, and a 
Medicare administrative contractor under section 1874A of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395kk)) through the date on which the 
complaint is resolved. The system shall be able to report and initiate 
appropriate interventions and monitoring based on substantial 
complaints and to guide quality improvement.
    (b) Model Electronic Complaint Form.--The Secretary shall develop a 
model electronic complaint form to be used for reporting plan 
complaints under the system. Such form shall be prominently displayed 
on the front page of the Medicare.gov Internet website and on the 
Internet website of the Medicare Beneficiary Ombudsman.
    (c) Annual Reports by the Secretary.--The Secretary shall submit to 
Congress annual reports on the system. Such reports shall include an 
analysis of the number and types of complaints reported in the system, 
geographic variations in such complaints, the timeliness of agency or 
plan responses to such complaints, and the resolution of such 
complaints.
    (d) Definitions.--In this section:
        (1) MA-PD plan.--The term ``MA-PD plan'' has the meaning given 
    such term in section 1860D-41(a)(9) of such Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-
    151(a)(9)).
        (2) Prescription drug plan.--The term ``prescription drug 
    plan'' has the meaning given such term in section 1860D-41(a)(14) 
    of such Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-151(a)(14)).
        (3) Secretary.--The term ``Secretary'' means the Secretary of 
    Health and Human Services.
        (4) System.--The term ``system'' means the plan complaint 
    system developed and maintained under subsection (a).

SEC. 3312. UNIFORM EXCEPTIONS AND APPEALS PROCESS FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUG 
              PLANS AND MA-PD PLANS.

    (a) In General.--Section 1860D-4(b)(3) of the Social Security Act 
(42 U.S.C. 1395w-104(b)(3)) is amended by adding at the end the 
following new subparagraph:
            ``(H) Use of single, uniform exceptions and appeals 
        process.--Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, 
        each PDP sponsor of a prescription drug plan shall--
                ``(i) use a single, uniform exceptions and appeals 
            process (including, to the extent the Secretary determines 
            feasible, a single, uniform model form for use under such 
            process) with respect to the determination of prescription 
            drug coverage for an enrollee under the plan; and
                ``(ii) provide instant access to such process by 
            enrollees through a toll-free telephone number and an 
            Internet website.''.
    (b) Effective Date.--The amendment made by subsection (a) shall 
apply to exceptions and appeals on or after January 1, 2012.

SEC. 3313. OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL STUDIES AND REPORTS.

    (a) Study and Annual Report on Part D Formularies' Inclusion of 
Drugs Commonly Used by Dual Eligibles.--
        (1) Study.--The Inspector General of the Department of Health 
    and Human Services shall conduct a study of the extent to which 
    formularies used by prescription drug plans and MA-PD plans under 
    part D include drugs commonly used by full-benefit dual eligible 
    individuals (as defined in section 1935(c)(6) of the Social 
    Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1396u-5(c)(6))).
        (2) Annual reports.--Not later than July 1 of each year 
    (beginning with 2011), the Inspector General shall submit to 
    Congress a report on the study conducted under paragraph (1), 
    together with such recommendations as the Inspector General 
    determines appropriate.
    (b) Study and Report on Prescription Drug Prices Under Medicare 
Part D and Medicaid.--
        (1) Study.--
            (A) In general.--The Inspector General of the Department of 
        Health and Human Services shall conduct a study on prices for 
        covered part D drugs under the Medicare prescription drug 
        program under part D of title XVIII of the Social Security Act 
        and for covered outpatient drugs under title XIX. Such study 
        shall include the following:
                (i) A comparison, with respect to the 200 most 
            frequently dispensed covered part D drugs under such 
            program and covered outpatient drugs under such title (as 
            determined by the Inspector General based on volume and 
            expenditures), of--

                    (I) the prices paid for covered part D drugs by PDP 
                sponsors of prescription drug plans and Medicare 
                Advantage organizations offering MA-PD plans; and
                    (II) the prices paid for covered outpatient drugs 
                by a State plan under title XIX.

                (ii) An assessment of--

                    (I) the financial impact of any discrepancies in 
                such prices on the Federal Government; and
                    (II) the financial impact of any such discrepancies 
                on enrollees under part D or individuals eligible for 
                medical assistance under a State plan under title XIX.

            (B) Price.--For purposes of subparagraph (A), the price of 
        a covered part D drug or a covered outpatient drug shall 
        include any rebate or discount under such program or such 
        title, respectively, including any negotiated price concession 
        described in section 1860D-2(d)(1)(B) of the Social Security 
        Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-102(d)(1)(B)) or rebate under an agreement 
        under section 1927 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1396r-
        8).
            (C) Authority to collect any necessary information.--
        Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Inspector 
        General of the Department of Health and Human Services shall be 
        able to collect any information related to the prices of 
        covered part D drugs under such program and covered outpatient 
        drugs under such title XIX necessary to carry out the 
        comparison under subparagraph (A).
        (2) Report.--
            (A) In general.--Not later than October 1, 2011, subject to 
        subparagraph (B), the Inspector General shall submit to 
        Congress a report containing the results of the study conducted 
        under paragraph (1), together with recommendations for such 
        legislation and administrative action as the Inspector General 
        determines appropriate.
            (B) Limitation on information contained in report.--The 
        report submitted under subparagraph (A) shall not include any 
        information that the Inspector General determines is 
        proprietary or is likely to negatively impact the ability of a 
        PDP sponsor or a State plan under title XIX to negotiate prices 
        for covered part D drugs or covered outpatient drugs, 
        respectively.
        (3) Definitions.--In this section:
            (A) Covered part d drug.--The term ``covered part D drug'' 
        has the meaning given such term in section 1860D-2(e) of the 
        Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-102(e)).
            (B) Covered outpatient drug.--The term ``covered outpatient 
        drug'' has the meaning given such term in section 1927(k) of 
        such Act (42 U.S.C. 1396r(k)).
            (C) MA-PD plan.--The term ``MA-PD plan'' has the meaning 
        given such term in section 1860D-41(a)(9) of such Act (42 
        U.S.C. 1395w-151(a)(9)).
            (D) Medicare advantage organization.--The term ``Medicare 
        Advantage organization'' has the meaning given such term in 
        section 1859(a)(1) of such Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-28)(a)(1)).
            (E) PDP sponsor.--The term ``PDP sponsor'' has the meaning 
        given such term in section 1860D-41(a)(13) of such Act (42 
        U.S.C. 1395w-151(a)(13)).
            (F) Prescription drug plan.--The term ``prescription drug 
        plan'' has the meaning given such term in section 1860D-
        41(a)(14) of such Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-151(a)(14)).

SEC. 3314. INCLUDING COSTS INCURRED BY AIDS DRUG ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS 
              AND INDIAN HEALTH SERVICE IN PROVIDING PRESCRIPTION DRUGS 
              TOWARD THE ANNUAL OUT-OF-POCKET THRESHOLD UNDER PART D.

    (a) In General.--Section 1860D-2(b)(4)(C) of the Social Security 
Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-102(b)(4)(C)) is amended--
        (1) in clause (i), by striking ``and'' at the end;
        (2) in clause (ii)--
            (A) by striking ``such costs shall be treated as incurred 
        only if'' and inserting ``subject to clause (iii), such costs 
        shall be treated as incurred only if'';
            (B) by striking ``, under section 1860D-14, or under a 
        State Pharmaceutical Assistance Program''; and
            (C) by striking the period at the end and inserting ``; 
        and''; and
        (3) by inserting after clause (ii) the following new clause:
                ``(iii) such costs shall be treated as incurred and 
            shall not be considered to be reimbursed under clause (ii) 
            if such costs are borne or paid--

                    ``(I) under section 1860D-14;
                    ``(II) under a State Pharmaceutical Assistance 
                Program;
                    ``(III) by the Indian Health Service, an Indian 
                tribe or tribal organization, or an urban Indian 
                organization (as defined in section 4 of the Indian 
                Health Care Improvement Act); or
                    ``(IV) under an AIDS Drug Assistance Program under 
                part B of title XXVI of the Public Health Service 
                Act.''.

    (b) Effective Date.--The amendments made by subsection (a) shall 
apply to costs incurred on or after January 1, 2011.

SEC. 3315. IMMEDIATE REDUCTION IN COVERAGE GAP IN 2010.

    Section 1860D-2(b) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395w-
102(b)) is amended--
        (1) in paragraph (3)(A), by striking ``paragraph (4)'' and 
    inserting ``paragraphs (4) and (7)''; and
        (2) by adding at the end the following new paragraph:
        ``(7) Increase in initial coverage limit in 2010.--
            ``(A) In general.--For the plan year beginning on January 
        1, 2010, the initial coverage limit described in paragraph 
        (3)(B) otherwise applicable shall be increased by $500.
            ``(B) Application.--In applying subparagraph (A)--
                ``(i) except as otherwise provided in this 
            subparagraph, there shall be no change in the premiums, 
            bids, or any other parameters under this part or part C;
                ``(ii) costs that would be treated as incurred costs 
            for purposes of applying paragraph (4) but for the 
            application of subparagraph (A) shall continue to be 
            treated as incurred costs;
                ``(iii) the Secretary shall establish procedures, which 
            may include a reconciliation process, to fully reimburse 
            PDP sponsors with respect to prescription drug plans and MA 
            organizations with respect to MA-PD plans for the reduction 
            in beneficiary cost sharing associated with the application 
            of subparagraph (A);
                ``(iv) the Secretary shall develop an estimate of the 
            additional increased costs attributable to the application 
            of this paragraph for increased drug utilization and 
            financing and administrative costs and shall use such 
            estimate to adjust payments to PDP sponsors with respect to 
            prescription drug plans under this part and MA 
            organizations with respect to MA-PD plans under part C; and
                ``(v) the Secretary shall establish procedures for 
            retroactive reimbursement of part D eligible individuals 
            who are covered under such a plan for costs which are 
            incurred before the date of initial implementation of 
            subparagraph (A) and which would be reimbursed under such a 
            plan if such implementation occurred as of January 1, 2010.
            ``(C) No effect on subsequent years.--The increase under 
        subparagraph (A) shall only apply with respect to the plan year 
        beginning on January 1, 2010, and the initial coverage limit 
        for plan years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, shall be 
        determined as if subparagraph (A) had never applied.''.

              Subtitle E--Ensuring Medicare Sustainability

SEC. 3401. REVISION OF CERTAIN MARKET BASKET UPDATES AND INCORPORATION 
              OF PRODUCTIVITY IMPROVEMENTS INTO MARKET BASKET UPDATES 
              THAT DO NOT ALREADY INCORPORATE SUCH IMPROVEMENTS.

    (a) Inpatient Acute Hospitals.--Section 1886(b)(3)(B) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ww(b)(3)(B)), as amended by section 
3001(a)(3), is further amended--
        (1) in clause (i)(XX), by striking ``clause (viii)'' and 
    inserting ``clauses (viii), (ix), (xi), and (xii)'';
        (2) in the first sentence of clause (viii), by inserting ``of 
    such applicable percentage increase (determined without regard to 
    clause (ix), (xi), or (xii))'' after ``one-quarter'';
        (3) in the first sentence of clause (ix)(I), by inserting 
    ``(determined without regard to clause (viii), (xi), or (xii))'' 
    after ``clause (i)'' the second time it appears; and
        (4) by adding at the end the following new clauses:
    ``(xi)(I) For 2012 and each subsequent fiscal year, after 
determining the applicable percentage increase described in clause (i) 
and after application of clauses (viii) and (ix), such percentage 
increase shall be reduced by the productivity adjustment described in 
subclause (II).
    ``(II) The productivity adjustment described in this subclause, 
with respect to a percentage, factor, or update for a fiscal year, 
year, cost reporting period, or other annual period, is a productivity 
adjustment equal to the 10-year moving average of changes in annual 
economy-wide private nonfarm business multi-factor productivity (as 
projected by the Secretary for the 10-year period ending with the 
applicable fiscal year, year, cost reporting period, or other annual 
period).
    ``(III) The application of subclause (I) may result in the 
applicable percentage increase described in clause (i) being less than 
0.0 for a fiscal year, and may result in payment rates under this 
section for a fiscal year being less than such payment rates for the 
preceding fiscal year.
    ``(xii) After determining the applicable percentage increase 
described in clause (i), and after application of clauses (viii), (ix), 
and (xi), the Secretary shall reduce such applicable percentage 
increase--
        ``(I) for each of fiscal years 2010 and 2011, by 0.25 
    percentage point; and
        ``(II) subject to clause (xiii), for each of fiscal years 2012 
    through 2019, by 0.2 percentage point.
The application of this clause may result in the applicable percentage 
increase described in clause (i) being less than 0.0 for a fiscal year, 
and may result in payment rates under this section for a fiscal year 
being less than such payment rates for the preceding fiscal year.
    ``(xiii) Clause (xii) shall be applied with respect to any of 
fiscal years 2014 through 2019 by substituting `0.0 percentage points' 
for `0.2 percentage point', if for such fiscal year--
        ``(I) the excess (if any) of--
            ``(aa) the total percentage of the non-elderly insured 
        population for the preceding fiscal year (based on the most 
        recent estimates available from the Director of the 
        Congressional Budget Office before a vote in either House on 
        the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act that, if 
        determined in the affirmative, would clear such Act for 
        enrollment); over
            ``(bb) the total percentage of the non-elderly insured 
        population for such preceding fiscal year (as estimated by the 
        Secretary); exceeds
        ``(II) 5 percentage points.''.
    (b) Skilled Nursing Facilities.--Section 1888(e)(5)(B) of the 
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395yy(e)(5)(B)) is amended--
        (1) by striking ``percentage.--The term'' and inserting 
    ``percentage.--
                ``(i) In general.--Subject to clause (ii), the term''; 
            and
        (2) by adding at the end the following new clause:
                ``(ii) Adjustment.--For fiscal year 2012 and each 
            subsequent fiscal year, after determining the percentage 
            described in clause (i), the Secretary shall reduce such 
            percentage by the productivity adjustment described in 
            section 1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II). The application of the 
            preceding sentence may result in such percentage being less 
            than 0.0 for a fiscal year, and may result in payment rates 
            under this subsection for a fiscal year being less than 
            such payment rates for the preceding fiscal year.''.
    (c) Long-term Care Hospitals.--Section 1886(m) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ww(m)) is amended by adding at the end the 
following new paragraphs:
        ``(3) Implementation for rate year 2010 and subsequent years.--
            ``(A) In general.--In implementing the system described in 
        paragraph (1) for rate year 2010 and each subsequent rate year, 
        any annual update to a standard Federal rate for discharges for 
        the hospital during the rate year, shall be reduced--
                ``(i) for rate year 2012 and each subsequent rate year, 
            by the productivity adjustment described in section 
            1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II); and
                ``(ii) for each of rate years 2010 through 2019, by the 
            other adjustment described in paragraph (4).
            ``(B) Special rule.--The application of this paragraph may 
        result in such annual update being less than 0.0 for a rate 
        year, and may result in payment rates under the system 
        described in paragraph (1) for a rate year being less than such 
        payment rates for the preceding rate year.
        ``(4) Other adjustment.--
            ``(A) In general.--For purposes of paragraph (3)(A)(ii), 
        the other adjustment described in this paragraph is--
                ``(i) for each of rate years 2010 and 2011, 0.25 
            percentage point; and
                ``(ii) subject to subparagraph (B), for each of rate 
            years 2012 through 2019, 0.2 percentage point.
            ``(B) Reduction of other adjustment.--Subparagraph (A)(ii) 
        shall be applied with respect to any of rate years 2014 through 
        2019 by substituting `0.0 percentage points' for `0.2 
        percentage point', if for such rate year--
                ``(i) the excess (if any) of--

                    ``(I) the total percentage of the non-elderly 
                insured population for the preceding rate year (based 
                on the most recent estimates available from the 
                Director of the Congressional Budget Office before a 
                vote in either House on the Patient Protection and 
                Affordable Care Act that, if determined in the 
                affirmative, would clear such Act for enrollment); over
                    ``(II) the total percentage of the non-elderly 
                insured population for such preceding rate year (as 
                estimated by the Secretary); exceeds

                ``(ii) 5 percentage points.''.
    (d) Inpatient Rehabilitation Facilities.--Section 1886(j)(3) of the 
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395ww(j)(3)) is amended--
        (1) in subparagraph (C)--
            (A) by striking ``factor.--For purposes'' and inserting 
        ``factor.--
                ``(i) In general.--For purposes'';
            (B) by inserting ``subject to clause (ii)'' before the 
        period at the end of the first sentence of clause (i), as added 
        by paragraph (1); and
            (C) by adding at the end the following new clause:
                ``(ii) Productivity and other adjustment.--After 
            establishing the increase factor described in clause (i) 
            for a fiscal year, the Secretary shall reduce such increase 
            factor--

                    ``(I) for fiscal year 2012 and each subsequent 
                fiscal year, by the productivity adjustment described 
                in section 1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II); and
                    ``(II) for each of fiscal years 2010 through 2019, 
                by the other adjustment described in subparagraph (D).

            The application of this clause may result in the increase 
            factor under this subparagraph being less than 0.0 for a 
            fiscal year, and may result in payment rates under this 
            subsection for a fiscal year being less than such payment 
            rates for the preceding fiscal year.''; and
        (2) by adding at the end the following new subparagraph:
            ``(D) Other adjustment.--
                ``(i) In general.--For purposes of subparagraph 
            (C)(ii)(II), the other adjustment described in this 
            subparagraph is--

                    ``(I) for each of fiscal years 2010 and 2011, 0.25 
                percentage point; and
                    ``(II) subject to clause (ii), for each of fiscal 
                years 2012 through 2019, 0.2 percentage point.

                ``(ii) Reduction of other adjustment.--Clause (i)(II) 
            shall be applied with respect to any of fiscal years 2014 
            through 2019 by substituting `0.0 percentage points' for 
            `0.2 percentage point', if for such fiscal year--

                    ``(I) the excess (if any) of--

                        ``(aa) the total percentage of the non-elderly 
                    insured population for the preceding fiscal year 
                    (based on the most recent estimates available from 
                    the Director of the Congressional Budget Office 
                    before a vote in either House on the Patient 
                    Protection and Affordable Care Act that, if 
                    determined in the affirmative, would clear such Act 
                    for enrollment); over
                        ``(bb) the total percentage of the non-elderly 
                    insured population for such preceding fiscal year 
                    (as estimated by the Secretary); exceeds

                    ``(II) 5 percentage points.''.

    (e) Home Health Agencies.--Section 1895(b)(3)(B) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395fff(b)(3)(B)) is amended--
        (1) in clause (ii)(V), by striking ``clause (v)'' and inserting 
    ``clauses (v) and (vi)''; and
        (2) by adding at the end the following new clause:
                ``(vi) Adjustments.--After determining the home health 
            market basket percentage increase under clause (iii), and 
            after application of clause (v), the Secretary shall reduce 
            such percentage--

                    ``(I) for 2015 and each subsequent year, by the 
                productivity adjustment described in section 
                1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II); and
                    ``(II) for each of 2011 and 2012, by 1 percentage 
                point.

            The application of this clause may result in the home 
            health market basket percentage increase under clause (iii) 
            being less than 0.0 for a year, and may result in payment 
            rates under the system under this subsection for a year 
            being less than such payment rates for the preceding 
            year.''.
    (f) Psychiatric Hospitals.--Section 1886 of the Social Security 
Act, as amended by sections 3001, 3008, 3025, and 3133, is amended by 
adding at the end the following new subsection:
    ``(s) Prospective Payment for Psychiatric Hospitals.--
        ``(1) Reference to establishment and implementation of 
    system.--For provisions related to the establishment and 
    implementation of a prospective payment system for payments under 
    this title for inpatient hospital services furnished by psychiatric 
    hospitals (as described in clause (i) of subsection (d)(1)(B)) and 
    psychiatric units (as described in the matter following clause (v) 
    of such subsection), see section 124 of the Medicare, Medicaid, and 
    SCHIP Balanced Budget Refinement Act of 1999.
        ``(2) Implementation for rate year beginning in 2010 and 
    subsequent rate years.--
            ``(A) In general.--In implementing the system described in 
        paragraph (1) for the rate year beginning in 2010 and any 
        subsequent rate year, any update to a base rate for days during 
        the rate year for a psychiatric hospital or unit, respectively, 
        shall be reduced--
                ``(i) for the rate year beginning in 2012 and each 
            subsequent rate year, by the productivity adjustment 
            described in section 1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II); and
                ``(ii) for each of the rate years beginning in 2010 
            through 2019, by the other adjustment described in 
            paragraph (3).
            ``(B) Special rule.--The application of this paragraph may 
        result in such update being less than 0.0 for a rate year, and 
        may result in payment rates under the system described in 
        paragraph (1) for a rate year being less than such payment 
        rates for the preceding rate year.
        ``(3) Other adjustment.--
            ``(A) In general.--For purposes of paragraph (2)(A)(ii), 
        the other adjustment described in this paragraph is--
                ``(i) for each of the rate years beginning in 2010 and 
            2011, 0.25 percentage point; and
                ``(ii) subject to subparagraph (B), for each of the 
            rate years beginning in 2012 through 2019, 0.2 percentage 
            point.
            ``(B) Reduction of other adjustment.--Subparagraph (A)(ii) 
        shall be applied with respect to any of rate years 2014 through 
        2019 by substituting `0.0 percentage points' for `0.2 
        percentage point', if for such rate year--
                ``(i) the excess (if any) of--

                    ``(I) the total percentage of the non-elderly 
                insured population for the preceding rate year (based 
                on the most recent estimates available from the 
                Director of the Congressional Budget Office before a 
                vote in either House on the Patient Protection and 
                Affordable Care Act that, if determined in the 
                affirmative, would clear such Act for enrollment); over
                    ``(II) the total percentage of the non-elderly 
                insured population for such preceding rate year (as 
                estimated by the Secretary); exceeds

                ``(ii) 5 percentage points.''.
    (g) Hospice Care.--Section 1814(i)(1)(C) of the Social Security Act 
(42 U.S.C. 1395f(i)(1)(C)), as amended by section 3132, is amended by 
adding at the end the following new clauses:
    ``(iv) After determining the market basket percentage increase 
under clause (ii)(VII) or (iii), as applicable, with respect to fiscal 
year 2013 and each subsequent fiscal year, the Secretary shall reduce 
such percentage--
        ``(I) for 2013 and each subsequent fiscal year, by the 
    productivity adjustment described in section 1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II); 
    and
        ``(II) subject to clause (v), for each of fiscal years 2013 
    through 2019, by 0.5 percentage point.
The application of this clause may result in the market basket 
percentage increase under clause (ii)(VII) or (iii), as applicable, 
being less than 0.0 for a fiscal year, and may result in payment rates 
under this subsection for a fiscal year being less than such payment 
rates for the preceding fiscal year.
    ``(v) Clause (iv)(II) shall be applied with respect to any of 
fiscal years 2014 through 2019 by substituting `0.0 percentage points' 
for `0.5 percentage point', if for such fiscal year--
        ``(I) the excess (if any) of--
            ``(aa) the total percentage of the non-elderly insured 
        population for the preceding fiscal year (based on the most 
        recent estimates available from the Director of the 
        Congressional Budget Office before a vote in either House on 
        the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act that, if 
        determined in the affirmative, would clear such Act for 
        enrollment); over
            ``(bb) the total percentage of the non-elderly insured 
        population for such preceding fiscal year (as estimated by the 
        Secretary); exceeds
        ``(II) 5 percentage points.''.
    (h) Dialysis.--Section 1881(b)(14)(F) of the Social Security Act 
(42 U.S.C. 1395rr(b)(14)(F)) is amended--
        (1) in clause (i)--
            (A) by inserting ``(I)'' after ``(F)(i)''
            (B) in subclause (I), as inserted by subparagraph (A)--
                (i) by striking ``clause (ii)'' and inserting 
            ``subclause (II) and clause (ii)''; and
                (ii) by striking ``minus 1.0 percentage point''; and
            (C) by adding at the end the following new subclause:
    ``(II) For 2012 and each subsequent year, after determining the 
increase factor described in subclause (I), the Secretary shall reduce 
such increase factor by the productivity adjustment described in 
section 1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II). The application of the preceding 
sentence may result in such increase factor being less than 0.0 for a 
year, and may result in payment rates under the payment system under 
this paragraph for a year being less than such payment rates for the 
preceding year.''; and
        (2) in clause (ii)(II)--
            (A) by striking ``The'' and inserting ``Subject to clause 
        (i)(II), the''; and
            (B) by striking ``clause (i) minus 1.0 percentage point'' 
        and inserting ``clause (i)(I)''.
    (i) Outpatient Hospitals.--Section 1833(t)(3) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395l(t)(3)) is amended--
        (1) in subparagraph (C)(iv), by inserting ``and subparagraph 
    (F) of this paragraph'' after ``(17)''; and
        (2) by adding at the end the following new subparagraphs:
            ``(F) Productivity and other adjustment.--After determining 
        the OPD fee schedule increase factor under subparagraph 
        (C)(iv), the Secretary shall reduce such increase factor--
                ``(i) for 2012 and subsequent years, by the 
            productivity adjustment described in section 
            1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II); and
                ``(ii) for each of 2010 through 2019, by the adjustment 
            described in subparagraph (G).
        The application of this subparagraph may result in the increase 
        factor under subparagraph (C)(iv) being less than 0.0 for a 
        year, and may result in payment rates under the payment system 
        under this subsection for a year being less than such payment 
        rates for the preceding year.
            ``(G) Other adjustment.--
                ``(i) Adjustment.--For purposes of subparagraph 
            (F)(ii), the adjustment described in this subparagraph is--

                    ``(I) for each of 2010 and 2011, 0.25 percentage 
                point; and
                    ``(II) subject to clause (ii), for each of 2012 
                through 2019, 0.2 percentage point.

                ``(ii) Reduction of other adjustment.--Clause (i)(II) 
            shall be applied with respect to any of 2014 through 2019 
            by substituting `0.0 percentage points' for `0.2 percentage 
            point', if for such year--

                    ``(I) the excess (if any) of--

                        ``(aa) the total percentage of the non-elderly 
                    insured population for the preceding year (based on 
                    the most recent estimates available from the 
                    Director of the Congressional Budget Office before 
                    a vote in either House on the Patient Protection 
                    and Affordable Care Act that, if determined in the 
                    affirmative, would clear such Act for enrollment); 
                    over
                        ``(bb) the total percentage of the non-elderly 
                    insured population for such preceding year (as 
                    estimated by the Secretary); exceeds

                    ``(II) 5 percentage points.''.

    (j) Ambulance Services.--Section 1834(l)(3) of the Social Security 
Act (42 U.S.C. 1395m(l)(3)) is amended--
        (1) in subparagraph (A), by striking ``and'' at the end;
        (2) in subparagraph (B)--
            (A) by inserting ``, subject to subparagraph (C) and the 
        succeeding sentence of this paragraph,'' after ``increased''; 
        and
            (B) by striking the period at the end and inserting ``; 
        and'';
        (3) by adding at the end the following new subparagraph:
            ``(C) for 2011 and each subsequent year, after determining 
        the percentage increase under subparagraph (B) for the year, 
        reduce such percentage increase by the productivity adjustment 
        described in section 1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II).''; and
        (4) by adding at the end the following flush sentence:
    ``The application of subparagraph (C) may result in the percentage 
    increase under subparagraph (B) being less than 0.0 for a year, and 
    may result in payment rates under the fee schedule under this 
    subsection for a year being less than such payment rates for the 
    preceding year.''.
    (k) Ambulatory Surgical Center Services.--Section 1833(i)(2)(D) of 
the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395l(i)(2)(D)) is amended--
        (1) by redesignating clause (v) as clause (vi); and
        (2) by inserting after clause (iv) the following new clause:
                ``(v) In implementing the system described in clause 
            (i) for 2011 and each subsequent year, any annual update 
            under such system for the year, after application of clause 
            (iv), shall be reduced by the productivity adjustment 
            described in section 1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II). The application 
            of the preceding sentence may result in such update being 
            less than 0.0 for a year, and may result in payment rates 
            under the system described in clause (i) for a year being 
            less than such payment rates for the preceding year.''.
    (l) Laboratory Services.--Section 1833(h)(2)(A) of the Social 
Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395l(h)(2)(A)) is amended--
        (1) in clause (i)--
            (A) by inserting ``, subject to clause (iv),'' after 
        ``year) by''; and
            (B) by striking ``through 2013'' and inserting ``and 
        2010''; and
        (2) by adding at the end the following new clause:
                ``(iv) After determining the adjustment to the fee 
            schedules under clause (i), the Secretary shall reduce such 
            adjustment--

                    ``(I) for 2011 and each subsequent year, by the 
                productivity adjustment described in section 
                1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II); and
                    ``(II) for each of 2011 through 2015, by 1.75 
                percentage points.

            Subclause (I) shall not apply in a year where the 
            adjustment to the fee schedules determined under clause (i) 
            is 0.0 or a percentage decrease for a year. The application 
            of the productivity adjustment under subclause (I) shall 
            not result in an adjustment to the fee schedules under 
            clause (i) being less than 0.0 for a year. The application 
            of subclause (II) may result in an adjustment to the fee 
            schedules under clause (i) being less than 0.0 for a year, 
            and may result in payment rates for a year being less than 
            such payment rates for the preceding year.''.
    (m) Certain Durable Medical Equipment.--Section 1834(a)(14) of the 
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395m(a)(14)) is amended--
        (1) in subparagraph (K)--
            (A) by striking ``2011, 2012, and 2013,''; and
            (B) by inserting ``and'' after the semicolon at the end;
        (2) by striking subparagraphs (L) and (M) and inserting the 
    following new subparagraph:
            ``(L) for 2011 and each subsequent year--
                ``(i) the percentage increase in the consumer price 
            index for all urban consumers (United States city average) 
            for the 12-month period ending with June of the previous 
            year, reduced by--
                ``(ii) the productivity adjustment described in section 
            1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II).''; and
        (3) by adding at the end the following flush sentence:
    ``The application of subparagraph (L)(ii) may result in the covered 
    item update under this paragraph being less than 0.0 for a year, 
    and may result in payment rates under this subsection for a year 
    being less than such payment rates for the preceding year.''.
    (n) Prosthetic Devices, Orthotics, and Prosthetics.--Section 
1834(h)(4) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395m(h)(4)) is 
amended--
        (1) in subparagraph (A)--
            (A) in clause (ix), by striking ``and'' at the end;
            (B) in clause (x)--
                (i) by striking ``a subsequent year'' and inserting 
            ``for each of 2007 through 2010''; and
                (ii) by inserting ``and'' after the semicolon at the 
            end;
            (C) by adding at the end the following new clause:
                ``(xi) for 2011 and each subsequent year--

                    ``(I) the percentage increase in the consumer price 
                index for all urban consumers (United States city 
                average) for the 12-month period ending with June of 
                the previous year, reduced by--
                    ``(II) the productivity adjustment described in 
                section 1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II).''; and

            (D) by adding at the end the following flush sentence:
    ``The application of subparagraph (A)(xi)(II) may result in the 
    applicable percentage increase under subparagraph (A) being less 
    than 0.0 for a year, and may result in payment rates under this 
    subsection for a year being less than such payment rates for the 
    preceding year.''.
    (o) Other Items.--Section 1842(s)(1) of the Social Security Act (42 
U.S.C. 1395u(s)(1)) is amended--
        (1) in the first sentence, by striking ``Subject to'' and 
    inserting ``(A) Subject to'';
        (2) by striking the second sentence and inserting the following 
    new subparagraph:
            ``(B) Any fee schedule established under this paragraph for 
        such item or service shall be updated--
                ``(i) for years before 2011--

                    ``(I) subject to subclause (II), by the percentage 
                increase in the consumer price index for all urban 
                consumers (United States city average) for the 12-month 
                period ending with June of the preceding year; and
                    ``(II) for items and services described in 
                paragraph (2)(D) for 2009, section 1834(a)(14)(J) shall 
                apply under this paragraph instead of the percentage 
                increase otherwise applicable; and

                ``(ii) for 2011 and subsequent years--

                    ``(I) the percentage increase in the consumer price 
                index for all urban consumers (United States city 
                average) for the 12-month period ending with June of 
                the previous year, reduced by--
                    ``(II) the productivity adjustment described in 
                section 1886(b)(3)(B)(xi)(II).''; and

        (3) by adding at the end the following flush sentence:
    ``The application of subparagraph (B)(ii)(II) may result in the 
    update under this paragraph being less than 0.0 for a year, and may 
    result in payment rates under any fee schedule established under 
    this paragraph for a year being less than such payment rates for 
    the preceding year.''.
    (p) No Application Prior to April 1, 2010.--Notwithstanding the 
preceding provisions of this section, the amendments made by 
subsections (a), (c), and (d) shall not apply to discharges occurring 
before April 1, 2010.

SEC. 3402. TEMPORARY ADJUSTMENT TO THE CALCULATION OF PART B PREMIUMS.

    Section 1839(i) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1395r(i)) is 
amended--
        (1) in paragraph (2), in the matter preceding subparagraph (A), 
    by inserting ``subject to paragraph (6),'' after ``subsection,'';
        (2) in paragraph (3)(A)(i), by striking ``The applicable'' and 
    inserting ``Subject to paragraph (6), the applicable'';
        (3) by redesignating paragraph (6) as paragraph (7); and
        (4) by inserting after paragraph (5) the following new 
    paragraph:
        ``(6) Temporary adjustment to income thresholds.--
    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, during the 
    period beginning on January 1, 2011, and ending on December 31, 
    2019--
            ``(A) the threshold amount otherwise applicable under 
        paragraph (2) shall be equal to such amount for 2010; and
            ``(B) the dollar amounts otherwise applicable under 
        paragraph (3)(C)(i) shall be equal to such dollar amounts for 
        2010.''.

SEC. 3403. INDEPENDENT MEDICARE ADVISORY BOARD.

    (a) Board.--
        (1) In general.--Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 
    U.S.C. 1395 et seq.), as amended by section 3022, is amended by 
    adding at the end the following new section:


                  ``independent medicare advisory board

    ``Sec. 1899A.  (a) Establishment.--There is established an 
independent board to be known as the `Independent Medicare Advisory 
Board'.
    ``(b) Purpose.--It is the purpose of this section to, in accordance 
with the following provisions of this section, reduce the per capita 
rate of growth in Medicare spending--
        ``(1) by requiring the Chief Actuary of the Centers for 
    Medicare & Medicaid Services to determine in each year to which 
    this section applies (in this section referred to as `a 
    determination year') the projected per capita growth rate under 
    Medicare for the second year following the determination year (in 
    this section referred to as `an implementation year');
        ``(2) if the projection for the implementation year exceeds the 
    target growth rate for that year, by requiring the Board to develop 
    and submit during the first year following the determination year 
    (in this section referred to as `a proposal year') a proposal 
    containing recommendations to reduce the Medicare per capita growth 
    rate to the extent required by this section; and
        ``(3) by requiring the Secretary to implement such proposals 
    unless Congress enacts legislation pursuant to this section.
    ``(c) Board Proposals.--
        ``(1) Development.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Board shall develop detailed and 
        specific proposals related to the Medicare program in 
        accordance with the succeeding provisions of this section.
            ``(B) Advisory reports.--Beginning January 15, 2014, the 
        Board may develop and submit to Congress advisory reports on 
        matters related to the Medicare program, regardless of whether 
        or not the Board submitted a proposal for such year. Such a 
        report may, for years prior to 2020, include recommendations 
        regarding improvements to payment systems for providers of 
        services and suppliers who are not otherwise subject to the 
        scope of the Board's recommendations in a proposal under this 
        section. Any advisory report submitted under this subparagraph 
        shall not be subject to the rules for congressional 
        consideration under subsection (d).
        ``(2) Proposals.--
            ``(A) Requirements.--Each proposal submitted under this 
        section in a proposal year shall meet each of the following 
        requirements:
                ``(i) If the Chief Actuary of the Centers for Medicare 
            & Medicaid Services has made a determination under 
            paragraph (7)(A) in the determination year, the proposal 
            shall include recommendations so that the proposal as a 
            whole (after taking into account recommendations under 
            clause (v)) will result in a net reduction in total 
            Medicare program spending in the implementation year that 
            is at least equal to the applicable savings target 
            established under paragraph (7)(B) for such implementation 
            year. In determining whether a proposal meets the 
            requirement of the preceding sentence, reductions in 
            Medicare program spending during the 3-month period 
            immediately preceding the implementation year shall be 
            counted to the extent that such reductions are a result of 
            the implementation of recommendations contained in the 
            proposal for a change in the payment rate for an item or 
            service that was effective during such period pursuant to 
            subsection (e)(2)(A).
                ``(ii) The proposal shall not include any 
            recommendation to ration health care, raise revenues or 
            Medicare beneficiary premiums under section 1818, 1818A, or 
            1839, increase Medicare beneficiary cost-sharing (including 
            deductibles, coinsurance, and copayments), or otherwise 
            restrict benefits or modify eligibility criteria.
                ``(iii) In the case of proposals submitted prior to 
            December 31, 2018, the proposal shall not include any 
            recommendation that would reduce payment rates for items 
            and services furnished, prior to December 31, 2019, by 
            providers of services (as defined in section 1861(u)) and 
            suppliers (as defined in section 1861(d)) scheduled, 
            pursuant to the amendments made by section 3401 of the 
            Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, to receive a 
            reduction to the inflationary payment updates of such 
            providers of services and suppliers in excess of a 
            reduction due to productivity in a year in which such 
            recommendations would take effect.
                ``(iv) As appropriate, the proposal shall include 
            recommendations to reduce Medicare payments under parts C 
            and D, such as reductions in direct subsidy payments to 
            Medicare Advantage and prescription drug plans specified 
            under paragraph (1) and (2) of section 1860D-15(a) that are 
            related to administrative expenses (including profits) for 
            basic coverage, denying high bids or removing high bids for 
            prescription drug coverage from the calculation of the 
            national average monthly bid amount under section 1860D-
            13(a)(4), and reductions in payments to Medicare Advantage 
            plans under clauses (i) and (ii) of section 1853(a)(1)(B) 
            that are related to administrative expenses (including 
            profits) and performance bonuses for Medicare Advantage 
            plans under section 1853(n). Any such recommendation shall 
            not affect the base beneficiary premium percentage 
            specified under 1860D-13(a).
                ``(v) The proposal shall include recommendations with 
            respect to administrative funding for the Secretary to 
            carry out the recommendations contained in the proposal.
                ``(vi) The proposal shall only include recommendations 
            related to the Medicare program.
            ``(B) Additional considerations.--In developing and 
        submitting each proposal under this section in a proposal year, 
        the Board shall, to the extent feasible--
                ``(i) give priority to recommendations that extend 
            Medicare solvency;
                ``(ii) include recommendations that--

                    ``(I) improve the health care delivery system and 
                health outcomes, including by promoting integrated 
                care, care coordination, prevention and wellness, and 
                quality and efficiency improvement; and
                    ``(II) protect and improve Medicare beneficiaries' 
                access to necessary and evidence-based items and 
                services, including in rural and frontier areas;

                ``(iii) include recommendations that target reductions 
            in Medicare program spending to sources of excess cost 
            growth;
                ``(iv) consider the effects on Medicare beneficiaries 
            of changes in payments to providers of services (as defined 
            in section 1861(u)) and suppliers (as defined in section 
            1861(d));
                ``(v) consider the effects of the recommendations on 
            providers of services and suppliers with actual or 
            projected negative cost margins or payment updates; and
                ``(vi) consider the unique needs of Medicare 
            beneficiaries who are dually eligible for Medicare and the 
            Medicaid program under title XIX.
            ``(C) No increase in total medicare program spending.--Each 
        proposal submitted under this section shall be designed in such 
        a manner that implementation of the recommendations contained 
        in the proposal would not be expected to result, over the 10-
        year period starting with the implementation year, in any 
        increase in the total amount of net Medicare program spending 
        relative to the total amount of net Medicare program spending 
        that would have occurred absent such implementation.
            ``(D) Consultation with medpac.--The Board shall submit a 
        draft copy of each proposal to be submitted under this section 
        to the Medicare Payment Advisory Commission established under 
        section 1805 for its review. The Board shall submit such draft 
        copy by not later than September 1 of the determination year.
            ``(E) Review and comment by the secretary.--The Board shall 
        submit a draft copy of each proposal to be submitted to 
        Congress under this section to the Secretary for the 
        Secretary's review and comment. The Board shall submit such 
        draft copy by not later than September 1 of the determination 
        year. Not later than March 1 of the submission year, the 
        Secretary shall submit a report to Congress on the results of 
        such review, unless the Secretary submits a proposal under 
        paragraph (5)(A) in that year.
            ``(F) Consultations.--In carrying out its duties under this 
        section, the Board shall engage in regular consultations with 
        the Medicaid and CHIP Payment and Access Commission under 
        section 1900.
        ``(3) Transmission of board proposal to president.--
            ``(A) In general.--
                ``(i) In general.--Except as provided in clause (ii) 
            and subsection (f)(3)(B), the Board shall transmit a 
            proposal under this section to the President on January 15 
            of each year (beginning with 2014).
                ``(ii) Exception.--The Board shall not submit a 
            proposal under clause (i) in a proposal year if the year 
            is--

                    ``(I) a year for which the Chief Actuary of the 
                Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services makes a 
                determination in the determination year under paragraph 
                (6)(A) that the growth rate described in clause (i) of 
                such paragraph does not exceed the growth rate 
                described in clause (ii) of such paragraph;
                    ``(II) a year in which the Chief Actuary of the 
                Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services makes a 
                determination in the determination year that the 
                projected percentage increase (if any) for the medical 
                care expenditure category of the Consumer Price Index 
                for All Urban Consumers (United States city average) 
                for the implementation year is less than the projected 
                percentage increase (if any) in the Consumer Price 
                Index for All Urban Consumers (all items; United States 
                city average) for such implementation year; or
                    ``(III) for proposal year 2019 and subsequent 
                proposal years, a year in which the Chief Actuary of 
                the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services makes a 
                determination in the determination year that the growth 
                rate described in paragraph (8) exceeds the growth rate 
                described in paragraph (6)(A)(i).

                ``(iii) Start-up period.--The Board may not submit a 
            proposal under clause (i) prior to January 15, 2014.
            ``(B) Required information.--Each proposal submitted by the 
        Board under subparagraph (A)(i) shall include--
                ``(i) the recommendations described in paragraph 
            (2)(A)(i);
                ``(ii) an explanation of each recommendation contained 
            in the proposal and the reasons for including such 
            recommendation;
                ``(iii) an actuarial opinion by the Chief Actuary of 
            the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services certifying 
            that the proposal meets the requirements of subparagraphs 
            (A)(i) and (C) of paragraph (2);
                ``(iv) a legislative proposal that implements the 
            recommendations; and
                ``(v) other information determined appropriate by the 
            Board.
        ``(4) Presidential submission to congress.--Upon receiving a 
    proposal from the Board under paragraph (3)(A)(i) or the Secretary 
    under paragraph (5), the President shall immediately submit such 
    proposal to Congress.
        ``(5) Contingent secretarial development of proposal.--If, with 
    respect to a proposal year, the Board is required, to but fails, to 
    submit a proposal to the President by the deadline applicable under 
    paragraph (3)(A)(i), the Secretary shall develop a detailed and 
    specific proposal that satisfies the requirements of subparagraphs 
    (A) and (C) (and, to the extent feasible, subparagraph (B)) of 
    paragraph (2) and contains the information required paragraph 
    (3)(B)). By not later than January 25 of the year, the Secretary 
    shall transmit--
            ``(A) such proposal to the President; and
            ``(B) a copy of such proposal to the Medicare Payment 
        Advisory Commission for its review.
        ``(6) Per capita growth rate projections by chief actuary.--
            ``(A) In general.--Subject to subsection (f)(3)(A), not 
        later than April 30, 2013, and annually thereafter, the Chief 
        Actuary of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services shall 
        determine in each such year whether--
                ``(i) the projected Medicare per capita growth rate for 
            the implementation year (as determined under subparagraph 
            (B)); exceeds
                ``(ii) the projected Medicare per capita target growth 
            rate for the implementation year (as determined under 
            subparagraph (C)).
            ``(B) Medicare per capita growth rate.--
                ``(i) In general.--For purposes of this section, the 
            Medicare per capita growth rate for an implementation year 
            shall be calculated as the projected 5-year average (ending 
            with such year) of the growth in Medicare program spending 
            per unduplicated enrollee.
                ``(ii) Requirement.--The projection under clause (i) 
            shall--

                    ``(I) to the extent that there is projected to be a 
                negative update to the single conversion factor 
                applicable to payments for physicians' services under 
                section 1848(d) furnished in the proposal year or the 
                implementation year, assume that such update for such 
                services is 0 percent rather than the negative percent 
                that would otherwise apply; and
                    ``(II) take into account any delivery system 
                reforms or other payment changes that have been enacted 
                or published in final rules but not yet implemented as 
                of the making of such calculation.

            ``(C) Medicare per capita target growth rate.--For purposes 
        of this section, the Medicare per capita target growth rate for 
        an implementation year shall be calculated as the projected 5-
        year average (ending with such year) percentage increase in--
                ``(i) with respect to a determination year that is 
            prior to 2018, the average of the projected percentage 
            increase (if any) in--

                    ``(I) the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 
                Consumers (all items; United States city average); and
                    ``(II) the medical care expenditure category of the 
                Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (United 
                States city average); and

                ``(ii) with respect to a determination year that is 
            after 2017, the nominal gross domestic product per capita 
            plus 1.0 percentage point.
        ``(7) Savings requirement.--
            ``(A) In general.--If, with respect to a determination 
        year, the Chief Actuary of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid 
        Services makes a determination under paragraph (6)(A) that the 
        growth rate described in clause (i) of such paragraph exceeds 
        the growth rate described in clause (ii) of such paragraph, the 
        Chief Actuary shall establish an applicable savings target for 
        the implementation year.
            ``(B) Applicable savings target.--For purposes of this 
        section, the applicable savings target for an implementation 
        year shall be an amount equal to the product of--
                ``(i) the total amount of projected Medicare program 
            spending for the proposal year; and
                ``(ii) the applicable percent for the implementation 
            year.
            ``(C) Applicable percent.--For purposes of subparagraph 
        (B), the applicable percent for an implementation year is the 
        lesser of--
                ``(i) in the case of--

                    ``(I) implementation year 2015, 0.5 percent;
                    ``(II) implementation year 2016, 1.0 percent;
                    ``(III) implementation year 2017, 1.25 percent; and
                    ``(IV) implementation year 2018 or any subsequent 
                implementation year, 1.5 percent; and

                ``(ii) the projected excess for the implementation year 
            (expressed as a percent) determined under subparagraph (A).
        ``(8) Per capita rate of growth in national health 
    expenditures.--In each determination year (beginning in 2018), the 
    Chief Actuary of the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services shall 
    project the per capita rate of growth in national health 
    expenditures for the implementation year. Such rate of growth for 
    an implementation year shall be calculated as the projected 5-year 
    average (ending with such year) percentage increase in national 
    health care expenditures.
    ``(d) Congressional Consideration.--
        ``(1) Introduction.--
            ``(A) In general.--On the day on which a proposal is 
        submitted by the President to the House of Representatives and 
        the Senate under subsection (c)(4), the legislative proposal 
        (described in subsection (c)(3)(B)(iv)) contained in the 
        proposal shall be introduced (by request) in the Senate by the 
        majority leader of the Senate or by Members of the Senate 
        designated by the majority leader of the Senate and shall be 
        introduced (by request) in the House by the majority leader of 
        the House or by Members of the House designated by the majority 
        leader of the House.
            ``(B) Not in session.--If either House is not in session on 
        the day on which such legislative proposal is submitted, the 
        legislative proposal shall be introduced in that House, as 
        provided in subparagraph (A), on the first day thereafter on 
        which that House is in session.
            ``(C) Any member.--If the legislative proposal is not 
        introduced in either House within 5 days on which that House is 
        in session after the day on which the legislative proposal is 
        submitted, then any Member of that House may introduce the 
        legislative proposal.
            ``(D) Referral.--The legislation introduced under this 
        paragraph shall be referred by the Presiding Officers of the 
        respective Houses to the Committee on Finance in the Senate and 
        to the Committee on Energy and Commerce and the Committee on 
        Ways and Means in the House of Representatives.
        ``(2) Committee consideration of proposal.--
            ``(A) Reporting bill.--Not later than April 1 of any 
        proposal year in which a proposal is submitted by the President 
        to Congress under this section, the Committee on Ways and Means 
        and the Committee on Energy and Commerce of the House of 
        Representatives and the Committee on Finance of the Senate may 
        report the bill referred to the Committee under paragraph 
        (1)(D) with committee amendments related to the Medicare 
        program.
            ``(B) Calculations.--In determining whether a committee 
        amendment meets the requirement of subparagraph (A), the 
        reductions in Medicare program spending during the 3-month 
        period immediately preceding the implementation year shall be 
        counted to the extent that such reductions are a result of the 
        implementation provisions in the committee amendment for a 
        change in the payment rate for an item or service that was 
        effective during such period pursuant to such amendment.
            ``(C) Committee jurisdiction.--Notwithstanding rule XV of 
        the Standing Rules of the Senate, a committee amendment 
        described in subparagraph (A) may include matter not within the 
        jurisdiction of the Committee on Finance if that matter is 
        relevant to a proposal contained in the bill submitted under 
        subsection (c)(3).
            ``(D) Discharge.--If, with respect to the House involved, 
        the committee has not reported the bill by the date required by 
        subparagraph (A), the committee shall be discharged from 
        further consideration of the proposal.
        ``(3) Limitation on changes to the board recommendations.--
            ``(A) In general.--It shall not be in order in the Senate 
        or the House of Representatives to consider any bill, 
        resolution, or amendment, pursuant to this subsection or 
        conference report thereon, that fails to satisfy the 
        requirements of subparagraphs (A)(i) and (C) of subsection 
        (c)(2).
            ``(B) Limitation on changes to the board recommendations in 
        other legislation.--It shall not be in order in the Senate or 
        the House of Representatives to consider any bill, resolution, 
        amendment, or conference report (other than pursuant to this 
        section) that would repeal or otherwise change the 
        recommendations of the Board if that change would fail to 
        satisfy the requirements of subparagraphs (A)(i) and (C) of 
        subsection (c)(2).
            ``(C) Limitation on changes to this subsection.--It shall 
        not be in order in the Senate or the House of Representatives 
        to consider any bill, resolution, amendment, or conference 
        report that would repeal or otherwise change this subsection.
            ``(D) Waiver.--This paragraph may be waived or suspended in 
        the Senate only by the affirmative vote of three-fifths of the 
        Members, duly chosen and sworn.
            ``(E) Appeals.--An affirmative vote of three-fifths of the 
        Members of the Senate, duly chosen and sworn, shall be required 
        in the Senate to sustain an appeal of the ruling of the Chair 
        on a point of order raised under this paragraph.
        ``(4) Expedited procedure.--
            ``(A) Consideration.--A motion to proceed to the 
        consideration of the bill in the Senate is not debatable.
            ``(B) Amendment.--
                ``(i) Time limitation.--Debate in the Senate on any 
            amendment to a bill under this section shall be limited to 
            1 hour, to be equally divided between, and controlled by, 
            the mover and the manager of the bill, and debate on any 
            amendment to an amendment, debatable motion, or appeal 
            shall be limited to 30 minutes, to be equally divided 
            between, and controlled by, the mover and the manager of 
            the bill, except that in the event the manager of the bill 
            is in favor of any such amendment, motion, or appeal, the 
            time in opposition thereto shall be controlled by the 
            minority leader or such leader's designee.
                ``(ii) Germane.--No amendment that is not germane to 
            the provisions of such bill shall be received.
                ``(iii) Additional time.--The leaders, or either of 
            them, may, from the time under their control on the passage 
            of the bill, allot additional time to any Senator during 
            the consideration of any amendment, debatable motion, or 
            appeal.
                ``(iv) Amendment not in order.--It shall not be in 
            order to consider an amendment that would cause the bill to 
            result in a net reduction in total Medicare program 
            spending in the implementation year that is less than the 
            applicable savings target established under subsection 
            (c)(7)(B) for such implementation year.
                ``(v) Waiver and appeals.--This paragraph may be waived 
            or suspended in the Senate only by the affirmative vote of 
            three-fifths of the Members, duly chosen and sworn. An 
            affirmative vote of three-fifths of the Members of the 
            Senate, duly chosen and sworn, shall be required in the 
            Senate to sustain an appeal of the ruling of the Chair on a 
            point of order raised under this section.
            ``(C) Consideration by the other house.--
                ``(i) In general.--The expedited procedures provided in 
            this subsection for the consideration of a bill introduced 
            pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not apply to such a bill 
            that is received by one House from the other House if such 
            a bill was not introduced in the receiving House.
                ``(ii) Before passage.--If a bill that is introduced 
            pursuant to paragraph (1) is received by one House from the 
            other House, after introduction but before disposition of 
            such a bill in the receiving House, then the following 
            shall apply:

                    ``(I) The receiving House shall consider the bill 
                introduced in that House through all stages of 
                consideration up to, but not including, passage.
                    ``(II) The question on passage shall be put on the 
                bill of the other House as amended by the language of 
                the receiving House.

                ``(iii) After passage.--If a bill introduced pursuant 
            to paragraph (1) is received by one House from the other 
            House, after such a bill is passed by the receiving House, 
            then the vote on passage of the bill that originates in the 
            receiving House shall be considered to be the vote on 
            passage of the bill received from the other House as 
            amended by the language of the receiving House.
                ``(iv) Disposition.--Upon disposition of a bill 
            introduced pursuant to paragraph (1) that is received by 
            one House from the other House, it shall no longer be in 
            order to consider the bill that originates in the receiving 
            House.
                ``(v) Limitation.--Clauses (ii), (iii), and (iv) shall 
            apply only to a bill received by one House from the other 
            House if the bill--

                    ``(I) is related only to the program under this 
                title; and
                    ``(II) satisfies the requirements of subparagraphs 
                (A)(i) and (C) of subsection (c)(2).

            ``(D) Senate limits on debate.--
                ``(i) In general.--In the Senate, consideration of the 
            bill and on all debatable motions and appeals in connection 
            therewith shall not exceed a total of 30 hours, which shall 
            be divided equally between the majority and minority 
            leaders or their designees.
                ``(ii) Motion to further limit debate.--A motion to 
            further limit debate on the bill is in order and is not 
            debatable.
                ``(iii) Motion or appeal.--Any debatable motion or 
            appeal is debatable for not to exceed 1 hour, to be divided 
            equally between those favoring and those opposing the 
            motion or appeal.
                ``(iv) Final disposition.--After 30 hours of 
            consideration, the Senate shall proceed, without any 
            further debate on any question, to vote on the final 
            disposition thereof to the exclusion of all amendments not 
            then pending before the Senate at that time and to the 
            exclusion of all motions, except a motion to table, or to 
            reconsider and one quorum call on demand to establish the 
            presence of a quorum (and motions required to establish a 
            quorum) immediately before the final vote begins.
            ``(E) Consideration in conference.--
                ``(i) In general.--Consideration in the Senate and the 
            House of Representatives on the conference report or any 
            messages between Houses shall be limited to 10 hours, 
            equally divided and controlled by the majority and minority 
            leaders of the Senate or their designees and the Speaker of 
            the House of Representatives and the minority leader of the 
            House of Representatives or their designees.
                ``(ii) Time limitation.--Debate in the Senate on any 
            amendment under this subparagraph shall be limited to 1 
            hour, to be equally divided between, and controlled by, the 
            mover and the manager of the bill, and debate on any 
            amendment to an amendment, debatable motion, or appeal 
            shall be limited to 30 minutes, to be equally divided 
            between, and controlled by, the mover and the manager of 
            the bill, except that in the event the manager of the bill 
            is in favor of any such amendment, motion, or appeal, the 
            time in opposition thereto shall be controlled by the 
            minority leader or such leader's designee.
                ``(iii) Final disposition.--After 10 hours of 
            consideration, the Senate shall proceed, without any 
            further debate on any question, to vote on the final 
            disposition thereof to the exclusion of all motions not 
            then pending before the Senate at that time or necessary to 
            resolve the differences between the Houses and to the 
            exclusion of all other motions, except a motion to table, 
            or to reconsider and one quorum call on demand to establish 
            the presence of a quorum (and motions required to establish 
            a quorum) immediately before the final vote begins.
                ``(iv) Limitation.--Clauses (i) through (iii) shall 
            only apply to a conference report, message or the 
            amendments thereto if the conference report, message, or an 
            amendment thereto--

                    ``(I) is related only to the program under this 
                title; and
                    ``(II) satisfies the requirements of subparagraphs 
                (A)(i) and (C) of subsection (c)(2).

            ``(F) Veto.--If the President vetoes the bill debate on a 
        veto message in the Senate under this subsection shall be 1 
        hour equally divided between the majority and minority leaders 
        or their designees.
        ``(5) Rules of the senate and house of representatives.--This 
    subsection and subsection (f)(2) are enacted by Congress--
            ``(A) as an exercise of the rulemaking power of the Senate 
        and the House of Representatives, respectively, and is deemed 
        to be part of the rules of each House, respectively, but 
        applicable only with respect to the procedure to be followed in 
        that House in the case of bill under this section, and it 
        supersedes other rules only to the extent that it is 
        inconsistent with such rules; and
            ``(B) with full recognition of the constitutional right of 
        either House to change the rules (so far as they relate to the 
        procedure of that House) at any time, in the same manner, and 
        to the same extent as in the case of any other rule of that 
        House.
    ``(e) Implementation of Proposal.--
        ``(1) In general.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 
    the Secretary shall, except as provided in paragraph (3), implement 
    the recommendations contained in a proposal submitted by the 
    President to Congress pursuant to this section on August 15 of the 
    year in which the proposal is so submitted.
        ``(2) Application.--
            ``(A) In general.--A recommendation described in paragraph 
        (1) shall apply as follows:
                ``(i) In the case of a recommendation that is a change 
            in the payment rate for an item or service under Medicare 
            in which payment rates change on a fiscal year basis (or a 
            cost reporting period basis that relates to a fiscal year), 
            on a calendar year basis (or a cost reporting period basis 
            that relates to a calendar year), or on a rate year basis 
            (or a cost reporting period basis that relates to a rate 
            year), such recommendation shall apply to items and 
            services furnished on the first day of the first fiscal 
            year, calendar year, or rate year (as the case may be) that 
            begins after such August 15.
                ``(ii) In the case of a recommendation relating to 
            payments to plans under parts C and D, such recommendation 
            shall apply to plan years beginning on the first day of the 
            first calendar year that begins after such August 15.
                ``(iii) In the case of any other recommendation, such 
            recommendation shall be addressed in the regular regulatory 
            process timeframe and shall apply as soon as practicable.
            ``(B) Interim final rulemaking.--The Secretary may use 
        interim final rulemaking to implement any recommendation 
        described in paragraph (1).
        ``(3) Exception.--The Secretary shall not be required to 
    implement the recommendations contained in a proposal submitted in 
    a proposal year by the President to Congress pursuant to this 
    section if--
            ``(A) prior to August 15 of the proposal year, Federal 
        legislation is enacted that includes the following provision: 
        `This Act supercedes the recommendations of the Board contained 
        in the proposal submitted, in the year which includes the date 
        of enactment of this Act, to Congress under section 1899A of 
        the Social Security Act.'; and
            ``(B) in the case of implementation year 2020 and 
        subsequent implementation years, a joint resolution described 
        in subsection (f)(1) is enacted not later than August 15, 2017.
        ``(4) No affect on authority to implement certain provisions.--
    Nothing in paragraph (3) shall be construed to affect the authority 
    of the Secretary to implement any recommendation contained in a 
    proposal or advisory report under this section to the extent that 
    the Secretary otherwise has the authority to implement such 
    recommendation administratively.
        ``(5) Limitation on review.--There shall be no administrative 
    or judicial review under section 1869, section 1878, or otherwise 
    of the implementation by the Secretary under this subsection of the 
    recommendations contained in a proposal.
    ``(f) Joint Resolution Required To Discontinue the Board.--
        ``(1) In general.--For purposes of subsection (e)(3)(B), a 
    joint resolution described in this paragraph means only a joint 
    resolution--
            ``(A) that is introduced in 2017 by not later than February 
        1 of such year;
            ``(B) which does not have a preamble;
            ``(C) the title of which is as follows: `Joint resolution 
        approving the discontinuation of the process for consideration 
        and automatic implementation of the annual proposal of the 
        Independent Medicare Advisory Board under section 1899A of the 
        Social Security Act'; and
            ``(D) the matter after the resolving clause of which is as 
        follows: `That Congress approves the discontinuation of the 
        process for consideration and automatic implementation of the 
        annual proposal of the Independent Medicare Advisory Board 
        under section 1899A of the Social Security Act.'.
        ``(2) Procedure.--
            ``(A) Referral.--A joint resolution described in paragraph 
        (1) shall be referred to the Committee on Ways and Means and 
        the Committee on Energy and Commerce of the House of 
        Representatives and the Committee on Finance of the Senate.
            ``(B) Discharge.--In the Senate, if the committee to which 
        is referred a joint resolution described in paragraph (1) has 
        not reported such joint resolution (or an identical joint 
        resolution) at the end of 20 days after the joint resolution 
        described in paragraph (1) is introduced, such committee may be 
        discharged from further consideration of such joint resolution 
        upon a petition supported in writing by 30 Members of the 
        Senate, and such joint resolution shall be placed on the 
        calendar.
            ``(C) Consideration.--
                ``(i) In general.--In the Senate, when the committee to 
            which a joint resolution is referred has reported, or when 
            a committee is discharged (under subparagraph (C)) from 
            further consideration of a joint resolution described in 
            paragraph (1), it is at any time thereafter in order (even 
            though a previous motion to the same effect has been 
            disagreed to) for a motion to proceed to the consideration 
            of the joint resolution to be made, and all points of order 
            against the joint resolution (and against consideration of 
            the joint resolution) are waived, except for points of 
            order under the Congressional Budget act of 1974 or under 
            budget resolutions pursuant to that Act. The motion is not 
            debatable. A motion to reconsider the vote by which the 
            motion is agreed to or disagreed to shall not be in order. 
            If a motion to proceed to the consideration of the joint 
            resolution is agreed to, the joint resolution shall remain 
            the unfinished business of the Senate until disposed of.
                ``(ii) Debate limitation.--In the Senate, consideration 
            of the joint resolution, and on all debatable motions and 
            appeals in connection therewith, shall be limited to not 
            more than 10 hours, which shall be divided equally between 
            the majority leader and the minority leader, or their 
            designees. A motion further to limit debate is in order and 
            not debatable. An amendment to, or a motion to postpone, or 
            a motion to proceed to the consideration of other business, 
            or a motion to recommit the joint resolution is not in 
            order.
                ``(iii) Passage.--In the Senate, immediately following 
            the conclusion of the debate on a joint resolution 
            described in paragraph (1), and a single quorum call at the 
            conclusion of the debate if requested in accordance with 
            the rules of the Senate, the vote on passage of the joint 
            resolution shall occur.
                ``(iv) Appeals.--Appeals from the decisions of the 
            Chair relating to the application of the rules of the 
            Senate to the procedure relating to a joint resolution 
            described in paragraph (1) shall be decided without debate.
            ``(D) Other house acts first.--If, before the passage by 1 
        House of a joint resolution of that House described in 
        paragraph (1), that House receives from the other House a joint 
        resolution described in paragraph (1), then the following 
        procedures shall apply:
                ``(i) The joint resolution of the other House shall not 
            be referred to a committee.
                ``(ii) With respect to a joint resolution described in 
            paragraph (1) of the House receiving the joint resolution--

                    ``(I) the procedure in that House shall be the same 
                as if no joint resolution had been received from the 
                other House; but
                    ``(II) the vote on final passage shall be on the 
                joint resolution of the other House.

            ``(E) Excluded days.--For purposes of determining the 
        period specified in subparagraph (B), there shall be excluded 
        any days either House of Congress is adjourned for more than 3 
        days during a session of Congress.
            ``(F) Majority required for adoption.--A joint resolution 
        considered under this subsection shall require an affirmative 
        vote of three-fifths of the Members, duly chosen and sworn, for 
        adoption.
        ``(3) Termination.--If a joint resolution described in 
    paragraph (1) is enacted not later than August 15, 2017--
            ``(A) the Chief Actuary of the Medicare & Medicaid Services 
        shall not--
                ``(i) make any determinations under subsection (c)(6) 
            after May 1, 2017; or
                ``(ii) provide any opinion pursuant to subsection 
            (c)(3)(B)(iii) after January 16, 2018;
            ``(B) the Board shall not submit any proposals or advisory 
        reports to Congress under this section after January 16, 2018; 
        and
            ``(C) the Board and the consumer advisory council under 
        subsection (k) shall terminate on August 16, 2018.
    ``(g) Board Membership; Terms of Office; Chairperson; Removal.--
        ``(1) Membership.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Board shall be composed of--
                ``(i) 15 members appointed by the President, by and 
            with the advice and consent of the Senate; and
                ``(ii) the Secretary, the Administrator of the Center 
            for Medicare & Medicaid Services, and the Administrator of 
            the Health Resources and Services Administration, all of 
            whom shall serve ex officio as nonvoting members of the 
            Board.
            ``(B) Qualifications.--
                ``(i) In general.--The appointed membership of the 
            Board shall include individuals with national recognition 
            for their expertise in health finance and economics, 
            actuarial science, health facility management, health plans 
            and integrated delivery systems, reimbursement of health 
            facilities, allopathic and osteopathic physicians, and 
            other providers of health services, and other related 
            fields, who provide a mix of different professionals, broad 
            geographic representation, and a balance between urban and 
            rural representatives.
                ``(ii) Inclusion.--The appointed membership of the 
            Board shall include (but not be limited to) physicians and 
            other health professionals, experts in the area of 
            pharmaco-economics or prescription drug benefit programs, 
            employers, third-party payers, individuals skilled in the 
            conduct and interpretation of biomedical, health services, 
            and health economics research and expertise in outcomes and 
            effectiveness research and technology assessment. Such 
            membership shall also include representatives of consumers 
            and the elderly.
                ``(iii) Majority nonproviders.--Individuals who are 
            directly involved in the provision or management of the 
            delivery of items and services covered under this title 
            shall not constitute a majority of the appointed membership 
            of the Board.
            ``(C) Ethical disclosure.--The President shall establish a 
        system for public disclosure by appointed members of the Board 
        of financial and other potential conflicts of interest relating 
        to such members. Appointed members of the Board shall be 
        treated as officers in the executive branch for purposes of 
        applying title I of the Ethics in Government Act of 1978 
        (Public Law 95-521).
            ``(D) Conflicts of interest.--No individual may serve as an 
        appointed member if that individual engages in any other 
        business, vocation, or employment.
            ``(E) Consultation with congress.--In selecting individuals 
        for nominations for appointments to the Board, the President 
        shall consult with--
                ``(i) the majority leader of the Senate concerning the 
            appointment of 3 members;
                ``(ii) the Speaker of the House of Representatives 
            concerning the appointment of 3 members;
                ``(iii) the minority leader of the Senate concerning 
            the appointment of 3 members; and
                ``(iv) the minority leader of the House of 
            Representatives concerning the appointment of 3 members.
        ``(2) Term of office.--Each appointed member shall hold office 
    for a term of 6 years except that--
            ``(A) a member may not serve more than 2 full consecutive 
        terms (but may be reappointed to 2 full consecutive terms after 
        being appointed to fill a vacancy on the Board);
            ``(B) a member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior 
        to the expiration of the term for which that member's 
        predecessor was appointed shall be appointed for the remainder 
        of such term;
            ``(C) a member may continue to serve after the expiration 
        of the member's term until a successor has taken office; and
            ``(D) of the members first appointed under this section, 5 
        shall be appointed for a term of 1 year, 5 shall be appointed 
        for a term of 3 years, and 5 shall be appointed for a term of 6 
        years, the term of each to be designated by the President at 
        the time of nomination.
        ``(3) Chairperson.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Chairperson shall be appointed by 
        the President, by and with the advice and consent of the 
        Senate, from among the members of the Board.
            ``(B) Duties.--The Chairperson shall be the principal 
        executive officer of the Board, and shall exercise all of the 
        executive and administrative functions of the Board, including 
        functions of the Board with respect to--
                ``(i) the appointment and supervision of personnel 
            employed by the Board;
                ``(ii) the distribution of business among personnel 
            appointed and supervised by the Chairperson and among 
            administrative units of the Board; and
                ``(iii) the use and expenditure of funds.
            ``(C) Governance.--In carrying out any of the functions 
        under subparagraph (B), the Chairperson shall be governed by 
        the general policies established by the Board and by the 
        decisions, findings, and determinations the Board shall by law 
        be authorized to make.
            ``(D) Requests for appropriations.--Requests or estimates 
        for regular, supplemental, or deficiency appropriations on 
        behalf of the Board may not be submitted by the Chairperson 
        without the prior approval of a majority vote of the Board.
        ``(4) Removal.--Any appointed member may be removed by the 
    President for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office, but for no 
    other cause.
    ``(h) Vacancies; Quorum; Seal; Vice Chairperson; Voting on 
Reports.--
        ``(1) Vacancies.--No vacancy on the Board shall impair the 
    right of the remaining members to exercise all the powers of the 
    Board.
        ``(2) Quorum.--A majority of the appointed members of the Board 
    shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, but a 
    lesser number of members may hold hearings.
        ``(3) Seal.--The Board shall have an official seal, of which 
    judicial notice shall be taken.
        ``(4) Vice chairperson.--The Board shall annually elect a Vice 
    Chairperson to act in the absence or disability of the Chairperson 
    or in case of a vacancy in the office of the Chairperson.
        ``(5) Voting on proposals.--Any proposal of the Board must be 
    approved by the majority of appointed members present.
    ``(i) Powers of the Board.--
        ``(1) Hearings.--The Board may hold such hearings, sit and act 
    at such times and places, take such testimony, and receive such 
    evidence as the Board considers advisable to carry out this 
    section.
        ``(2) Authority to inform research priorities for data 
    collection.--The Board may advise the Secretary on priorities for 
    health services research, particularly as such priorities pertain 
    to necessary changes and issues regarding payment reforms under 
    Medicare.
        ``(3) Obtaining official data.--The Board may secure directly 
    from any department or agency of the United States information 
    necessary to enable it to carry out this section. Upon request of 
    the Chairperson, the head of that department or agency shall 
    furnish that information to the Board on an agreed upon schedule.
        ``(4) Postal services.--The Board may use the United States 
    mails in the same manner and under the same conditions as other 
    departments and agencies of the Federal Government.
        ``(5) Gifts.--The Board may accept, use, and dispose of gifts 
    or donations of services or property.
        ``(6) Offices.--The Board shall maintain a principal office and 
    such field offices as it determines necessary, and may meet and 
    exercise any of its powers at any other place.
    ``(j) Personnel Matters.--
        ``(1) Compensation of members and chairperson.--Each appointed 
    member, other than the Chairperson, shall be compensated at a rate 
    equal to the annual rate of basic pay prescribed for level III of 
    the Executive Schedule under section 5315 of title 5, United States 
    Code. The Chairperson shall be compensated at a rate equal to the 
    daily equivalent of the annual rate of basic pay prescribed for 
    level II of the Executive Schedule under section 5315 of title 5, 
    United States Code.
        ``(2) Travel expenses.--The appointed members shall be allowed 
    travel expenses, including per diem in lieu of subsistence, at 
    rates authorized for employees of agencies under subchapter I of 
    chapter 57 of title 5, United States Code, while away from their 
    homes or regular places of business in the performance of services 
    for the Board.
        ``(3) Staff.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Chairperson may, without regard to 
        the civil service laws and regulations, appoint and terminate 
        an executive director and such other additional personnel as 
        may be necessary to enable the Board to perform its duties. The 
        employment of an executive director shall be subject to 
        confirmation by the Board.
            ``(B) Compensation.--The Chairperson may fix the 
        compensation of the executive director and other personnel 
        without regard to chapter 51 and subchapter III of chapter 53 
        of title 5, United States Code, relating to classification of 
        positions and General Schedule pay rates, except that the rate 
        of pay for the executive director and other personnel may not 
        exceed the rate payable for level V of the Executive Schedule 
        under section 5316 of such title.
        ``(4) Detail of government employees.--Any Federal Government 
    employee may be detailed to the Board without reimbursement, and 
    such detail shall be without interruption or loss of civil service 
    status or privilege.
        ``(5) Procurement of temporary and intermittent services.--The 
    Chairperson may procure temporary and intermittent services under 
    section 3109(b) of title 5, United States Code, at rates for 
    individuals which do not exceed the daily equivalent of the annual 
    rate of basic pay prescribed for level V of the Executive Schedule 
    under section 5316 of such title.
    ``(k) Consumer Advisory Council.--
        ``(1) In general.--There is established a consumer advisory 
    council to advise the Board on the impact of payment policies under 
    this title on consumers.
        ``(2) Membership.--
            ``(A) Number and appointment.--The consumer advisory 
        council shall be composed of 10 consumer representatives 
        appointed by the Comptroller General of the United States, 1 
        from among each of the 10 regions established by the Secretary 
        as of the date of enactment of this section.
            ``(B) Qualifications.--The membership of the council shall 
        represent the interests of consumers and particular 
        communities.
        ``(3) Duties.--The consumer advisory council shall, subject to 
    the call of the Board, meet not less frequently than 2 times each 
    year in the District of Columbia.
        ``(4) Open meetings.--Meetings of the consumer advisory council 
    shall be open to the public.
        ``(5) Election of officers.--Members of the consumer advisory 
    council shall elect their own officers.
        ``(6) Application of faca.--The Federal Advisory Committee Act 
    (5 U.S.C. App.) shall apply to the consumer advisory council except 
    that section 14 of such Act shall not apply.
    ``(l) Definitions.--In this section:
        ``(1) Board; chairperson; member.--The terms `Board', 
    `Chairperson', and `Member' mean the Independent Medicare Advisory 
    Board established under subsection (a) and the Chairperson and any 
    Member thereof, respectively.
        ``(2) Medicare.--The term `Medicare' means the program 
    established under this title, including parts A, B, C, and D.
        ``(3) Medicare beneficiary.--The term `Medicare beneficiary' 
    means an individual who is entitled to, or enrolled for, benefits 
    under part A or enrolled for benefits under part B.
        ``(4) Medicare program spending.--The term `Medicare program 
    spending' means program spending under parts A, B, and D net of 
    premiums.
    ``(m) Funding.--
        ``(1) In general.--There are appropriated to the Board to carry 
    out its duties and functions--
            ``(A) for fiscal year 2012, $15,000,000; and
            ``(B) for each subsequent fiscal year, the amount 
        appropriated under this paragraph for the previous fiscal year 
        increased by the annual percentage increase in the Consumer 
        Price Index for All Urban Consumers (all items; United States 
        city average) as of June of the previous fiscal year.
        ``(2) From trust funds.--Sixty percent of amounts appropriated 
    under paragraph (1) shall be derived by transfer from the Federal 
    Hospital Insurance Trust Fund under section 1817 and 40 percent of 
    amounts appropriated under such paragraph shall be derived by 
    transfer from the Federal Supplementary Medical Insurance Trust 
    Fund under section 1841.''.
        (2) Lobbying cooling-off period for members of the independent 
    medicare advisory board.--Section 207(c) of title 18, United States 
    Code, is amended by inserting at the end the following:
        ``(3) Members of the independent medicare advisory board.--
            ``(A) In general.--Paragraph (1) shall apply to a member of 
        the Independent Medicare Advisory Board under section 1899A.
            ``(B) Agencies and congress.--For purposes of paragraph 
        (1), the agency in which the individual described in 
        subparagraph (A) served shall be considered to be the 
        Independent Medicare Advisory Board, the Department of Health 
        and Human Services, and the relevant committees of jurisdiction 
        of Congress, including the Committee on Ways and Means and the 
        Committee on Energy and Commerce of the House of 
        Representatives and the Committee on Finance of the Senate.''.
    (b) GAO Study and Report on Determination and Implementation of 
Payment and Coverage Policies Under the Medicare Program.--
        (1) Initial study and report.--
            (A) Study.--The Comptroller General of the United States 
        (in this section referred to as the ``Comptroller General'') 
        shall conduct a study on changes to payment policies, 
        methodologies, and rates and coverage policies and 
        methodologies under the Medicare program under title XVIII of 
        the Social Security Act as a result of the recommendations 
        contained in the proposals made by the Independent Medicare 
        Advisory Board under section 1899A of such Act (as added by 
        subsection (a)), including an analysis of the effect of such 
        recommendations on--
                (i) Medicare beneficiary access to providers and items 
            and services;
                (ii) the affordability of Medicare premiums and cost-
            sharing (including deductibles, coinsurance, and 
            copayments);
                (iii) the potential impact of changes on other 
            government or private-sector purchasers and payers of care; 
            and
                (iv) quality of patient care, including patient 
            experience, outcomes, and other measures of care.
            (B) Report.--Not later than July 1, 2015, the Comptroller 
        General shall submit to Congress a report containing the 
        results of the study conducted under subparagraph (A), together 
        with recommendations for such legislation and administrative 
        action as the Comptroller General determines appropriate.
        (2) Subsequent studies and reports.--The Comptroller General 
    shall periodically conduct such additional studies and submit 
    reports to Congress on changes to Medicare payments policies, 
    methodologies, and rates and coverage policies and methodologies as 
    the Comptroller General determines appropriate, in consultation 
    with the Committee on Ways and Means and the Committee on Energy 
    and Commerce of the House of Representatives and the Committee on 
    Finance of the Senate.
    (c) Conforming Amendments.--Section 1805(b) of the Social Security 
Act (42 U.S.C. 1395b-6(b)) is amended--
        (1) by redesignating paragraphs (4) through (8) as paragraphs 
    (5) through (9), respectively; and
        (2) by inserting after paragraph (3) the following:
        ``(4) Review and comment on the independent medicare advisory 
    board or secretarial proposal.--If the Independent Medicare 
    Advisory Board (as established under subsection (a) of section 
    1899A) or the Secretary submits a proposal to the Commission under 
    such section in a year, the Commission shall review the proposal 
    and, not later than March 1 of that year, submit to the Committee 
    on Ways and Means and the Committee on Energy and Commerce of the 
    House of Representatives and the Committee on Finance of the Senate 
    written comments on such proposal. Such comments may include such 
    recommendations as the Commission deems appropriate.''.

              Subtitle F--Health Care Quality Improvements

SEC. 3501. HEALTH CARE DELIVERY SYSTEM RESEARCH; QUALITY IMPROVEMENT 
              TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE.

    Part D of title IX of the Public Health Service Act, as amended by 
section 3013, is further amended by adding at the end the following:

         ``Subpart II--Health Care Quality Improvement Programs

``SEC. 933. HEALTH CARE DELIVERY SYSTEM RESEARCH.

    ``(a) Purpose.--The purposes of this section are to--
        ``(1) enable the Director to identify, develop, evaluate, 
    disseminate, and provide training in innovative methodologies and 
    strategies for quality improvement practices in the delivery of 
    health care services that represent best practices (referred to as 
    `best practices') in health care quality, safety, and value; and
        ``(2) ensure that the Director is accountable for implementing 
    a model to pursue such research in a collaborative manner with 
    other related Federal agencies.
    ``(b) General Functions of the Center.--The Center for Quality 
Improvement and Patient Safety of the Agency for Healthcare Research 
and Quality (referred to in this section as the `Center'), or any other 
relevant agency or department designated by the Director, shall--
        ``(1) carry out its functions using research from a variety of 
    disciplines, which may include epidemiology, health services, 
    sociology, psychology, human factors engineering, biostatistics, 
    health economics, clinical research, and health informatics;
        ``(2) conduct or support activities consistent with the 
    purposes described in subsection (a), and for--
            ``(A) best practices for quality improvement practices in 
        the delivery of health care services; and
            ``(B) that include changes in processes of care and the 
        redesign of systems used by providers that will reliably result 
        in intended health outcomes, improve patient safety, and reduce 
        medical errors (such as skill development for health care 
        providers in team-based health care delivery and rapid cycle 
        process improvement) and facilitate adoption of improved 
        workflow;
        ``(3) identify health care providers, including health care 
    systems, single institutions, and individual providers, that--
            ``(A) deliver consistently high-quality, efficient health 
        care services (as determined by the Secretary); and
            ``(B) employ best practices that are adaptable and scalable 
        to diverse health care settings or effective in improving care 
        across diverse settings;
        ``(4) assess research, evidence, and knowledge about what 
    strategies and methodologies are most effective in improving health 
    care delivery;
        ``(5) find ways to translate such information rapidly and 
    effectively into practice, and document the sustainability of those 
    improvements;
        ``(6) create strategies for quality improvement through the 
    development of tools, methodologies, and interventions that can 
    successfully reduce variations in the delivery of health care;
        ``(7) identify, measure, and improve organizational, human, or 
    other causative factors, including those related to the culture and 
    system design of a health care organization, that contribute to the 
    success and sustainability of specific quality improvement and 
    patient safety strategies;
        ``(8) provide for the development of best practices in the 
    delivery of health care services that--
            ``(A) have a high likelihood of success, based on 
        structured review of empirical evidence;
            ``(B) are specified with sufficient detail of the 
        individual processes, steps, training, skills, and knowledge 
        required for implementation and incorporation into workflow of 
        health care practitioners in a variety of settings;
            ``(C) are designed to be readily adapted by health care 
        providers in a variety of settings; and
            ``(D) where applicable, assist health care providers in 
        working with other health care providers across the continuum 
        of care and in engaging patients and their families in 
        improving the care and patient health outcomes;
        ``(9) provide for the funding of the activities of 
    organizations with recognized expertise and excellence in improving 
    the delivery of health care services, including children's health 
    care, by involving multiple disciplines, managers of health care 
    entities, broad development and training, patients, caregivers and 
    families, and frontline health care workers, including activities 
    for the examination of strategies to share best quality improvement 
    practices and to promote excellence in the delivery of health care 
    services; and
        ``(10) build capacity at the State and community level to lead 
    quality and safety efforts through education, training, and 
    mentoring programs to carry out the activities under paragraphs (1) 
    through (9).
    ``(c) Research Functions of Center.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Center shall support, such as through a 
    contract or other mechanism, research on health care delivery 
    system improvement and the development of tools to facilitate 
    adoption of best practices that improve the quality, safety, and 
    efficiency of health care delivery services. Such support may 
    include establishing a Quality Improvement Network Research Program 
    for the purpose of testing, scaling, and disseminating of 
    interventions to improve quality and efficiency in health care. 
    Recipients of funding under the Program may include national, 
    State, multi-State, or multi-site quality improvement networks.
        ``(2) Research requirements.--The research conducted pursuant 
    to paragraph (1) shall--
            ``(A) address the priorities identified by the Secretary in 
        the national strategic plan established under section 399HH;
            ``(B) identify areas in which evidence is insufficient to 
        identify strategies and methodologies, taking into 
        consideration areas of insufficient evidence identified by the 
        entity with a contract under section 1890(a) of the Social 
        Security Act in the report required under section 399JJ;
            ``(C) address concerns identified by health care 
        institutions and providers and communicated through the Center 
        pursuant to subsection (d);
            ``(D) reduce preventable morbidity, mortality, and 
        associated costs of morbidity and mortality by building 
        capacity for patient safety research;
            ``(E) support the discovery of processes for the reliable, 
        safe, efficient, and responsive delivery of health care, taking 
        into account discoveries from clinical research and comparative 
        effectiveness research;
            ``(F) allow communication of research findings and 
        translate evidence into practice recommendations that are 
        adaptable to a variety of settings, and which, as soon as 
        practicable after the establishment of the Center, shall 
        include--
                ``(i) the implementation of a national application of 
            Intensive Care Unit improvement projects relating to the 
            adult (including geriatric), pediatric, and neonatal 
            patient populations;
                ``(ii) practical methods for addressing health care 
            associated infections, including Methicillin-Resistant 
            Staphylococcus Aureus and Vancomycin-Resistant Entercoccus 
            infections and other emerging infections; and
                ``(iii) practical methods for reducing preventable 
            hospital admissions and readmissions;
            ``(G) expand demonstration projects for improving the 
        quality of children's health care and the use of health 
        information technology, such as through Pediatric Quality 
        Improvement Collaboratives and Learning Networks, consistent 
        with provisions of section 1139A of the Social Security Act for 
        assessing and improving quality, where applicable;
            ``(H) identify and mitigate hazards by--
                ``(i) analyzing events reported to patient safety 
            reporting systems and patient safety organizations; and
                ``(ii) using the results of such analyses to develop 
            scientific methods of response to such events;
            ``(I) include the conduct of systematic reviews of existing 
        practices that improve the quality, safety, and efficiency of 
        health care delivery, as well as new research on improving such 
        practices; and
            ``(J) include the examination of how to measure and 
        evaluate the progress of quality and patient safety activities.
    ``(d) Dissemination of Research Findings.--
        ``(1) Public availability.--The Director shall make the 
    research findings of the Center available to the public through 
    multiple media and appropriate formats to reflect the varying needs 
    of health care providers and consumers and diverse levels of health 
    literacy.
        ``(2) Linkage to health information technology.--The Secretary 
    shall ensure that research findings and results generated by the 
    Center are shared with the Office of the National Coordinator of 
    Health Information Technology and used to inform the activities of 
    the health information technology extension program under section 
    3012, as well as any relevant standards, certification criteria, or 
    implementation specifications.
    ``(e) Prioritization.--The Director shall identify and regularly 
update a list of processes or systems on which to focus research and 
dissemination activities of the Center, taking into account--
        ``(1) the cost to Federal health programs;
        ``(2) consumer assessment of health care experience;
        ``(3) provider assessment of such processes or systems and 
    opportunities to minimize distress and injury to the health care 
    workforce;
        ``(4) the potential impact of such processes or systems on 
    health status and function of patients, including vulnerable 
    populations including children;
        ``(5) the areas of insufficient evidence identified under 
    subsection (c)(2)(B); and
        ``(6) the evolution of meaningful use of health information 
    technology, as defined in section 3000.
    ``(f) Coordination.--The Center shall coordinate its activities 
with activities conducted by the Center for Medicare and Medicaid 
Innovation established under section 1115A of the Social Security Act.
    ``(g) Funding.--There is authorized to be appropriated to carry out 
this section $20,000,000 for fiscal years 2010 through 2014.

``SEC. 934. QUALITY IMPROVEMENT TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND 
              IMPLEMENTATION.

    ``(a) In General.--The Director, through the Center for Quality 
Improvement and Patient Safety of the Agency for Healthcare Research 
and Quality (referred to in this section as the `Center'), shall 
award--
        ``(1) technical assistance grants or contracts to eligible 
    entities to provide technical support to institutions that deliver 
    health care and health care providers (including rural and urban 
    providers of services and suppliers with limited infrastructure and 
    financial resources to implement and support quality improvement 
    activities, providers of services and suppliers with poor 
    performance scores, and providers of services and suppliers for 
    which there are disparities in care among subgroups of patients) so 
    that such institutions and providers understand, adapt, and 
    implement the models and practices identified in the research 
    conducted by the Center, including the Quality Improvement Networks 
    Research Program; and
        ``(2) implementation grants or contracts to eligible entities 
    to implement the models and practices described under paragraph 
    (1).
    ``(b) Eligible Entities.--
        ``(1) Technical assistance award.--To be eligible to receive a 
    technical assistance grant or contract under subsection (a)(1), an 
    entity--
            ``(A) may be a health care provider, health care provider 
        association, professional society, health care worker 
        organization, Indian health organization, quality improvement 
        organization, patient safety organization, local quality 
        improvement collaborative, the Joint Commission, academic 
        health center, university, physician-based research network, 
        primary care extension program established under section 399W, 
        a Federal Indian Health Service program or a health program 
        operated by an Indian tribe (as defined in section 4 of the 
        Indian Health Care Improvement Act), or any other entity 
        identified by the Secretary; and
            ``(B) shall have demonstrated expertise in providing 
        information and technical support and assistance to health care 
        providers regarding quality improvement.
        ``(2) Implementation award.--To be eligible to receive an 
    implementation grant or contract under subsection (a)(2), an 
    entity--
            ``(A) may be a hospital or other health care provider or 
        consortium or providers, as determined by the Secretary; and
            ``(B) shall have demonstrated expertise in providing 
        information and technical support and assistance to health care 
        providers regarding quality improvement.
    ``(c) Application.--
        ``(1) Technical assistance award.--To receive a technical 
    assistance grant or contract under subsection (a)(1), an eligible 
    entity shall submit an application to the Secretary at such time, 
    in such manner, and containing--
            ``(A) a plan for a sustainable business model that may 
        include a system of--
                ``(i) charging fees to institutions and providers that 
            receive technical support from the entity; and
                ``(ii) reducing or eliminating such fees for such 
            institutions and providers that serve low-income 
            populations; and
            ``(B) such other information as the Director may require.
        ``(2) Implementation award.--To receive a grant or contract 
    under subsection (a)(2), an eligible entity shall submit an 
    application to the Secretary at such time, in such manner, and 
    containing--
            ``(A) a plan for implementation of a model or practice 
        identified in the research conducted by the Center including--
                ``(i) financial cost, staffing requirements, and 
            timeline for implementation; and
                ``(ii) pre- and projected post-implementation quality 
            measure performance data in targeted improvement areas 
            identified by the Secretary; and
            ``(B) such other information as the Director may require.
    ``(d) Matching Funds.--The Director may not award a grant or 
contract under this section to an entity unless the entity agrees that 
it will make available (directly or through contributions from other 
public or private entities) non-Federal contributions toward the 
activities to be carried out under the grant or contract in an amount 
equal to $1 for each $5 of Federal funds provided under the grant or 
contract. Such non-Federal matching funds may be provided directly or 
through donations from public or private entities and may be in cash or 
in-kind, fairly evaluated, including plant, equipment, or services.
    ``(e) Evaluation.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Director shall evaluate the performance 
    of each entity that receives a grant or contract under this 
    section. The evaluation of an entity shall include a study of--
            ``(A) the success of such entity in achieving the 
        implementation, by the health care institutions and providers 
        assisted by such entity, of the models and practices identified 
        in the research conducted by the Center under section 933;
            ``(B) the perception of the health care institutions and 
        providers assisted by such entity regarding the value of the 
        entity; and
            ``(C) where practicable, better patient health outcomes and 
        lower cost resulting from the assistance provided by such 
        entity.
        ``(2) Effect of evaluation.--Based on the outcome of the 
    evaluation of the entity under paragraph (1), the Director shall 
    determine whether to renew a grant or contract with such entity 
    under this section.
    ``(f) Coordination.--The entities that receive a grant or contract 
under this section shall coordinate with health information technology 
regional extension centers under section 3012(c) and the primary care 
extension program established under section 399W regarding the 
dissemination of quality improvement, system delivery reform, and best 
practices information.''.

SEC. 3502. ESTABLISHING COMMUNITY HEALTH TEAMS TO SUPPORT THE PATIENT-
              CENTERED MEDICAL HOME.

    (a) In General.--The Secretary of Health and Human Services 
(referred to in this section as the ``Secretary'') shall establish a 
program to provide grants to or enter into contracts with eligible 
entities to establish community-based interdisciplinary, 
interprofessional teams (referred to in this section as ``health 
teams'') to support primary care practices, including obstetrics and 
gynecology practices, within the hospital service areas served by the 
eligible entities. Grants or contracts shall be used to--
        (1) establish health teams to provide support services to 
    primary care providers; and
        (2) provide capitated payments to primary care providers as 
    determined by the Secretary.
    (b) Eligible Entities.--To be eligible to receive a grant or 
contract under subsection (a), an entity shall--
        (1)(A) be a State or State-designated entity; or
        (B) be an Indian tribe or tribal organization, as defined in 
    section 4 of the Indian Health Care Improvement Act;
        (2) submit a plan for achieving long-term financial 
    sustainability within 3 years;
        (3) submit a plan for incorporating prevention initiatives and 
    patient education and care management resources into the delivery 
    of health care that is integrated with community-based prevention 
    and treatment resources, where available;
        (4) ensure that the health team established by the entity 
    includes an interdisciplinary, interprofessional team of health 
    care providers, as determined by the Secretary; such team may 
    include medical specialists, nurses, pharmacists, nutritionists, 
    dieticians, social workers, behavioral and mental health providers 
    (including substance use disorder prevention and treatment 
    providers), doctors of chiropractic, licensed complementary and 
    alternative medicine practitioners, and physicians' assistants;
        (5) agree to provide services to eligible individuals with 
    chronic conditions, as described in section 1945 of the Social 
    Security Act (as added by section 2703), in accordance with the 
    payment methodology established under subsection (c) of such 
    section; and
        (6) submit to the Secretary an application at such time, in 
    such manner, and containing such information as the Secretary may 
    require.
    (c) Requirements for Health Teams.--A health team established 
pursuant to a grant or contract under subsection (a) shall--
        (1) establish contractual agreements with primary care 
    providers to provide support services;
        (2) support patient-centered medical homes, defined as a mode 
    of care that includes--
            (A) personal physicians;
            (B) whole person orientation;
            (C) coordinated and integrated care;
            (D) safe and high-quality care through evidence-informed 
        medicine, appropriate use of health information technology, and 
        continuous quality improvements;
            (E) expanded access to care; and
            (F) payment that recognizes added value from additional 
        components of patient-centered care;
        (3) collaborate with local primary care providers and existing 
    State and community based resources to coordinate disease 
    prevention, chronic disease management, transitioning between 
    health care providers and settings and case management for 
    patients, including children, with priority given to those amenable 
    to prevention and with chronic diseases or conditions identified by 
    the Secretary;
        (4) in collaboration with local health care providers, develop 
    and implement interdisciplinary, interprofessional care plans that 
    integrate clinical and community preventive and health promotion 
    services for patients, including children, with a priority given to 
    those amenable to prevention and with chronic diseases or 
    conditions identified by the Secretary;
        (5) incorporate health care providers, patients, caregivers, 
    and authorized representatives in program design and oversight;
        (6) provide support necessary for local primary care providers 
    to--
            (A) coordinate and provide access to high-quality health 
        care services;
            (B) coordinate and provide access to preventive and health 
        promotion services;
            (C) provide access to appropriate specialty care and 
        inpatient services;
            (D) provide quality-driven, cost-effective, culturally 
        appropriate, and patient- and family-centered health care;
            (E) provide access to pharmacist-delivered medication 
        management services, including medication reconciliation;
            (F) provide coordination of the appropriate use of 
        complementary and alternative (CAM) services to those who 
        request such services;
            (G) promote effective strategies for treatment planning, 
        monitoring health outcomes and resource use, sharing 
        information, treatment decision support, and organizing care to 
        avoid duplication of service and other medical management 
        approaches intended to improve quality and value of health care 
        services;
            (H) provide local access to the continuum of health care 
        services in the most appropriate setting, including access to 
        individuals that implement the care plans of patients and 
        coordinate care, such as integrative health care practitioners;
            (I) collect and report data that permits evaluation of the 
        success of the collaborative effort on patient outcomes, 
        including collection of data on patient experience of care, and 
        identification of areas for improvement; and
            (J) establish a coordinated system of early identification 
        and referral for children at risk for developmental or 
        behavioral problems such as through the use of infolines, 
        health information technology, or other means as determined by 
        the Secretary;
        (7) provide 24-hour care management and support during 
    transitions in care settings including--
            (A) a transitional care program that provides onsite visits 
        from the care coordinator, assists with the development of 
        discharge plans and medication reconciliation upon admission to 
        and discharge from the hospitals, nursing home, or other 
        institution setting;
            (B) discharge planning and counseling support to providers, 
        patients, caregivers, and authorized representatives;
            (C) assuring that post-discharge care plans include 
        medication management, as appropriate;
            (D) referrals for mental and behavioral health services, 
        which may include the use of infolines; and
            (E) transitional health care needs from adolescence to 
        adulthood;
        (8) serve as a liaison to community prevention and treatment 
    programs;
        (9) demonstrate a capacity to implement and maintain health 
    information technology that meets the requirements of certified EHR 
    technology (as defined in section 3000 of the Public Health Service 
    Act (42 U.S.C. 300jj)) to facilitate coordination among members of 
    the applicable care team and affiliated primary care practices; and
        (10) where applicable, report to the Secretary information on 
    quality measures used under section 399JJ of the Public Health 
    Service Act.
    (d) Requirement for Primary Care Providers.--A provider who 
contracts with a care team shall--
        (1) provide a care plan to the care team for each patient 
    participant;
        (2) provide access to participant health records; and
        (3) meet regularly with the care team to ensure integration of 
    care.
    (e) Reporting to Secretary.--An entity that receives a grant or 
contract under subsection (a) shall submit to the Secretary a report 
that describes and evaluates, as requested by the Secretary, the 
activities carried out by the entity under subsection (c).
    (f) Definition of Primary Care.--In this section, the term 
``primary care'' means the provision of integrated, accessible health 
care services by clinicians who are accountable for addressing a large 
majority of personal health care needs, developing a sustained 
partnership with patients, and practicing in the context of family and 
community.

SEC. 3503. MEDICATION MANAGEMENT SERVICES IN TREATMENT OF CHRONIC 
              DISEASE.

    Title IX of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 299 et seq.), 
as amended by section 3501, is further amended by inserting after 
section 934 the following:

``SEC. 935. GRANTS OR CONTRACTS TO IMPLEMENT MEDICATION MANAGEMENT 
              SERVICES IN TREATMENT OF CHRONIC DISEASES.

    ``(a) In General.--The Secretary, acting through the Patient Safety 
Research Center established in section 933 (referred to in this section 
as the `Center'), shall establish a program to provide grants or 
contracts to eligible entities to implement medication management 
(referred to in this section as `MTM') services provided by licensed 
pharmacists, as a collaborative, multidisciplinary, inter-professional 
approach to the treatment of chronic diseases for targeted individuals, 
to improve the quality of care and reduce overall cost in the treatment 
of such diseases. The Secretary shall commence the program under this 
section not later than May 1, 2010.
    ``(b) Eligible Entities.--To be eligible to receive a grant or 
contract under subsection (a), an entity shall--
        ``(1) provide a setting appropriate for MTM services, as 
    recommended by the experts described in subsection (e);
        ``(2) submit to the Secretary a plan for achieving long-term 
    financial sustainability;
        ``(3) where applicable, submit a plan for coordinating MTM 
    services through local community health teams established in 
    section 3502 of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act or 
    in collaboration with primary care extension programs established 
    in section 399W;
        ``(4) submit a plan for meeting the requirements under 
    subsection (c); and
        ``(5) submit to the Secretary such other information as the 
    Secretary may require.
    ``(c) MTM Services to Targeted Individuals.--The MTM services 
provided with the assistance of a grant or contract awarded under 
subsection (a) shall, as allowed by State law including applicable 
collaborative pharmacy practice agreements, include--
        ``(1) performing or obtaining necessary assessments of the 
    health and functional status of each patient receiving such MTM 
    services;
        ``(2) formulating a medication treatment plan according to 
    therapeutic goals agreed upon by the prescriber and the patient or 
    caregiver or authorized representative of the patient;
        ``(3) selecting, initiating, modifying, recommending changes 
    to, or administering medication therapy;
        ``(4) monitoring, which may include access to, ordering, or 
    performing laboratory assessments, and evaluating the response of 
    the patient to therapy, including safety and effectiveness;
        ``(5) performing an initial comprehensive medication review to 
    identify, resolve, and prevent medication-related problems, 
    including adverse drug events, quarterly targeted medication 
    reviews for ongoing monitoring, and additional followup 
    interventions on a schedule developed collaboratively with the 
    prescriber;
        ``(6) documenting the care delivered and communicating 
    essential information about such care, including a summary of the 
    medication review, and the recommendations of the pharmacist to 
    other appropriate health care providers of the patient in a timely 
    fashion;
        ``(7) providing education and training designed to enhance the 
    understanding and appropriate use of the medications by the 
    patient, caregiver, and other authorized representative;
        ``(8) providing information, support services, and resources 
    and strategies designed to enhance patient adherence with 
    therapeutic regimens;
        ``(9) coordinating and integrating MTM services within the 
    broader health care management services provided to the patient; 
    and
        ``(10) such other patient care services allowed under 
    pharmacist scopes of practice in use in other Federal programs that 
    have implemented MTM services.
    ``(d) Targeted Individuals.--MTM services provided by licensed 
pharmacists under a grant or contract awarded under subsection (a) 
shall be offered to targeted individuals who--
        ``(1) take 4 or more prescribed medications (including over-
    the-counter medications and dietary supplements);
        ``(2) take any `high risk' medications;
        ``(3) have 2 or more chronic diseases, as identified by the 
    Secretary; or
        ``(4) have undergone a transition of care, or other factors, as 
    determined by the Secretary, that are likely to create a high risk 
    of medication-related problems.
    ``(e) Consultation With Experts.--In designing and implementing MTM 
services provided under grants or contracts awarded under subsection 
(a), the Secretary shall consult with Federal, State, private, public-
private, and academic entities, pharmacy and pharmacist organizations, 
health care organizations, consumer advocates, chronic disease groups, 
and other stakeholders involved with the research, dissemination, and 
implementation of pharmacist-delivered MTM services, as the Secretary 
determines appropriate. The Secretary, in collaboration with this 
group, shall determine whether it is possible to incorporate rapid 
cycle process improvement concepts in use in other Federal programs 
that have implemented MTM services.
    ``(f) Reporting to the Secretary.--An entity that receives a grant 
or contract under subsection (a) shall submit to the Secretary a report 
that describes and evaluates, as requested by the Secretary, the 
activities carried out under subsection (c), including quality measures 
endorsed by the entity with a contract under section 1890 of the Social 
Security Act, as determined by the Secretary.
    ``(g) Evaluation and Report.--The Secretary shall submit to the 
relevant committees of Congress a report which shall--
        ``(1) assess the clinical effectiveness of pharmacist-provided 
    services under the MTM services program, as compared to usual care, 
    including an evaluation of whether enrollees maintained better 
    health with fewer hospitalizations and emergency room visits than 
    similar patients not enrolled in the program;
        ``(2) assess changes in overall health care resource use by 
    targeted individuals;
        ``(3) assess patient and prescriber satisfaction with MTM 
    services;
        ``(4) assess the impact of patient-cost sharing requirements on 
    medication adherence and recommendations for modifications;
        ``(5) identify and evaluate other factors that may impact 
    clinical and economic outcomes, including demographic 
    characteristics, clinical characteristics, and health services use 
    of the patient, as well as characteristics of the regimen, pharmacy 
    benefit, and MTM services provided; and
        ``(6) evaluate the extent to which participating pharmacists 
    who maintain a dispensing role have a conflict of interest in the 
    provision of MTM services, and if such conflict is found, provide 
    recommendations on how such a conflict might be appropriately 
    addressed.
    ``(h) Grants or Contracts To Fund Development of Performance 
Measures.--The Secretary may, through the quality measure development 
program under section 931 of the Public Health Service Act, award 
grants or contracts to eligible entities for the purpose of funding the 
development of performance measures that assess the use and 
effectiveness of medication therapy management services.''.

SEC. 3504. DESIGN AND IMPLEMENTATION OF REGIONALIZED SYSTEMS FOR 
              EMERGENCY CARE.

    (a) In General.--Title XII of the Public Health Service Act (42 
U.S.C. 300d et seq.) is amended--
        (1) in section 1203--
            (A) in the section heading, by inserting ``for trauma 
        systems'' after ``grants''; and
            (B) in subsection (a), by striking ``Administrator of the 
        Health Resources and Services Administration'' and inserting 
        ``Assistant Secretary for Preparedness and Response'';
        (2) by inserting after section 1203 the following:

``SEC. 1204. COMPETITIVE GRANTS FOR REGIONALIZED SYSTEMS FOR EMERGENCY 
              CARE RESPONSE.

    ``(a) In General.--The Secretary, acting through the Assistant 
Secretary for Preparedness and Response, shall award not fewer than 4 
multiyear contracts or competitive grants to eligible entities to 
support pilot projects that design, implement, and evaluate innovative 
models of regionalized, comprehensive, and accountable emergency care 
and trauma systems.
    ``(b) Eligible Entity; Region.--In this section:
        ``(1) Eligible entity.--The term `eligible entity' means--
            ``(A) a State or a partnership of 1 or more States and 1 or 
        more local governments; or
            ``(B) an Indian tribe (as defined in section 4 of the 
        Indian Health Care Improvement Act) or a partnership of 1 or 
        more Indian tribes.
        ``(2) Region.--The term `region' means an area within a State, 
    an area that lies within multiple States, or a similar area (such 
    as a multicounty area), as determined by the Secretary.
        ``(3) Emergency services.--The term `emergency services' 
    includes acute, prehospital, and trauma care.
    ``(c) Pilot Projects.--The Secretary shall award a contract or 
grant under subsection (a) to an eligible entity that proposes a pilot 
project to design, implement, and evaluate an emergency medical and 
trauma system that--
        ``(1) coordinates with public health and safety services, 
    emergency medical services, medical facilities, trauma centers, and 
    other entities in a region to develop an approach to emergency 
    medical and trauma system access throughout the region, including 
    9-1-1 Public Safety Answering Points and emergency medical 
    dispatch;
        ``(2) includes a mechanism, such as a regional medical 
    direction or transport communications system, that operates 
    throughout the region to ensure that the patient is taken to the 
    medically appropriate facility (whether an initial facility or a 
    higher-level facility) in a timely fashion;
        ``(3) allows for the tracking of prehospital and hospital 
    resources, including inpatient bed capacity, emergency department 
    capacity, trauma center capacity, on-call specialist coverage, 
    ambulance diversion status, and the coordination of such tracking 
    with regional communications and hospital destination decisions; 
    and
        ``(4) includes a consistent region-wide prehospital, hospital, 
    and interfacility data management system that--
            ``(A) submits data to the National EMS Information System, 
        the National Trauma Data Bank, and others;
            ``(B) reports data to appropriate Federal and State 
        databanks and registries; and
            ``(C) contains information sufficient to evaluate key 
        elements of prehospital care, hospital destination decisions, 
        including initial hospital and interfacility decisions, and 
        relevant health outcomes of hospital care.
    ``(d) Application.--
        ``(1) In general.--An eligible entity that seeks a contract or 
    grant described in subsection (a) shall submit to the Secretary an 
    application at such time and in such manner as the Secretary may 
    require.
        ``(2) Application information.--Each application shall 
    include--
            ``(A) an assurance from the eligible entity that the 
        proposed system--
                ``(i) has been coordinated with the applicable State 
            Office of Emergency Medical Services (or equivalent State 
            office);
                ``(ii) includes consistent indirect and direct medical 
            oversight of prehospital, hospital, and interfacility 
            transport throughout the region;
                ``(iii) coordinates prehospital treatment and triage, 
            hospital destination, and interfacility transport 
            throughout the region;
                ``(iv) includes a categorization or designation system 
            for special medical facilities throughout the region that 
            is integrated with transport and destination protocols;
                ``(v) includes a regional medical direction, patient 
            tracking, and resource allocation system that supports day-
            to-day emergency care and surge capacity and is integrated 
            with other components of the national and State emergency 
            preparedness system; and
                ``(vi) addresses pediatric concerns related to 
            integration, planning, preparedness, and coordination of 
            emergency medical services for infants, children and 
            adolescents; and
            ``(B) such other information as the Secretary may require.
    ``(e) Requirement of Matching Funds.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Secretary may not make a grant under 
    this section unless the State (or consortia of States) involved 
    agrees, with respect to the costs to be incurred by the State (or 
    consortia) in carrying out the purpose for which such grant was 
    made, to make available non-Federal contributions (in cash or in 
    kind under paragraph (2)) toward such costs in an amount equal to 
    not less than $1 for each $3 of Federal funds provided in the 
    grant. Such contributions may be made directly or through donations 
    from public or private entities.
        ``(2) Non-federal contributions.--Non-Federal contributions 
    required in paragraph (1) may be in cash or in kind, fairly 
    evaluated, including equipment or services (and excluding indirect 
    or overhead costs). Amounts provided by the Federal Government, or 
    services assisted or subsidized to any significant extent by the 
    Federal Government, may not be included in determining the amount 
    of such non-Federal contributions.
    ``(f) Priority.--The Secretary shall give priority for the award of 
the contracts or grants described in subsection (a) to any eligible 
entity that serves a population in a medically underserved area (as 
defined in section 330(b)(3)).
    ``(g) Report.--Not later than 90 days after the completion of a 
pilot project under subsection (a), the recipient of such contract or 
grant described in shall submit to the Secretary a report containing 
the results of an evaluation of the program, including an 
identification of--
        ``(1) the impact of the regional, accountable emergency care 
    and trauma system on patient health outcomes for various critical 
    care categories, such as trauma, stroke, cardiac emergencies, 
    neurological emergencies, and pediatric emergencies;
        ``(2) the system characteristics that contribute to the 
    effectiveness and efficiency of the program (or lack thereof);
        ``(3) methods of assuring the long-term financial 
    sustainability of the emergency care and trauma system;
        ``(4) the State and local legislation necessary to implement 
    and to maintain the system;
        ``(5) the barriers to developing regionalized, accountable 
    emergency care and trauma systems, as well as the methods to 
    overcome such barriers; and
        ``(6) recommendations on the utilization of available funding 
    for future regionalization efforts.
    ``(h) Dissemination of Findings.--The Secretary shall, as 
appropriate, disseminate to the public and to the appropriate 
Committees of the Congress, the information contained in a report made 
under subsection (g).''; and
        (3) in section 1232--
            (A) in subsection (a), by striking ``appropriated'' and all 
        that follows through the period at the end and inserting 
        ``appropriated $24,000,000 for each of fiscal years 2010 
        through 2014.''; and
            (B) by inserting after subsection (c) the following:
    ``(d) Authority.--For the purpose of carrying out parts A through 
C, beginning on the date of enactment of the Patient Protection and 
Affordable Care Act, the Secretary shall transfer authority in 
administering grants and related authorities under such parts from the 
Administrator of the Health Resources and Services Administration to 
the Assistant Secretary for Preparedness and Response.''.
    (b) Support for Emergency Medicine Research.--Part H of title IV of 
the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 289 et seq.) is amended by 
inserting after the section 498C the following:

``SEC. 498D. SUPPORT FOR EMERGENCY MEDICINE RESEARCH.

    ``(a) Emergency Medical Research.--The Secretary shall support 
Federal programs administered by the National Institutes of Health, the 
Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality, the Health Resources and 
Services Administration, the Centers for Disease Control and 
Prevention, and other agencies involved in improving the emergency care 
system to expand and accelerate research in emergency medical care 
systems and emergency medicine, including--
        ``(1) the basic science of emergency medicine;
        ``(2) the model of service delivery and the components of such 
    models that contribute to enhanced patient health outcomes;
        ``(3) the translation of basic scientific research into 
    improved practice; and
        ``(4) the development of timely and efficient delivery of 
    health services.
    ``(b) Pediatric Emergency Medical Research.--The Secretary shall 
support Federal programs administered by the National Institutes of 
Health, the Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality, the Health 
Resources and Services Administration, the Centers for Disease Control 
and Prevention, and other agencies to coordinate and expand research in 
pediatric emergency medical care systems and pediatric emergency 
medicine, including--
        ``(1) an examination of the gaps and opportunities in pediatric 
    emergency care research and a strategy for the optimal organization 
    and funding of such research;
        ``(2) the role of pediatric emergency services as an integrated 
    component of the overall health system;
        ``(3) system-wide pediatric emergency care planning, 
    preparedness, coordination, and funding;
        ``(4) pediatric training in professional education; and
        ``(5) research in pediatric emergency care, specifically on the 
    efficacy, safety, and health outcomes of medications used for 
    infants, children, and adolescents in emergency care settings in 
    order to improve patient safety.
    ``(c) Impact Research.--The Secretary shall support research to 
determine the estimated economic impact of, and savings that result 
from, the implementation of coordinated emergency care systems.
    ``(d) Authorization of Appropriations.--There are authorized to be 
appropriated to carry out this section such sums as may be necessary 
for each of fiscal years 2010 through 2014.''.

SEC. 3505. TRAUMA CARE CENTERS AND SERVICE AVAILABILITY.

    (a) Trauma Care Centers.--
        (1) Grants for trauma care centers.--Section 1241 of the Public 
    Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 300d-41) is amended by striking 
    subsections (a) and (b) and inserting the following:
    ``(a) In General.--The Secretary shall establish 3 programs to 
award grants to qualified public, nonprofit Indian Health Service, 
Indian tribal, and urban Indian trauma centers--
        ``(1) to assist in defraying substantial uncompensated care 
    costs;
        ``(2) to further the core missions of such trauma centers, 
    including by addressing costs associated with patient stabilization 
    and transfer, trauma education and outreach, coordination with 
    local and regional trauma systems, essential personnel and other 
    fixed costs, and expenses associated with employee and non-employee 
    physician services; and
        ``(3) to provide emergency relief to ensure the continued and 
    future availability of trauma services.
    ``(b) Minimum Qualifications of Trauma Centers.--
        ``(1) Participation in trauma care system operating under 
    certain professional guidelines.--Except as provided in paragraph 
    (2), the Secretary may not award a grant to a trauma center under 
    subsection (a) unless the trauma center is a participant in a 
    trauma system that substantially complies with section 1213.
        ``(2) Exemption.--Paragraph (1) shall not apply to trauma 
    centers that are located in States with no existing trauma care 
    system.
        ``(3) Qualification for substantial uncompensated care costs.--
    The Secretary shall award substantial uncompensated care grants 
    under subsection (a)(1) only to trauma centers meeting at least 1 
    of the criteria in 1 of the following 3 categories:
            ``(A) Category a.--The criteria for category A are as 
        follows:
                ``(i) At least 40 percent of the visits in the 
            emergency department of the hospital in which the trauma 
            center is located were charity or self-pay patients.
                ``(ii) At least 50 percent of the visits in such 
            emergency department were Medicaid (under title XIX of the 
            Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq.)) and charity 
            and self-pay patients combined.
            ``(B) Category b.--The criteria for category B are as 
        follows:
                ``(i) At least 35 percent of the visits in the 
            emergency department were charity or self-pay patients.
                ``(ii) At least 50 percent of the visits in the 
            emergency department were Medicaid and charity and self-pay 
            patients combined.
            ``(C) Category c.--The criteria for category C are as 
        follows:
                ``(i) At least 20 percent of the visits in the 
            emergency department were charity or self-pay patients.
                ``(ii) At least 30 percent of the visits in the 
            emergency department were Medicaid and charity and self-pay 
            patients combined.
        ``(4) Trauma centers in 1115 waiver states.--Notwithstanding 
    paragraph (3), the Secretary may award a substantial uncompensated 
    care grant to a trauma center under subsection (a)(1) if the trauma 
    center qualifies for funds under a Low Income Pool or Safety Net 
    Care Pool established through a waiver approved under section 1115 
    of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1315).
        ``(5) Designation.--The Secretary may not award a grant to a 
    trauma center unless such trauma center is verified by the American 
    College of Surgeons or designated by an equivalent State or local 
    agency.
    ``(c) Additional Requirements.--The Secretary may not award a grant 
to a trauma center under subsection (a)(1) unless such trauma center--
        ``(1) submits to the Secretary a plan satisfactory to the 
    Secretary that demonstrates a continued commitment to serving 
    trauma patients regardless of their ability to pay; and
        ``(2) has policies in place to assist patients who cannot pay 
    for part or all of the care they receive, including a sliding fee 
    scale, and to ensure fair billing and collection practices.''.
        (2) Considerations in making grants.--Section 1242 of the 
    Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 300d-42) is amended by 
    striking subsections (a) and (b) and inserting the following:
    ``(a) Substantial Uncompensated Care Awards.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Secretary shall establish an award basis 
    for each eligible trauma center for grants under section 1241(a)(1) 
    according to the percentage described in paragraph (2), subject to 
    the requirements of section 1241(b)(3).
        ``(2) Percentages.--The applicable percentages are as follows:
            ``(A) With respect to a category A trauma center, 100 
        percent of the uncompensated care costs.
            ``(B) With respect to a category B trauma center, not more 
        than 75 percent of the uncompensated care costs.
            ``(C) With respect to a category C trauma center, not more 
        than 50 percent of the uncompensated care costs.
    ``(b) Core Mission Awards.--
        ``(1) In general.--In awarding grants under section 1241(a)(2), 
    the Secretary shall--
            ``(A) reserve 25 percent of the amount allocated for core 
        mission awards for Level III and Level IV trauma centers; and
            ``(B) reserve 25 percent of the amount allocated for core 
        mission awards for large urban Level I and II trauma centers--
                ``(i) that have at least 1 graduate medical education 
            fellowship in trauma or trauma related specialties for 
            which demand is exceeding supply;
                ``(ii) for which--

                    ``(I) annual uncompensated care costs exceed 
                $10,000,000; or
                    ``(II) at least 20 percent of emergency department 
                visits are charity or self-pay or Medicaid patients; 
                and

                ``(iii) that are not eligible for substantial 
            uncompensated care awards under section 1241(a)(1).
    ``(c) Emergency Awards.--In awarding grants under section 
1241(a)(3), the Secretary shall--
        ``(1) give preference to any application submitted by a trauma 
    center that provides trauma care in a geographic area in which the 
    availability of trauma care has significantly decreased or will 
    significantly decrease if the center is forced to close or 
    downgrade service or growth in demand for trauma services exceeds 
    capacity; and
        ``(2) reallocate any emergency awards funds not obligated due 
    to insufficient, or a lack of qualified, applications to the 
    significant uncompensated care award program.''.
        (3) Certain agreements.--Section 1243 of the Public Health 
    Service Act (42 U.S.C. 300d-43) is amended by striking subsections 
    (a), (b), and (c) and inserting the following:
    ``(a) Maintenance of Financial Support.--The Secretary may require 
a trauma center receiving a grant under section 1241(a) to maintain 
access to trauma services at comparable levels to the prior year during 
the grant period.
    ``(b) Trauma Care Registry.--The Secretary may require the trauma 
center receiving a grant under section 1241(a) to provide data to a 
national and centralized registry of trauma cases, in accordance with 
guidelines developed by the American College of Surgeons, and as the 
Secretary may otherwise require.''.
        (4) General provisions.--Section 1244 of the Public Health 
    Service Act (42 U.S.C. 300d-44) is amended by striking subsections 
    (a), (b), and (c) and inserting the following:
    ``(a) Application.--The Secretary may not award a grant to a trauma 
center under section 1241(a) unless such center submits an application 
for the grant to the Secretary and the application is in such form, is 
made in such manner, and contains such agreements, assurances, and 
information as the Secretary determines to be necessary to carry out 
this part.
    ``(b) Limitation on Duration of Support.--The period during which a 
trauma center receives payments under a grant under section 1241(a)(3) 
shall be for 3 fiscal years, except that the Secretary may waive such 
requirement for a center and authorize such center to receive such 
payments for 1 additional fiscal year.
    ``(c) Limitation on Amount of Grant.--Notwithstanding section 
1242(a), a grant under section 1241 may not be made in an amount 
exceeding $2,000,000 for each fiscal year.
    ``(d) Eligibility.--Except as provided in section 
1242(b)(1)(B)(iii), acquisition of, or eligibility for, a grant under 
section 1241(a) shall not preclude a trauma center from being eligible 
for other grants described in such section.
    ``(e) Funding Distribution.--Of the total amount appropriated for a 
fiscal year under section 1245, 70 percent shall be used for 
substantial uncompensated care awards under section 1241(a)(1), 20 
percent shall be used for core mission awards under section 1241(a)(2), 
and 10 percent shall be used for emergency awards under section 
1241(a)(3).
    ``(f) Minimum Allowance.--Notwithstanding subsection (e), if the 
amount appropriated for a fiscal year under section 1245 is less than 
$25,000,000, all available funding for such fiscal year shall be used 
for substantial uncompensated care awards under section 1241(a)(1).
    ``(g) Substantial Uncompensated Care Award Distribution and 
Proportional Share.--Notwithstanding section 1242(a), of the amount 
appropriated for substantial uncompensated care grants for a fiscal 
year, the Secretary shall--
        ``(1) make available--
            ``(A) 50 percent of such funds for category A trauma center 
        grantees;
            ``(B) 35 percent of such funds for category B trauma center 
        grantees; and
            ``(C) 15 percent of such funds for category C trauma center 
        grantees; and
        ``(2) provide available funds within each category in a manner 
    proportional to the award basis specified in section 1242(a)(2) to 
    each eligible trauma center.
    ``(h) Report.--Beginning 2 years after the date of enactment of the 
Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, and every 2 years 
thereafter, the Secretary shall biennially report to Congress regarding 
the status of the grants made under section 1241 and on the overall 
financial stability of trauma centers.''.
        (5) Authorization of appropriations.--Section 1245 of the 
    Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 300d-45) is amended to read as 
    follows:

``SEC. 1245. AUTHORIZATION OF APPROPRIATIONS.

    ``For the purpose of carrying out this part, there are authorized 
to be appropriated $100,000,000 for fiscal year 2009, and such sums as 
may be necessary for each of fiscal years 2010 through 2015. Such 
authorization of appropriations is in addition to any other 
authorization of appropriations or amounts that are available for such 
purpose.''.
        (6) Definition.--Part D of title XII of the Public Health 
    Service Act (42 U.S.C. 300d-41 et seq.) is amended by adding at the 
    end the following:

``SEC. 1246. DEFINITION.

    ``In this part, the term `uncompensated care costs' means 
unreimbursed costs from serving self-pay, charity, or Medicaid 
patients, without regard to payment under section 1923 of the Social 
Security Act, all of which are attributable to emergency care and 
trauma care, including costs related to subsequent inpatient admissions 
to the hospital.''.
    (b) Trauma Service Availability.--Title XII of the Public Health 
Service Act (42 U.S.C. 300d et seq.) is amended by adding at the end 
the following:

                 ``PART H--TRAUMA SERVICE AVAILABILITY

``SEC. 1281. GRANTS TO STATES.

    ``(a) Establishment.--To promote universal access to trauma care 
services provided by trauma centers and trauma-related physician 
specialties, the Secretary shall provide funding to States to enable 
such States to award grants to eligible entities for the purposes 
described in this section.
    ``(b) Awarding of Grants by States.--Each State may award grants to 
eligible entities within the State for the purposes described in 
subparagraph (d).
    ``(c) Eligibility.--
        ``(1) In general.--To be eligible to receive a grant under 
    subsection (b) an entity shall--
            ``(A) be--
                ``(i) a public or nonprofit trauma center or consortium 
            thereof that meets that requirements of paragraphs (1), 
            (2), and (5) of section 1241(b);
                ``(ii) a safety net public or nonprofit trauma center 
            that meets the requirements of paragraphs (1) through (5) 
            of section 1241(b); or
                ``(iii) a hospital in an underserved area (as defined 
            by the State) that seeks to establish new trauma services; 
            and
            ``(B) submit to the State an application at such time, in 
        such manner, and containing such information as the State may 
        require.
        ``(2) Limitation.--A State shall use at least 40 percent of the 
    amount available to the State under this part for a fiscal year to 
    award grants to safety net trauma centers described in paragraph 
    (1)(A)(ii).
    ``(d) Use of Funds.--The recipient of a grant under subsection (b) 
shall carry out 1 or more of the following activities consistent with 
subsection (b):
        ``(1) Providing trauma centers with funding to support 
    physician compensation in trauma-related physician specialties 
    where shortages exist in the region involved, with priority 
    provided to safety net trauma centers described in subsection 
    (c)(1)(A)(ii).
        ``(2) Providing for individual safety net trauma center fiscal 
    stability and costs related to having service that is available 24 
    hours a day, 7 days a week, with priority provided to safety net 
    trauma centers described in subsection (c)(1)(A)(ii) located in 
    urban, border, and rural areas.
        ``(3) Reducing trauma center overcrowding at specific trauma 
    centers related to throughput of trauma patients.
        ``(4) Establishing new trauma services in underserved areas as 
    defined by the State.
        ``(5) Enhancing collaboration between trauma centers and other 
    hospitals and emergency medical services personnel related to 
    trauma service availability.
        ``(6) Making capital improvements to enhance access and 
    expedite trauma care, including providing helipads and associated 
    safety infrastructure.
        ``(7) Enhancing trauma surge capacity at specific trauma 
    centers.
        ``(8) Ensuring expedient receipt of trauma patients transported 
    by ground or air to the appropriate trauma center.
        ``(9) Enhancing interstate trauma center collaboration.
    ``(e) Limitation.--
        ``(1) In general.--A State may use not more than 20 percent of 
    the amount available to the State under this part for a fiscal year 
    for administrative costs associated with awarding grants and 
    related costs.
        ``(2) Maintenance of effort.--The Secretary may not provide 
    funding to a State under this part unless the State agrees that 
    such funds will be used to supplement and not supplant State 
    funding otherwise available for the activities and costs described 
    in this part.
    ``(f) Distribution of Funds.--The following shall apply with 
respect to grants provided in this part:
        ``(1) Less than $10,000,000.--If the amount of appropriations 
    for this part in a fiscal year is less than $10,000,000, the 
    Secretary shall divide such funding evenly among only those States 
    that have 1 or more trauma centers eligible for funding under 
    section 1241(b)(3)(A).
        ``(2) Less than $20,000,000.--If the amount of appropriations 
    in a fiscal year is less than $20,000,000, the Secretary shall 
    divide such funding evenly among only those States that have 1 or 
    more trauma centers eligible for funding under subparagraphs (A) 
    and (B) of section 1241(b)(3).
        ``(3) Less than $30,000,000.--If the amount of appropriations 
    for this part in a fiscal year is less than $30,000,000, the 
    Secretary shall divide such funding evenly among only those States 
    that have 1 or more trauma centers eligible for funding under 
    section 1241(b)(3).
        ``(4) $30,000,000 or more.--If the amount of appropriations for 
    this part in a fiscal year is $30,000,000 or more, the Secretary 
    shall divide such funding evenly among all States.

``SEC. 1282. AUTHORIZATION OF APPROPRIATIONS.

    ``For the purpose of carrying out this part, there is authorized to 
be appropriated $100,000,000 for each of fiscal years 2010 through 
2015.''.

SEC. 3506. PROGRAM TO FACILITATE SHARED DECISIONMAKING.

    Part D of title IX of the Public Health Service Act, as amended by 
section 3503, is further amended by adding at the end the following:

``SEC. 936. PROGRAM TO FACILITATE SHARED DECISIONMAKING.

    ``(a) Purpose.--The purpose of this section is to facilitate 
collaborative processes between patients, caregivers or authorized 
representatives, and clinicians that engages the patient, caregiver or 
authorized representative in decisionmaking, provides patients, 
caregivers or authorized representatives with information about trade-
offs among treatment options, and facilitates the incorporation of 
patient preferences and values into the medical plan.
    ``(b) Definitions.--In this section:
        ``(1) Patient decision aid.--The term `patient decision aid' 
    means an educational tool that helps patients, caregivers or 
    authorized representatives understand and communicate their beliefs 
    and preferences related to their treatment options, and to decide 
    with their health care provider what treatments are best for them 
    based on their treatment options, scientific evidence, 
    circumstances, beliefs, and preferences.
        ``(2) Preference sensitive care.--The term `preference 
    sensitive care' means medical care for which the clinical evidence 
    does not clearly support one treatment option such that the 
    appropriate course of treatment depends on the values of the 
    patient or the preferences of the patient, caregivers or authorized 
    representatives regarding the benefits, harms and scientific 
    evidence for each treatment option, the use of such care should 
    depend on the informed patient choice among clinically appropriate 
    treatment options.
    ``(c) Establishment of Independent Standards for Patient Decision 
Aids for Preference Sensitive Care.--
        ``(1) Contract with entity to establish standards and certify 
    patient decision aids.--
            ``(A) In general.--For purposes of supporting consensus-
        based standards for patient decision aids for preference 
        sensitive care and a certification process for patient decision 
        aids for use in the Federal health programs and by other 
        interested parties, the Secretary shall have in effect a 
        contract with the entity with a contract under section 1890 of 
        the Social Security Act. Such contract shall provide that the 
        entity perform the duties described in paragraph (2).
            ``(B) Timing for first contract.--As soon as practicable 
        after the date of the enactment of this section, the Secretary 
        shall enter into the first contract under subparagraph (A).
            ``(C) Period of contract.--A contract under subparagraph 
        (A) shall be for a period of 18 months (except such contract 
        may be renewed after a subsequent bidding process).
        ``(2) Duties.--The following duties are described in this 
    paragraph:
            ``(A) Develop and identify standards for patient decision 
        aids.--The entity shall synthesize evidence and convene a broad 
        range of experts and key stakeholders to develop and identify 
        consensus-based standards to evaluate patient decision aids for 
        preference sensitive care.
            ``(B) Endorse patient decision aids.--The entity shall 
        review patient decision aids and develop a certification 
        process whether patient decision aids meet the standards 
        developed and identified under subparagraph (A). The entity 
        shall give priority to the review and certification of patient 
        decision aids for preference sensitive care.
    ``(d) Program To Develop, Update and Patient Decision Aids To 
Assist Health Care Providers and Patients.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Secretary, acting through the Director, 
    and in coordination with heads of other relevant agencies, such as 
    the Director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and 
    the Director of the National Institutes of Health, shall establish 
    a program to award grants or contracts--
            ``(A) to develop, update, and produce patient decision aids 
        for preference sensitive care to assist health care providers 
        in educating patients, caregivers, and authorized 
        representatives concerning the relative safety, relative 
        effectiveness (including possible health outcomes and impact on 
        functional status), and relative cost of treatment or, where 
        appropriate, palliative care options;
            ``(B) to test such materials to ensure such materials are 
        balanced and evidence based in aiding health care providers and 
        patients, caregivers, and authorized representatives to make 
        informed decisions about patient care and can be easily 
        incorporated into a broad array of practice settings; and
            ``(C) to educate providers on the use of such materials, 
        including through academic curricula.
        ``(2) Requirements for patient decision aids.--Patient decision 
    aids developed and produced pursuant to a grant or contract under 
    paragraph (1)--
            ``(A) shall be designed to engage patients, caregivers, and 
        authorized representatives in informed decisionmaking with 
        health care providers;
            ``(B) shall present up-to-date clinical evidence about the 
        risks and benefits of treatment options in a form and manner 
        that is age-appropriate and can be adapted for patients, 
        caregivers, and authorized representatives from a variety of 
        cultural and educational backgrounds to reflect the varying 
        needs of consumers and diverse levels of health literacy;
            ``(C) shall, where appropriate, explain why there is a lack 
        of evidence to support one treatment option over another; and
            ``(D) shall address health care decisions across the age 
        span, including those affecting vulnerable populations 
        including children.
        ``(3) Distribution.--The Director shall ensure that patient 
    decision aids produced with grants or contracts under this section 
    are available to the public.
        ``(4) Nonduplication of efforts.--The Director shall ensure 
    that the activities under this section of the Agency and other 
    agencies, including the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention 
    and the National Institutes of Health, are free of unnecessary 
    duplication of effort.
    ``(e) Grants To Support Shared Decisionmaking Implementation.--
        ``(1) In general.--The Secretary shall establish a program to 
    provide for the phased-in development, implementation, and 
    evaluation of shared decisionmaking using patient decision aids to 
    meet the objective of improving the understanding of patients of 
    their medical treatment options.
        ``(2) Shared decisionmaking resource centers.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Secretary shall provide grants for 
        the establishment and support of Shared Decisionmaking Resource 
        Centers (referred to in this subsection as `Centers') to 
        provide technical assistance to providers and to develop and 
        disseminate best practices and other information to support and 
        accelerate adoption, implementation, and effective use of 
        patient decision aids and shared decisionmaking by providers.
            ``(B) Objectives.--The objective of a Center is to enhance 
        and promote the adoption of patient decision aids and shared 
        decisionmaking through--
                ``(i) providing assistance to eligible providers with 
            the implementation and effective use of, and training on, 
            patient decision aids; and
                ``(ii) the dissemination of best practices and research 
            on the implementation and effective use of patient decision 
            aids.
        ``(3) Shared decisionmaking participation grants.--
            ``(A) In general.--The Secretary shall provide grants to 
        health care providers for the development and implementation of 
        shared decisionmaking techniques and to assess the use of such 
        techniques.
            ``(B) Preference.--In order to facilitate the use of best 
        practices, the Secretary shall provide a preference in making 
        grants under this subsection to health care providers who 
        participate in training by Shared Decisionmaking Resource 
        Centers or comparable training.
            ``(C) Limitation.--Funds under this paragraph shall not be 
        used to purchase or implement use of patient decision aids 
        other than those certified under the process identified in 
        subsection (c).
        ``(4) Guidance.--The Secretary may issue guidance to eligible 
    grantees under this subsection on the use of patient decision aids.
    ``(f) Funding.--For purposes of carrying out this section there are 
authorized to be appropriated such sums as may be necessary for fiscal 
year 2010 and each subsequent fiscal year.''.

SEC. 3507. PRESENTATION OF PRESCRIPTION DRUG BENEFIT AND RISK 
              INFORMATION.

    (a) In General.--The Secretary of Health and Human Services 
(referred to in this section as the ``Secretary''), acting through the 
Commissioner of Food and Drugs, shall determine whether the addition of 
quantitative summaries of the benefits and risks of prescription drugs 
in a standardized format (such as a table or drug facts box) to the 
promotional labeling or print advertising of such drugs would improve 
health care decisionmaking by clinicians and patients and consumers.
    (b) Review and Consultation.--In making the determination under 
subsection (a), the Secretary shall review all available scientific 
evidence and research on decisionmaking and social and cognitive 
psychology and consult with drug manufacturers, clinicians, patients 
and consumers, experts in health literacy, representatives of racial 
and ethnic minorities, and experts in women's and pediatric health.
    (c) Report.--Not later than 1 year after the date of enactment of 
this Act, the Secretary shall submit to Congress a report that 
provides--
        (1) the determination by the Secretary under subsection (a); 
    and
        (2) the reasoning and analysis underlying that determination.
    (d) Authority.--If the Secretary determines under subsection (a) 
that the addition of quantitative summaries of the benefits and risks 
of prescription drugs in a standardized format (such as a table or drug 
facts box) to the promotional labeling or print advertising of such 
drugs would improve health care decisionmaking by clinicians and 
patients and consumers, then the Secretary, not later than 3 years 
after the date of submission of the report under subsection (c), shall 
promulgate proposed regulations as necessary to implement such format.
    (e) Clarification.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to 
restrict the existing authorities of the Secretary with respect to 
benefit and risk information.

SEC. 3508. DEMONSTRATION PROGRAM TO INTEGRATE QUALITY IMPROVEMENT AND 
              PATIENT SAFETY TRAINING INTO CLINICAL EDUCATION OF HEALTH 
              PROFESSIONALS.

    (a) In General.--The Secretary may award grants to eligible 
entities or consortia under this section to carry out demonstration 
projects to develop and implement academic curricula that integrates 
quality improvement and patient safety in the clinical education of 
health professionals. Such awards shall be made on a competitive basis 
and pursuant to peer review.
    (b) Eligibility.--To be eligible to receive a grant under 
subsection (a), an entity or consortium shall--
        (1) submit to the Secretary an application at such time, in 
    such manner, and containing such information as the Secretary may 
    require;
        (2) be or include--
            (A) a health professions school;
            (B) a school of public health;
            (C) a school of social work;
            (D) a school of nursing;
            (E) a school of pharmacy;
            (F) an institution with a graduate medical education 
        program; or
            (G) a school of health care administration;
        (3) collaborate in the development of curricula described in 
    subsection (a) with an organization that accredits such school or 
    institution;
        (4) provide for the collection of data regarding the 
    effectiveness of the demonstration project; and
        (5) provide matching funds in accordance with subsection (c).
    (c) Matching Funds.--
        (1) In general.--The Secretary may award a grant to an entity 
    or consortium under this section only if the entity or consortium 
    agrees to make available non-Federal contributions toward the costs 
    of the program to be funded under the grant in an amount that is 
    not less than $1 for each $5 of Federal funds provided under the 
    grant.
        (2) Determination of amount contributed.--Non-Federal 
    contributions under paragraph (1) may be in cash or in-kind, fairly 
    evaluated, including equipment or services. Amounts provided by the 
    Federal Government, or services assisted or subsidized to any 
    significant extent by the Federal Government, may not be included 
    in determining the amount of such contributions.
    (d) Evaluation.--The Secretary shall take such action as may be 
necessary to evaluate the projects funded under this section and 
publish, make publicly available, and disseminate the results of such 
evaluations on as wide a basis as is practicable.
    (e) Reports.--Not later than 2 years after the date of enactment of 
this section, and annually thereafter, the Secretary shall submit to 
the Committee on Health, Education, Labor, and Pensions and the 
Committee on Finance of the Senate and the Committee on Energy and 
Commerce and the Committee on Ways and Means of the House of 
Representatives a report that--
        (1) describes the specific projects supported under this 
    section; and
        (2) contains recommendations for Congress based on the 
    evaluation conducted under subsection (d).

SEC. 3509. IMPROVING WOMEN'S HEALTH.

    (a) Health and Human Services Office on Women's Health.--
        (1) Establishment.--Part A of title II of the Public Health 
    Service Act (42 U.S.C. 202 et seq.) is amended by adding at the end 
    the following:

``SEC. 229. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES OFFICE ON WOMEN'S HEALTH.

    ``(a) Establishment of Office.--There is established within the 
Office of the Secretary, an Office on Women's Health (referred to in 
this section as the `Office'). The Office shall be headed by a Deputy 
Assistant Secretary for Women's Health who may report to the Secretary.
    ``(b) Duties.--The Secretary, acting through the Office, with 
respect to the health concerns of women, shall--
        ``(1) establish short-range and long-range goals and objectives 
    within the Department of Health and Human Services and, as relevant 
    and appropriate, coordinate with other appropriate offices on 
    activities within the Department that relate to disease prevention, 
    health promotion, service delivery, research, and public and health 
    care professional education, for issues of particular concern to 
    women throughout their lifespan;
        ``(2) provide expert advice and consultation to the Secretary 
    concerning scientific, legal, ethical, and policy issues relating 
    to women's health;
        ``(3) monitor the Department of Health and Human Services' 
    offices, agencies, and regional activities regarding women's health 
    and identify needs regarding the coordination of activities, 
    including intramural and extramural multidisciplinary activities;
        ``(4) establish a Department of Health and Human Services 
    Coordinating Committee on Women's Health, which shall be chaired by 
    the Deputy Assistant Secretary for Women's Health and composed of 
    senior level representatives from each of the agencies and offices 
    of the Department of Health and Human Services;
        ``(5) establish a National Women's Health Information Center 
    to--
            ``(A) facilitate the exchange of information regarding 
        matters relating to health information, health promotion, 
        preventive health services, research advances, and education in 
        the appropriate use of health care;
            ``(B) facilitate access to such information;
            ``(C) assist in the analysis of issues and problems 
        relating to the matters described in this paragraph; and
            ``(D) provide technical assistance with respect to the 
        exchange of information (including facilitating the development 
        of materials for such technical assistance);
        ``(6) coordinate efforts to promote women's health programs and 
    policies with the private sector; and
        ``(7) through publications and any other means appropriate, 
    provide for the exchange of information between the Office and 
    recipients of grants, contracts, and agreements under subsection 
    (c), and between the Office and health professionals and the 
    general public.
    ``(c) Grants and Contracts Regarding Duties.--
        ``(1) Authority.--In carrying out subsection (b), the Secretary 
    may make grants to, and enter into cooperative agreements, 
    contracts, and interagency agreements with, public and private 
    entities, agencies, and organizations.
        ``(2) Evaluation and dissemination.--The Secretary shall 
    directly or through contracts with public and private entities, 
    agencies, and organizations, provide for evaluations of projects 
    carried out with financial assistance provided under paragraph (1) 
    and for the dissemination of information developed as a result of 
    such projects.
    ``(d) Reports.--Not later than 1 year after the date of enactment 
of this section, and every second year thereafter, the Secretary shall 
prepare and submit to the appropriate committees of Congress a report 
describing the activities carried out under this section during the 
period for which the report is being prepared.
    ``(e) Authorization of Appropriations.--For the purpose of carrying 
out this section, there are authorized to be appropriated such sums as 
may be necessary for each of the fiscal years 2010 through 2014.''.
        (2) Transfer of functions.--There are transferred to the Office 
    on Women's Health (established under section 229 of the Public 
    Health Service Act, as added by this section), all functions 
    exercised by the Office on Women's Health of the Public Health 
    Service prior to the date of enactment of this section, including 
    all personnel and compensation authority, all delegation and 
    assignment authority, and all remaining appropriations. All orders, 
    determinations, rules, regulations, permits, agreements, grants, 
    contracts, certificates, licenses, registrations, privileges, and 
    other administrative actions that--
            (A) have been issued, made, granted, or allowed to become 
        effective by the President, any Federal agency or official 
        thereof, or by a court of competent jurisdiction, in the 
        performance of functions transferred under this paragraph; and
            (B) are in effect at the time this section takes effect, or 
        were final before the date of enactment of this section and are 
        to become effective on or after such date,
    shall continue in effect according to their terms until modified, 
    terminated, superseded, set aside, or revoked in accordance with 
    law by the President, the Secretary, or other authorized official, 
    a court of competent jurisdiction, or by operation of law.
    (b) Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Office of Women's 
Health.--Part A of title III of the Public Health Service Act (42 
U.S.C. 241 et seq.) is amended by adding at the end the following:

``SEC. 310A. CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION OFFICE OF 
              WOMEN'S HEALTH.

    ``(a) Establishment.--There is established within the Office of the 
Director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, an office 
to be known as the Office of Women's Health (referred to in this 
section as the `Office'). The Office shall be headed by a director who 
shall be appointed by the Director of such Centers.
    ``(b) Purpose.--The Director of the Office shall--
        ``(1) report to the Director of the Centers for Disease Control 
    and Prevention on the current level of the Centers' activity 
    regarding women's health conditions across, where appropriate, age, 
    biological, and sociocultural contexts, in all aspects of the 
    Centers' work, including prevention programs, public and 
    professional education, services, and treatment;
        ``(2) establish short-range and long-range goals and objectives 
    within the Centers for women's health and, as relevant and 
    appropriate, coordinate with other appropriate offices on 
    activities within the Centers that relate to prevention, research, 
    education and training, service delivery, and policy development, 
    for issues of particular concern to women;
        ``(3) identify projects in women's health that should be 
    conducted or supported by the Centers;
        ``(4) consult with health professionals, nongovernmental 
    organizations, consumer organizations, women's health 
    professionals, and other individuals and groups, as appropriate, on 
    the policy of the Centers with regard to women; and
        ``(5) serve as a member of the Department of Health and Human 
    Services Coordinating Committee on Women's Health (established 
    under section 229(b)(4)).
    ``(c) Definition.--As used in this section, the term `women's 
health conditions', with respect to women of all age, ethnic, and 
racial groups, means diseases, disorders, and conditions--
        ``(1) unique to, significantly more serious for, or 
    significantly more prevalent in women; and
        ``(2) for which the factors of medical risk or type of medical 
    intervention are different for women, or for which there is 
    reasonable evidence that indicates that such factors or types may 
    be different for women.
    ``(d) Authorization of Appropriations.--For the purpose of carrying 
out this section, there are authorized to be appropriated such sums as 
may be necessary for each of the fiscal years 2010 through 2014.''.
    (c) Office of Women's Health Research.--Section 486(a) of the 
Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 287d(a)) is amended by inserting 
``and who shall report directly to the Director'' before the period at 
the end thereof.
    (d) Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration.--
Section 501(f) of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 290aa(f)) is 
amended--
        (1) in paragraph (1), by inserting ``who shall report directly 
    to the Administrator'' before the period;
        (2) by redesignating paragraph (4) as paragraph (5); and
        (3) by inserting after paragraph (3), the following:
        ``(4) Office.--Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 
    preclude the Secretary from establishing within the Substance Abuse 
    and Mental Health Administration an Office of Women's Health.''.
    (e) Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality Activities Regarding 
Women's Health.--Part C of title IX of the Public Health Service Act 
(42 U.S.C. 299c et seq.) is amended--
        (1) by redesignating sections 925 and 926 as sections 926 and 
    927, respectively; and
        (2) by inserting after section 924 the following:

``SEC. 925. ACTIVITIES REGARDING WOMEN'S HEALTH.

    ``(a) Establishment.--There is established within the Office of the 
Director, an Office of Women's Health and Gender-Based Research 
(referred to in this section as the `Office'). The Office shall be 
headed by a director who shall be appointed by the Director of 
Healthcare and Research Quality.
    ``(b) Purpose.--The official designated under subsection (a) 
shall--
        ``(1) report to the Director on the current Agency level of 
    activity regarding women's health, across, where appropriate, age, 
    biological, and sociocultural contexts, in all aspects of Agency 
    work, including the development of evidence reports and clinical 
    practice protocols and the conduct of research into patient 
    outcomes, delivery of health care services, quality of care, and 
    access to health care;
        ``(2) establish short-range and long-range goals and objectives 
    within the Agency for research important to women's health and, as 
    relevant and appropriate, coordinate with other appropriate offices 
    on activities within the Agency that relate to health services and 
    medical effectiveness research, for issues of particular concern to 
    women;
        ``(3) identify projects in women's health that should be 
    conducted or supported by the Agency;
        ``(4) consult with health professionals, nongovernmental 
    organizations, consumer organizations, women's health 
    professionals, and other individuals and groups, as appropriate, on 
    Agency policy with regard to women; and
        ``(5) serve as a member of the Department of Health and Human 
    Services Coordinating Committee on Women's Health (established 
    under section 229(b)(4)).''.
    ``(c) Authorization of Appropriations.--For the purpose of carrying 
out this section, there are authorized to be appropriated such sums as 
may be necessary for each of the fiscal years 2010 through 2014.''.
    (f) Health Resources and Services Administration Office of Women's 
Health.--Title VII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 901 et seq.) 
is amended by adding at the end the following:

``SEC. 713. OFFICE OF WOMEN'S HEALTH.

    ``(a) Establishment.--The Secretary shall establish within the 
Office of the Administrator of the Health Resources and Services 
Administration, an office to be known as the Office of Women's Health. 
The Office shall be headed by a director who shall be appointed by the 
Administrator.
    ``(b) Purpose.--The Director of the Office shall--
        ``(1) report to the Administrator on the current Administration 
    level of activity regarding women's health across, where 
    appropriate, age, biological, and sociocultural contexts;
        ``(2) establish short-range and long-range goals and objectives 
    within the Health Resources and Services Administration for women's 
    health and, as relevant and appropriate, coordinate with other 
    appropriate offices on activities within the Administration that 
    relate to health care provider training, health service delivery, 
    research, and demonstration projects, for issues of particular 
    concern to women;
        ``(3) identify projects in women's health that should be 
    conducted or supported by the bureaus of the Administration;
        ``(4) consult with health professionals, nongovernmental 
    organizations, consumer organizations, women's health 
    professionals, and other individuals and groups, as appropriate, on 
    Administration policy with regard to women; and
        ``(5) serve as a member of the Department of Health and Human 
    Services Coordinating Committee on Women's Health (established 
    under section 229(b)(4) of the Public Health Service Act).
    ``(c) Continued Administration of Existing Programs.--The Director 
of the Office shall assume the authority for the development, 
implementation, administration, and evaluation of any projects carried 
out through the Health Resources and Services Administration relating 
to women's health on the date of enactment of this section.
    ``(d) Definitions.--For purposes of this section:
        ``(1) Administration.--The term `Administration' means the 
    Health Resources and Services Administration.
        ``(2) Administrator.--The term `Administrator' means the 
    Administrator of the Health Resources and Services Administration.
        ``(3) Office.--The term `Office' means the Office of Women's 
    Health established under this section in the Administration.
    ``(e) Authorization of Appropriations.--For the purpose of carrying 
out this section, there are authorized to be appropriated such sums as 
may be necessary for each of the fiscal years 2010 through 2014.''.
    (g) Food and Drug Administration Office of Women's Health.--Chapter 
X of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 391 et seq.) 
is amended by adding at the end the following:

``SEC. 1011. OFFICE OF WOMEN'S HEALTH.

    ``(a) Establishment.--There is established within the Office of the 
Commissioner, an office to be known as the Office of Women's Health 
(referred to in this section as the `Office'). The Office shall be 
headed by a director who shall be appointed by the Commissioner of Food 
and Drugs.
    ``(b) Purpose.--The Director of the Office shall--
        ``(1) report to the Commissioner of Food and Drugs on current 
    Food and Drug Administration (referred to in this section as the 
    `Administration') levels of activity regarding women's 
    participation in clinical trials and the analysis of data by sex in 
    the testing of drugs, medical devices, and biological products 
    across, where appropriate, age, biological, and sociocultural 
    contexts;
        ``(2) establish short-range and long-range goals and objectives 
    within the Administration for issues of particular concern to 
    women's health within the jurisdiction of the Administration, 
    including, where relevant and appropriate, adequate inclusion of 
    women and analysis of data by sex in Administration protocols and 
    policies;
        ``(3) provide information to women and health care providers on 
    those areas in which differences between men and women exist;
        ``(4) consult with pharmaceutical, biologics, and device 
    manufacturers, health professionals with expertise in women's 
    issues, consumer organizations, and women's health professionals on 
    Administration policy with regard to women;
        ``(5) make annual estimates of funds needed to monitor clinical 
    trials and analysis of data by sex in accordance with needs that 
    are identified; and
        ``(6) serve as a member of the Department of Health and Human 
    Services Coordinating Committee on Women's Health (established 
    under section 229(b)(4) of the Public Health Service Act).
    ``(c) Authorization of Appropriations.--For the purpose of carrying 
out this section, there are authorized to be appropriated such sums as 
may be necessary for each of the fiscal years 2010 through 2014.''.
    (h) No New Regulatory Authority.--Nothing in this section and the 
amendments made by this section may be construed as establishing 
regulatory authority or modifying any existing regulatory authority.
    (i) Limitation on Termination.--Notwithstanding any other provision 
of law, a Federal office of women's health (including the Office of 
Research on Women's Health of the National Institutes of Health) or 
Federal appointive position with primary responsibility over women's 
health issues (including the Associate Administrator for Women's 
Services under the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services 
Administration) that is in existence on the date of enactment of this 
section shall not be terminated, reorganized, or have any of it's 
powers or duties transferred unless such termination, reorganization, 
or transfer is approved by Congress through the adoption of a 
concurrent resolution of approval.
    (j) Rule of Construction.--Nothing in this section (or the 
amendments made by this section) shall be construed to limit the 
authority of the Secretary of Health and Human Services with respect to 
women's health, or with respect to activities carried out through the 
Department of Health and Human Services on the date of enactment of 
this section.

SEC. 3510. PATIENT NAVIGATOR PROGRAM.

    Section 340A of the Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. 256a) is 
amended--
        (1) by striking subsection (d)(3) and inserting the following:
        ``(3) Limitations on grant period.--In carrying out this 
    section, the Secretary shall ensure that the total period of a 
    grant does not exceed 4 years.'';
        (2) in subsection (e), by adding at the end the following:
        ``(3) Minimum core proficiencies.--The Secretary shall not 
    award a grant to an entity under this section unless such entity 
    provides assurances that patient navigators recruited, assigned, 
    trained, or employed using grant funds meet minimum core 
    proficiencies, as defined by the entity that submits the 
    application, that are tailored for the main focus or intervention 
    of the navigator involved.''; and
        (3) in subsection (m)--
            (A) in paragraph (1), by striking ``and $3,500,000 for 
        fiscal year 2010.'' and inserting ``$3,500,000 for fiscal year 
        2010, and such sums as may be necessary for each of fiscal 
        years 2011 through 2015.''; and
            (B) in paragraph (2), by striking ``2010'' and inserting 
        ``2015''.

SEC. 3511. AUTHORIZATION OF APPROPRIATIONS.

    Except where otherwise provided in this subtitle (or an amendment 
made by this subtitle), there is authorized to be appropriated such 
sums as may be necessary to carry out this subtitle (and such 
amendments made by this subtitle).

   Subtitle G--Protecting and Improving Guaranteed Medicare Benefits

SEC. 3601. PROTECTING AND IMPROVING GUARANTEED MEDICARE BENEFITS.

    (a) Protecting Guaranteed Medicare Benefits.--Nothing in the 
provisions of, or amendments made by, this Act shall result in a 
reduction of guaranteed benefits under title XVIII of the Social 
Security Act.
    (b) Ensuring That Medicare Savings Benefit the Medicare Program and 
Medicare Beneficiaries.--Savings generated for the Medicare program 
under title XVIII of the Social Security Act under the provisions of, 
and amendments made by, this Act shall extend the solvency of the 
Medicare trust funds, reduce Medicare premiums and other cost-sharing 
for beneficiaries, and improve or expand guaranteed Medicare benefits 
and protect access to Medicare providers.

SEC. 3602. NO CUTS IN GUARANTEED BENEFITS.

    Nothing in this Act shall result in the reduction or elimination of 
any benefits guaranteed by law to participants in Medicare Advantage 
plans.
